Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027, out of the several funds specified in this act.(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Fiscal year 2026" or "FY 2026" means the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.(b) "Fiscal year 2027" or "FY 2027" means the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts.Â "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects.Â A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2027-2029 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2025, from the 2023-2025 biennial appropriations for each project.PART 1GENERAL GOVERNMENTNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1001. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATEPuget Sound Regional Archives HVAC (40000007)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 FIFA World Cup (40000650)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 1023, chapter 375, Laws of 2024 as amended in section 7021 of this act.(2) $4,200,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects for capital improvements required to host the 2026 World Cup in Seattle:Washington State Public Stadium Authority. . . .$4,100,000Gonzaga University Practice Field . . . .$100,000Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Early Learning Facilities - Eligible Organizations (40000656)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $52,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.565 through 43.31.583, and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to 3.5 percent of the funding in this subsection (1) may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.(b) The department is encouraged to leverage private and public match funds when feasible and may not require match funds for applicants experiencing financial hardship. The department may not consider the level of project match funds as a competitive criterion when selecting or recommending projects for funding.(c) Grants may include awards for construction, renovation, or facility purchase projects that will increase early childhood education and assistance program capacity by supporting conversion of slots from part day programs to full day programs or extended day programs, or conversion of full day programs to extended day programs, as defined in RCW 43.216.010.(2) $3,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for emergency grants pursuant to HB 1314 (Early learning facilities). The department may use up to $112,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (2) for administrative expenses.(3) $8,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.(4) $6,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities revolving accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection (4) may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program. The department may not use any portion of the appropriation in this subsection (4) for administrative expenses of the department.(5) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(6) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.(7) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.(8) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.(9) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility.(10) $10,940,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:Cora Whitley Family Center. . . .$485,000Hemlock Commons at Play Frontier. . . .$1,036,000Little Wings Early Learning. . . .$3,550,000New Tomorrow's Hope Center. . . .$3,050,000Port Angeles YMCA Early Learning. . . .$2,050,000Redmond Childcare Expansion. . . .$769,000(11) The department may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in subsections (1) and (3) of this section for administrative expenses. The department may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in subsection (10) of this section or $50,000 per project, whichever is less, for administrative expenses.Appropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$73,940,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesRevolving AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$79,940,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$319,760,000TOTAL. . . .$399,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 CERB Capital Construction (40000658)Appropriation:Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState. . . .$75,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,000,000TOTAL. . . .$375,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000659)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,913,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,295,000TOTAL. . . .$8,208,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Defense Community Compatibility Account (40000660)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:North Clear Zone. . . .$1,000,000Oakbrook O3 Well. . . .$3,451,000Joint Firefighting Training Center. . . .$6,700,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,151,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$44,604,000TOTAL. . . .$55,755,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Youth Recreational Facilities Program (40000661)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.(2) Except as directed otherwise before the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:Camp Robbinswold Lodge Renovation. . . .$453,000Chelan Boys & Girls Club. . . .$180,000ICSVPAC Music Corner & Rehearsal Room. . . .$1,200,000Lopez Swim Center. . . .$263,000Madison House Acquisition. . . .$275,000Marysville YMCA Youth Recreation Facility. . . .$1,125,000OIC Excel Youth Center. . . .$475,000Outdoor Play Area Renovations. . . .$25,000Prosser Clubhouse. . . .$1,200,000Sedro-Woolley Rec Center Remodel. . . .$68,000Skagit Y Outdoor Capital Campaign. . . .$423,000Snoqualmie YMCA Expansion Project. . . .$1,200,000Teen Workforce Development Expansion. . . .$27,000Wenatchee Children's Play, Learning & RecreationFacility. . . .$774,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,688,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,752,000TOTAL. . . .$38,440,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Library Capital Improvement Program (40000662)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a local library capital improvement grant program for the following list of projects:Aberdeen Library Renovation. . . .$2,000,000Central Library Interior Renovation. . . .$2,000,000Liberty Lake Municipal Library ConstructionProject. . . .$937,000Lopez Island Library Renovation and ResilienceProject. . . .$277,000Main Library Exterior Envelope Repair. . . .$560,000Omak Public Library Renovation. . . .$723,000Orcas Island Library Renovation. . . .$294,000Port Angeles Library Accessible Pathways Project. . . .$313,000Port Townsend Public Library HVAC and ElevatorModernization. . . .$160,000Rosalia Library Donation and Renovation. . . .$75,000University Branch Library Improvements. . . .$2,000,000Yakima Central Library Infrastructure Needs for YakimaValley Library. . . .$611,000Yakima Sunnyside Library Infrastructure Needs for YakimaValley Library. . . .$50,000(2) The department must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist libraries operated by governmental units, as defined in RCW 27.12.010, in acquiring, constructing, repairing, or rehabilitating facilities.(3) The department must establish a committee to develop the grant program criteria established under subsection (2) of this section and review proposals. The committee must be composed of five members as provided in this subsection. The committee must include: (a) A representative from the department of commerce; (b) a representative from the department of archaeology and historic preservation; (c) the state librarian; (d) a representative from a library district; and (e) a representative from a municipal library.(4) The department must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications. The department must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with the committee established in subsection (3) of this section, using objective criteria. The ranking of projects must prioritize library district facilities listed on a local, state, or federal register of historic places and those located in distressed or rural counties. The evaluation and ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets that applicants propose to apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.(5) The department must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature by October 1, 2026, for inclusion in the department of commerce's 2027-2029 biennial capital budget request. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. Individual grants may not exceed $2,000,000. The total amount of recommended state funding for the projects on a biennial project list may not exceed $10,000,000.(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state building construction accountâstate the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant. Any repayments received pursuant to this subsection must be spent before any other amounts in the building construction accountâstate.(7) The department must assist grant recipients under this section to apply for applicable competitive federal grant funding and, upon receipt of any such funding, an equal amount of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation must be placed in unallotted status.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Early Learning Facilities - School Districts (40000663)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Cle Elum School District . . . .$978,000Lind-Ritzville Cooperative Schools . . . .$823,000Medical Lake School District . . . .$1,102,000Meridian School District . . . .$1,100,000Orting School District Early Learning Center. . . .$4,592,000Prosser School District . . . .$1,102,000Valley School District Valley Early Learning Center. . . .$1,102,000Walla Walla School District. . . .$285,000West Valley School District . . . .$1,035,000Appropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$12,119,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$48,476,000TOTAL. . . .$60,595,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Clean Energy Community Grants (40000665)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer grants to nonprofit organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribal entities, state agencies, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, and research organizations for planning, design, and implementation of capital projects and clean energy technologies that reduce greenhouse gas emissions in vulnerable, overburdened, and tribal communities identified by the department. The department must prioritize grants providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.(b) Eligible uses of grant funds include, but are not limited to, planning for sustainable communities and predesign work, energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy generation, increasing the supply of affordable, energy efficient housing, developing resilient and sustainable infrastructure systems, zero-emission, active mobility, and micromobility transportation infrastructure, education and engagement, and workforce development.(2) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program. Administration includes, but is not limited to, identifying eligible communities, providing technical assistance, managing contracts, reporting, and providing planning and implementation assistance.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$13,750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,000,000TOTAL. . . .$68,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 High Efficiency Electric Appliance Rebates (HEAR) Program (40000666)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $25,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pump and other high-efficiency electric equipment rebates, with a focus on low and moderate-income households, renters, nonprofit organizations, and small businesses. State incentives and rebates for installation of high-efficiency electric equipment, including electrical panel upgrades, provide a benefit to the public consistent with the state's energy strategy and climate mandates by reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the built environment. The department shall administer the grant program in a manner that seeks to maximize greenhouse gas emissions reductions.(b) $5,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pumps for adult family homes.(2) The department shall implement a statewide high-efficiency electric equipment program consistent with the following:(a) Aid the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels by providing education and outreach resources for the installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other high-efficiency electric equipment;(b) Provide grants, coordination, and technical assistance to eligible third-party administrators to promote the adoption of high-efficiency electric heat pump equipment for space and water heating; and(c) Develop strategies to ensure that the program serves low-income households, vulnerable populations, and overburdened communities, including dedicating at least 40 percent of the program funding for this purpose. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "overburdened communities" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.65.010 and "vulnerable populations" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.02.010.(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible third-party administrators" include, but are not limited to, nonprofits, utilities, housing providers, community action agencies, and community-based organizations.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$30,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000TOTAL. . . .$150,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Behavioral Health Facilities (40000667)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. The amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in the geographical availability of behavioral health services in their region;(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment, as applicable by facility type, under chapter 71.05 RCW;(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors as applicable to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.(5) $70,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs. Priority must be given to: Sustaining and preventing closure of existing facilities; youth and adult bed capacity with consideration given to gaps identified in the 2024 behavioral health capital grant facility funding report; and facilities that serve specialized populations, including, but not limited to, services for individuals with traumatic brain injury, dementia, and cooccurring complex needs of youth. Additional categories of facilities may be funded based on identified needs of a region. Eligible facilities include, but are not limited to:(a) Crisis relief centers and stabilization facilities that offer access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes per patient, at a time, and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(b) Mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the 10 regions;(c) Grants to community providers to increase long-term intensive inpatient psychiatric treatment services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions;(d) Grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;(e) Enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term dementia placements discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(f) Facilities that provide substance use disorder intervention, assessment, and treatment services with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and(g) Health engagement hubs where behavioral health supportive services, such as harm reduction and physical health services, are offered within the same facility as behavioral health services and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.(6) $10,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for one crisis stabilization facility in the King county region consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B., by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15-35462, that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the health care authority and the King county behavioral health administrative service organization and must only select a facility that has been selected by King county's crisis care centers initiative as the crisis care center for the south King county region.(7) $10,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the design and construction of the Lummi nation substance abuse treatment project pursuant to section 1009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.(8) $42,543,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Broadway - Compass Health. . . .$5,050,000Cascade Community Health. . . .$541,000Healing Lodge of the Seven Nations. . . .$5,050,000Ituha Stabilization Facility. . . .$927,000Pregnant and Parenting Inpatient SUD. . . .$796,000Skagit County Crisis Stabilization. . . .$549,000Sound Crisis Stabilization Facility. . . .$3,050,000Spokane Stabilization Center. . . .$3,050,000Suquamish Opioid Treatment Program. . . .$18,480,000Yakama Detox Center. . . .$5,050,000(9) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, where the department has awarded a grant for the operation of a crisis diversion or stabilization facility located in Pierce county that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, the department may amend the contract associated with the grant in order to authorize the facility to be used for any community development block grant national objective.(10) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.(11) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.(12) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.(13) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2026. The report must include:(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.(14) The department must coordinate with the health care authority to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2027-2029 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$133,043,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$532,172,000TOTAL. . . .$665,215,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000668)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:American Urban Art & Graffiti Conservation Project. . . .$105,000Benaroya Hall Public Spaces Improvements - Phase 1. . . .$878,000Cambodian Cultural Hall/Sala Thormaksaphea. . . .$217,000Centrum Artist Studios. . . .$878,000Cherry Street Farm Cultural Arts Center and Lab. . . .$153,000CMT Theatrical Lighting System Renovation. . . .$290,000Columbia Dance Expansion. . . .$46,000Energy Renovation Upgrade. . . .$154,000Enhancing Visitor Experience: Security, Lighting andWayfinding S. . . .$87,000Estelita's Freedom House and Cultural Center. . . .$878,000FCC Hall Renovation: Babaylan Performance & GatheringSpace. . . .$174,000Forest Trailhead Exhibit - Trailhead Pavilion. . . .$878,000Historic Paramount Theatre: Security & Floor SystemsImprovements. . . .$270,000Hy'shqe Labs. . . .$878,000ICSVPAC Box Office Lobby. . . .$878,000Keep Cool Campaign. . . .$753,000Key Capital Projects at Nonprofit Theater in WallaWalla. . . .$22,000KPC Capital Project. . . .$152,000Little Saigon Vietnamese Cultural & EconomicCenter. . . .$878,000Living Arts. . . .$230,000Main Campus Center Renovations. . . .$878,000Meyer Art Center. . . .$878,000Mini Mart City Park - New FacilityAcquisition. . . .$149,000Museum of Glass Renovation - Phase 1. . . .$878,000Orcas Center Renovation - Phase 3. . . .$506,000Puyallup Tribe Of Indians. . . .$878,000Red Eagle Soaring. . . .$176,000Renovation of Whim W'Him Contemporary Dance Center. . . .$227,000Replacement and upgrade of Hot Shop Infrastructure andKey Capita. . . .$46,000Restoration of Historic Carriage House. . . .$452,000Seattle Aquarium's Ocean Pavilion. . . .$878,000Tacoma Little Theatre Lobby & Bathroom Renovations. . . .$146,000TAM Community Gallery and Visual Storage Project. . . .$878,000The Rhapsody Workshop at King Street Station. . . .$200,000The Washington State Black Legacy Institute. . . .$878,000Totem Star's New Home and Recording Studio at King StreetStation. . . .$253,000Warehouse Theatre Upgrade. . . .$22,000Wenatchee Valley Museum and Cultural Center's GalleryExpansion P. . . .$878,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$18,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000TOTAL. . . .$90,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Building Communities Fund Program (40000669)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs has been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(3) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Alatheia Capacity Building Project. . . .$595,000Arc Legacy Center. . . .$797,000Boys & Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin Counties. . . .$1,425,000Boys & Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin Counties - Prosser Club. . . .$350,000Building What Matters. . . .$2,500,000Chelan Douglas Community Action Council. . . .$2,000,000Chelan Douglas County Volunteer Attorney Services - New Home. . . .$300,000Commercial Space - NHCDI. . . .$450,000Community Services at Pea Patch Lane. . . .$2,000,000Enhancing Safety and Security. . . .$20,000Expanded Community Resource Center and Food Bank. . . .$2,500,000Farm Fresh HUB Facility. . . .$1,500,000Food Bank Warehouse/Delivery Center. . . .$500,000Healing Headquarters. . . .$990,000Healthy Aging and Wellness Center. . . .$2,000,000Hilltop Family Resource Center - The Cora Whitley FamilyCenter. . . .$250,000Hoh Highlands Government Center. . . .$2,000,000HopesCloset. . . .$12,000Housing Solutions Center Acquisition and Renovation. . . .$1,188,000IACS Kent Community Center. . . .$2,000,000Inchelium Community Wellness Center. . . .$2,500,000Jefferson County Early Learning & Family Support Center. . . .$1,570,000Keep the Community Fed. . . .$1,150,000Lopez Food Center. . . .$1,687,000Market and Community Hub. . . .$900,000Methow Valley Community Center Clean Air Refuge & EnergyRetrofit. . . .$450,000Natural Resources Department Renovations Project. . . .$100,000New Puyallup Health Center. . . .$2,000,000Place for Peace Capital Expansion Project. . . .$540,000Rainier Beach Family Empowerment Center. . . .$2,000,000Room for All Campaign. . . .$690,000Salish Cultural and Recreation Community Center. . . .$2,500,000Skyway Resource Center Acquisition. . . .$1,450,000Somali Community & Cultural Innovation Hub. . . .$2,500,000Vancouver Family Resource Center. . . .$1,228,000Vashon Food Bank New Building. . . .$1,300,000Wenatchee Valley Cultural Center. . . .$2,500,000Youth Community Center. . . .$640,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$49,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$196,328,000TOTAL. . . .$245,410,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grants (40000670)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $1,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for facility improvements and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for awards to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works, stand-alone, and emergency projects at facilities owned by state agencies that repair or replace existing building systems and reduce greenhouse gas emissions from state operations, including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request.(3) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.(4) If a grant is provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this section to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.(5) Grants provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section to state agencies are exempt from the match requirements in this section.(6) $4,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Seattle Central College EcoDistrict project.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Weatherization Plus Health Grants (40000671)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.(2) The department must, to the extent practicable, implement the recommendations in the weatherization plus health 2022 report.(3) If funding from these appropriations is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.(4) The department must:(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard-to-reach market segments;(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with nonprofit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$16,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$36,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$144,000,000TOTAL. . . .$180,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Public Works Board (40000672)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $13,175,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation, $118,580,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation, and $268,245,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the public works board to award new or reimburse previously authorized grants and loans to local governments for infrastructure projects in accordance with chapter 43.155 RCW. When reimbursing projects that are awarded funding by the board under this appropriation authority, the department and the board must first spend funding available from the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation and the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section.Â When the state building construction accountâstate and state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations provided in this section are fully spent, the department and the board may then award and reimburse projects using up to $268,245,000 from the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation, but only to the extent that there is a sufficient balance in the public works assistance accountâstate to support additional project awards and reimbursements.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,175,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$118,580,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$268,245,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$400,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,600,000,000TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Community EV Charging (40000673)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.(2) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.(3) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.(4) Grant funding must be used for level two or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including, but not limited to, construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.(5) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:(a) Multifamily housing;(b) Publicly available charging at any location;(c) Schools and school districts;(d) State and local government buildings and office buildings; and(e) All other eligible projects.(6) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.(7) The department may:(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.(8) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.(9) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure Program (40000675)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments and public utility districts to defray the cost of waiving a portion of or all of the fees normally applied to developers for utility connection charges and related street improvements related to new affordable housing projects for low- and moderate-income households.(b) Where applicable, the utility extension and related street improvements must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area as set forth in the approved comprehensive plans. Street improvements are eligible if the improvements are related directly to the utility extension or connection and are adjacent to the new housing units being constructed.(c) Projects must be located within a jurisdiction that imposes a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.(2)(a) $30,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants for system development charges, utility improvements, and street improvements associated with utility infrastructure for affordable housing projects serving low-income households located within a city or county with a population of 150,000 or fewer persons.(b) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for the department for pilot grants for system development charges, utility improvements, and street improvements associated with utility infrastructure for affordable housing projects serving moderate-income households. The pilot program must be offered in three counties located in the north central region of the state. The counties must share borders with one another, be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and each have a population of 85,000 persons or fewer. By June 1, 2027, the department must submit a report to the office of financial management and to the appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Summarizes the results of the pilot program, including an analysis of the need for infrastructure assistance for local governments to support the development of housing affordable to moderate-income households, and the benefits to communities that may result from increasing economic diversity in housing that is made more affordable through infrastructure subsidies;(ii) Describes the number and total dollar amount of application requests and funding awards; and(iii) Makes recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of the pilot program and recommended future funding levels.(3) To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:(a) That affordable housing development will begin construction within 24 months of the grant or loan award; and(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.(a) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that requires payment of monthly housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no more than 30 percent of the household's income.(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.(c) "Moderate-income household" means: For purposes of the pilot program authorized in this section, a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is above 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for family size, for the county where the affordable housing project is located, but less than the state median income, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(d) "System development charges" means charges for new utility improvements.(e) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.(5) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fort Lawton redevelopment project. The funding provided in this subsection is not subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. The legislature intends to provide funds in the amount of $10,000,000 in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium to the Fort Lawton redevelopment project.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$100,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000TOTAL. . . .$500,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Housing Trust Fund (40000677)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $135,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $425,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or acquisition and rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this section with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.(a) $53,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $177,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for multifamily rental housing projects.(b) $50,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021. The department must consider prioritizing funding under this subsection for housing that serves individuals who are exiting residential habilitation centers or facilities.(c) $100,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing projects in accordance with the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in RCW 43.330.187.(d) $32,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $48,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022.(e)(i)(A) $17,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities where at least 50 percent of the preserved homes are and will remain occupied by low-income households. Funding provided under this subsection (1)(e)(i) may be used for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years and may be awarded only to eligible organizations as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(B) $2,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Bayside Housing project.(ii) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are mobile home park cooperatives or manufactured housing cooperatives, as those terms are defined in RCW 59.20.030, for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost for resident-owned manufactured housing community cooperatives in Washington.(f) $20,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire, acquire and renovate, or prepare real property for rapid conversion into permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, tiny homes, or indoor emergency shelters, with a primary focus on serving people with extremely low-incomes who are experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness, including families with children, unaccompanied youth and young people, older adults, and people with disabilities. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may approve funding only for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity for extremely low-income people and households. In awarding funding pursuant to this subsection (1)(f), the department shall prioritize the acquisition of multifamily housing units and housing projects that rapidly move people experiencing sheltered or unsheltered homelessness into housing, including, but not limited to, individuals living in unsanctioned encampments, the public rights-of-way, or other public spaces. Amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f) may not be used for operating or maintenance costs, supportive services, or debt service.(g) $50,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:(i) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain its long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided before contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.(ii) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and place them in Washington's housing trust fund portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.(iii) The funding provided under this subsection (g) is not subject to the 60-day application period in RCW 43.185A.150.(2) $3,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide preconstruction and technical assistance awards in accordance with RCW 43.185A.170. By January 1, 2027, the department must provide the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature with a progress report for entities receiving awards made under this subsection (2). The progress report must list which entities applied for, and were successful in securing, additional financing for the construction or preservation of affordable housing.(3) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair grants to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150. The funding may be provided to address nonreoccurring repair projects including repair of units or buildings, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements of affordable housing. Each repair grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization.(a) For purposes of this subsection (3), "affordable housing" means:(i) Permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030; and(ii) Multifamily affordable housing projects in the housing trust fund portfolio.(b) If the department receives application requests that exceed the appropriation level in this subsection (3), the department must prioritize projects under (a)(i) of this subsection (3).(4) $30,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided for the following list of projects:35th and Pacific Family Housing. . . .$2,050,000American Legion Veteran Housing and Resource Center. . . .$950,000Bridge Meadows Tacoma. . . .$5,050,000Christian Aid Center Shelter and Meal Complex. . . .$150,000Maple Court Permanent Supportive Housing. . . .$1,500,000Mary's Place Emergency Family Shelter. . . .$4,500,000Orchard Gardens. . . .$1,000,000YWCA North Central Washington. . . .$5,000,000(5) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in subsections (1) through (3) of this section within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$173,100,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$425,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$598,100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,392,400,000TOTAL. . . .$2,990,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000679)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants to eligible entities for predevelopment, design, and construction of projects that provide a public benefit through research, development, demonstration, or deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes.(2) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities that serve retail customers in the state, for-profit entities, research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.(3) To be eligible, a project must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's strengths in aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology, grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.(4) The department must invite stakeholders to participate in the design and implementation of grant programs funded under this section. The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structure and opportunities for applicant participation.(5) When soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;(b) Ensure that a public benefit results from the use of public funds through due diligence and monitoring of contracted projects, including ensuring compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and(c) Prioritize projects for funding that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding.(6)(a) The department must require project applicants to:(i) Disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project; and(ii) Identify by name any former or current state of Washington employees employed by the applicant or its governing body in the 24 months preceding the application submittal. The identification must include the person's separation date and job title or position held. If the department determines that a conflict of interest or other violation of chapter 42.52 RCW exists, the application must be disqualified from further consideration.(b) If, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.(7) The department must specify the requirements in subsections (5) and (6) of this section in funding contracts entered into by the department under this section.(8) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies. The department must collaborate with tribes in the design and development of this grant program.(9) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pacific Northwest national laboratory test bed. The appropriation in this subsection is contingent upon the receipt of federal funding in sufficient amounts to complete the project.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$50,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Solar and Energy Storage Grants (40000682)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided for grants to increase the deployment of distributed solar and battery energy storage systems to enhance grid resilience, provide backup power for critical needs, and reduce energy costs. Projects may be solar energy systems, battery energy storage, or solar paired with battery energy storage. Funding may also be used to enable electric utility demand response programs that include customer-sited solar and battery energy storage systems. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this section include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with communities.(2) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments and tribal entities, state and local governments, nonprofit organizations, and entities participating in federally funded solar programs administered by the department.(3)(a) For energy storage projects, the department must prioritize facilities that serve community members during power outages or provide critical infrastructure; and(b) Are grid-connected.(4) The department may:(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.(5) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.(6) $650,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore Senior Center Battery Storage project.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$35,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$140,000,000TOTAL. . . .$175,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Low-Income Home Rehabilitation Grant Program (40000684)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 Local and Community Projects (40000709)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Before receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:23rd & Cherry Renovation/Construction. . . .$1,236,0004th St NW Stormwater Improvement Project. . . .$773,000Accessibility Renovations for Community Homes. . . .$155,000Airway Heights Public Safety Campus. . . .$906,000Alliance Place. . . .$500,000Allyn Community Hub. . . .$72,000Anacortes Early Learning Center - Whitney Campus. . . .$41,000Aquatic Resource Mitigation Program. . . .$309,000Arlington Boys & Girls Club Fire Safety. . . .$200,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center. . . .$500,000Astria Toppenish Hospital Roof Replacement. . . .$567,000Auburn Ave Theater Rebuild. . . .$500,000Ballard Boys & Girls Club Security Fence & Lights. . . .$80,000Battle Ground Downtown Revitalization Design. . . .$515,000Bellevue Downtown Integration. . . .$250,000Bellevue Family YMCA and Housing. . . .$250,000Bellingham Central Library Interior Renovation. . . .$1,030,000Benton REA's Wildfire Resilience Project. . . .$1,000,000BGC Roof & HVAC Project. . . .$412,000Boat Yard Expansion Project. . . .$500,000Bremerton Masonic Temple Kitchen Renovation. . . .$247,000Camas Washougal Firefighters Safety Equipment. . . .$155,000Camp Thunderbird (Summit Lake Outdoor School) WaterSystem. . . .$525,000Capitol Theatre Capital Improvements. . . .$100,000Cashmere Branch Library ADA (Cashmere). . . .$33,000Center Senior Living Assisted Living Housing. . . .$395,000Cham Community Center. . . .$1,000,000Chelan Co. Emergency Management Facility. . . .$500,000Chelan Eagles. . . .$15,000City of Langley City Hall Solar Plus Storage. . . .$257,000City Of Sunnyside Downtown Gazebo Rebuild. . . .$257,000City of Tukwila HVAC Replacement. . . .$773,000Civic Center Renovation. . . .$1,000,000Clallam EOC. . . .$2,000,000Clark County Public Safety. . . .$1,500,000Cle Elum Boys & Girls Club Clubhouse. . . .$103,000Clymer Museum Elevator and ADA Upgrades. . . .$230,000Collins Grange #893. . . .$158,000Columbia Park East Boat Launch Replacement. . . .$750,000Community Center Entryway Improvements. . . .$103,000Community Center HVAC. . . .$206,000Community Library Building Project. . . .$400,000Community Roots Mill Plain Housing Project. . . .$1,000,000Coulee City Rodeo Grounds Improvements. . . .$464,000Culinary Upgrade to Battle Ground Public Schools. . . .$278,000Des Moines Marina Steps. . . .$1,030,000Distribution System Enhancements. . . .$625,000Dry Creek Grange. . . .$28,000Dundee Hill Community Homes. . . .$376,000East Adams Rural Healthcare: Central MonitoringSystem. . . .$232,000East Wenatchee City Hall. . . .$150,000Eastside Terrace Club Kitchen Renovation. . . .$74,000Eatonville Community Stadium & Lighting. . . .$193,000ED Safer Rooms. . . .$1,030,000Edmonds Food Bank. . . .$103,000Edwin Pratt Memorial Park. . . .$155,000El Centro de la Raza Mercado Project. . . .$1,030,000Emergency Power Generators Yakima County FireDistrict 12. . . .$294,000Enumclaw LED Lighting Project. . . .$389,000Everett Boys & Girls Club Kitchen Renovation Project. . . .$309,000Expanded Facility for South Kitsap Helpline. . . .$263,000FEMA Omak Floodplain Impact Pre-Design. . . .$515,000Ferndale Library and Campus EV and Solar Initiative. . . .$515,000Freedom Center. . . .$338,000Fruitland Grange #999. . . .$67,000God's Pantry Building. . . .$45,000Grand Cinema. . . .$618,000Grandview Police Center. . . .$550,000Grant County Animal Outreach Shelter Building. . . .$256,000Habitat for Humanity Site Acquisition. . . .$300,000Handicap Ramp and ADA Bathroom Additions. . . .$182,000Haynie Grange Facilities Modernization Project. . . .$170,000Healing Headquarters: A Campaign for Rebuilding Hope. . . .$250,000Heritage Heights Remodel Phase 4 Generator. . . .$258,000Historic Theatre Restoration. . . .$377,000Improvements to Low-Income Child Care Center. . . .$225,000Integrated Care Clinic. . . .$1,030,000Issaquah Bomb Cyclone Recovery. . . .$1,400,000Issaquah's Creeks to Peaks. . . .$103,000Jenkins Creek Recreational Trail. . . .$500,000Kettle River Grange Windows & Doors. . . .$67,000Key Center Water System Emergency Backup Power System. . . .$65,000King Co. Water Dist. 54 Treatment Modernization. . . .$1,030,000Kitsap Lake Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$321,000KVH Orthopedics and Surgical ServicesRemodel/Renovation. . . .$618,000Lake Chelan Community Center Gymnasium Project. . . .$475,000Lake Chelan Health Emergency Medical ServicesBuilding. . . .$1,097,000Lake City Community Mural Project. . . .$23,000Lake Gardner Regional Park Dock. . . .$77,000Lake Stevens Library. . . .$350,000Lummi Island Grange. . . .$77,000Lynnwood Public Facilities District ConventionCenter. . . .$1,000,000Maker & Innovation Lab. . . .$500,000Mason Affordable Housing Development. . . .$200,000Matlock Grange Hall Structural and SafetyImprovements. . . .$252,000Meeker Street Project. . . .$901,000Mercer Island New Water Supply Pipeline Project. . . .$500,000Mill Creek Boys & Girls Club. . . .$1,030,000MLK Jr. Community Center Renovation & Expansion. . . .$927,000Monroe Rotary Field Turf Replacement. . . .$360,000Mountlake Terrace Library Resiliency Upgrades. . . .$500,000Mt. Spokane - ADA Improvements & Asbestos Abatement. . . .$700,000Mt. View Pressure Zone Reservoir. . . .$515,000Multi-Purpose Building Pole Structure. . . .$206,000Municipal Services Facility Backup Power Generator. . . .$309,000New Community Recreation Center, Sauk-Suiattle Indian. . . .$515,000Nordic Cottages. . . .$412,000North Sound Public Safety Training Facility. . . .$250,000Northeast PDA Housing & Childcare. . . .$350,000Northern State Hospital Historic Cemetery Improve. . . .$175,000Northwest Kidney Centers Burien Pharmacy Relocation. . . .$79,000Old Swim Hole ADA Ramp. . . .$83,000Othello Rodeo Bleachers. . . .$258,000Outdoors for All Foundation. . . .$1,030,000Parkland Community Center. . . .$1,000,000Partners INW Resource Center. . . .$515,000Pea Patch Community Campus. . . .$3,000,000Peter Kirk Pool. . . .$515,000Pioneer Street Slope Stabilization and SlideAlleviation. . . .$1,545,000Port of Edmonds Mid-Marina Breakwater Repair. . . .$412,000Port of Skagit Agricultural Innovation Center. . . .$515,000Port Of Walla Walla - Intermodal Site Grading. . . .$773,000Port Orchard Downtown Re-Construction. . . .$1,000,000Preserving Washington's Oldest Locomotive. . . .$103,000Rainier Beach Action Coalition FIC P1. . . .$326,000Rasor Road Water Main. . . .$119,000Recreation Accessibility Improvements Kamiakin MS. . . .$515,000Redmond Asbestos Cement Pipe Replacement. . . .$1,000,000Regional Animal Shelter and Control Facility. . . .$1,000,000Rise Up Academy. . . .$1,000,000Road 80 Neighborhood Park. . . .$515,000Romance Hill Booster. . . .$170,000Roof Repair & Replacement Project. . . .$187,000Rural Access to Care & Social Connections. . . .$3,138,000Sail Sand Point. . . .$100,000SAM Building Automation System Replacement. . . .$280,000Sammamish Bomb Cyclone Recovery. . . .$330,000Save the Tokeland Hotel - Critical System Upgrades. . . .$261,000Scargo-Lewiston Permanent Supportive Housing. . . .$1,030,000Security and Visibility for EYFO. . . .$71,000Short-Term Lodging Facility - Cancer Patients. . . .$1,545,000Skamania County Courthouse Rehabilitation. . . .$515,000Ski Park Bridge. . . .$1,030,000Skokomish Grange #379 - Stem Wall Repair. . . .$103,000Skyline Health Critical Hospital Infrastructure. . . .$1,000,000Snohomish CD's Natural Resource Center. . . .$500,000South Beach Regional Fire Authority Generator. . . .$144,000Southwest Washington Dance Center FacilityImprovements. . . .$152,000Southwest Washington Fairgrounds 4-H Barn. . . .$767,000Spokane Valley Heritage Museum. . . .$206,000Stanwood Police Station. . . .$100,000Starfire Commons. . . .$2,550,000Steilacoom Tribal Cultural Center and Museum. . . .$309,000Sultan BGC Gymnasium Restroom Project. . . .$155,000Sultan Osprey Park Sports Field Expansion. . . .$798,000Suyematsu Farm Preservation. . . .$124,000Tacoma Urban Performing Arts Center. . . .$1,622,000Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project. . . .$3,500,000The Nyholm Windmill Relocation and Restoration. . . .$117,000The Pickford Theater on Grand. . . .$237,000The Willows. . . .$1,000,000Toppenish Police Station & City Services. . . .$515,000Trent Elementary Community Upgrades. . . .$225,000Tukwila Health & Wellness - Integrated Health. . . .$1,030,000Upper Kittitas County Community Recreation Center. . . .$155,000Upper Yakima River Spring Chinook Supplementation. . . .$305,000Wagner Performing Arts Center Restrooms. . . .$443,000Wahkiakum Community Learning Center. . . .$248,000Walla Walla County Fairgrounds Grandstand Renovation. . . .$25,000Walla Walla Interpretive Signage. . . .$27,000Waller Grange. . . .$84,000Washington Poison Center. . . .$79,000Wastewater Treatment Facility. . . .$1,000,000Water Reservoir Mixer. . . .$232,000Water Resilience and Efficiency Project. . . .$3,000,000Water System Improvements. . . .$150,000Waterfront Pedestrian Safety & Accessibility. . . .$1,500,000Wellness House Yakima. . . .$25,000West Wall of Key Peninsula Civic Center. . . .$103,000Western Skamania County Public Safety Complex. . . .$940,000Whitehawk Gratzer Parks Master Plan. . . .$77,000Wilkeson Infrastructure Improvement Projects. . . .$451,000Winter Hospitality Overflow Accessibility. . . .$515,000Woodcrest Neighborhood Utility Improvement Project. . . .$1,500,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$100,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Tribal Climate Adaptation Pass-through Grants (40000812)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $34,822,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to provide tribal assistance to mitigate and adapt to the effects of climate change, including, but not limited to, supporting relocation for Indian tribes located in areas of heightened risk due to anticipated sea level rise, flooding, or other disturbances caused by climate change. In developing the grant program, the department must collaborate with tribes to determine program parameters for award amounts, distribution, and benchmarks for success. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their application.(2) $15,178,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Ebright Creek Conservation Project. . . .$1,910,000Hoh Tribe Relocation. . . .$2,175,000Muckleshoot Hatchery Water Wells. . . .$2,600,000Muckleshoot Tribe Keta Creek Study. . . .$1,440,000Puyallup Tribe Hatcheries. . . .$3,253,000Quinault Indian Nation Allotment 100. . . .$1,800,000Quinault Indian Nation Longhouse. . . .$1,500,000Quinault Indian Nation Lower Village Clean Up. . . .$500,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$50,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Community Participatory Budgeting (40000829)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to develop and administer a participatory, community-driven, noncompetitive grant program to identify and fund either decarbonization or resiliency projects, or both, that benefit overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.(2)(a) $2,800,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110, to engage with at least two of the six overburdened communities identified by the department of health under section 222(124), chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(b) The department must develop a participatory, community-driven process for identifying projects that mitigate the disproportional impacts of climate change on overburdened communities. The process must allow for full community engagement.(3) $5,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants for projects identified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.(4) The legislature intends to appropriate a total of $32,000,000 over six years for the department to provide grant funds to projects identified through the participatory budgeting process in all six of the communities pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.(5) The department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027, including the work performed in subsections (2) and (3) of this section and summarizing its progress in granting funding through the participatory budgeting process.(6) The department may use up to three percent of amounts appropriated in this section for administrative expenses.Appropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .$8,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$26,620,000TOTAL. . . .$34,920,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWater Quality Projects (91000415)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:City of Centralia Nitrates Project. . . .$5,000,000City of Moses Lake Well 29 Treatment. . . .$810,000City of Roy Well Improvements. . . .$1,500,000Spokane County West Plains PFAS. . . .$7,500,000(2) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Quincy Industrial Wastewater Treatment Facility. . . .$5,000,000Summit Pacific Medical Center Culverts. . . .$800,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,800,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$14,810,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,610,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$82,440,000TOTAL. . . .$103,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGrants for Recovery Residences (91002685)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $10,200,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to acquire, construct, or rehabilitate recovery residences. The department must coordinate with the Washington alliance for quality recovery residences to create a competitive grant program for the following purposes:(a) Acquisition of homes that are currently operated or will be operated as chartered Oxford houses; and(b) New construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of recovery residences that are listed or that are planned to be listed on the recovery residences registry established pursuant to RCW 41.05.760.(2) $3,800,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for Three Rivers Recovery Housing.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,000,000TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEYouth Shelters and Housing (91002686)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided for the following list of projects:Griffin Campus Affordable Housing. . . .$2,500,000Joe Rantz House. . . .$436,000Oasis Youth Shelter. . . .$400,000ROOTS Young Adult Shelter. . . .$2,000,000Skyland Ranch. . . .$100,000Youthcare Constellation Center. . . .$3,400,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Dental Capacity Grants (92001952)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:CHAS Health. . . .$510,000Columbia Basin Health Association. . . .$1,030,000HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,030,000Peninsula Community Health Services. . . .$927,000Tri-Cities Community Health. . . .$88,000Yakima Neighborhood Health Services. . . .$1,898,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,483,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,932,000TOTAL. . . .$27,415,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 School-Based Health and Behavioral Health Clinics (92002230)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following terms and limitations: The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:CHC of Snohomish County (Granite Falls High School). . . .$563,000CHC of Snohomish County (Lynnwood High School). . . .$419,000Clarkston School District. . . .$777,000Mount Baker School District. . . .$670,000Neighborcare. . . .$175,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,604,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,416,000TOTAL. . . .$13,020,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCETVW Facilities (91002737)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCERevitalized Local and Community Projects (91002939)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following terms and limitations: The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Hands On Children's Museum. . . .$250,000Harlequin Theater Last-In Renovation. . . .$355,000Issaquah Opportunity Center. . . .$3,000,000Little Saigon Landmark. . . .$2,000,000Puyallup Food Bank Facilities. . . .$558,000Summit Pacific Medical Center EV Charging. . . .$116,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,279,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,279,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEOpen Doors Multicultural Village (92002217)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$12,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMedically Tailored Meals of Washington Coalition (92002197)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,625,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,625,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1036. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTEmergency Repairs (30000041)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.(2) For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management.(3) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the legislative fiscal committees as emergency projects are approved for funding and include what funded level was approved.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1037. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTConstruction Cost Forms and Calculations (40000007)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract for a review and update of existing formulas for state agency cost estimating.(2) The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1038. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTCapital Budget Cost Study (91000440)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to hire staff or contract with a consultant to provide the following: (a) A comprehensive review and assessment of the state's cost estimating processes for state-funded capital budget projects; (b) a comparative analysis of the state's capital public works project development, bidding, and budget structure with other relevant states' processes and structures; and (c) development of detailed recommendations for improving the accuracy of capital project cost estimates, including increasing staff capacity in professional cost estimation, improving oversight of agency project development and cost estimating, reducing costs by increasing competition in the capital project bidding process, and changes to the state's capital budget structure to enhance the competitiveness of the bidding process.(2) The office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, that contains the review and assessment, comparative analysis, and recommendations no later than January 1, 2026.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$150,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Building Systems Rehabilitation (30000791)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:Legislative Building HVAC Improvements. . . .$13,975,000Legislative Building Fire Systems Upgrade. . . .$3,150,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,125,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$876,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,001,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESFacility Professional Services Staffing (40000244)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,902,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,251,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$91,608,000TOTAL. . . .$140,761,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESModular Building - Critical Repairs and Upgrades (40000314)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,550,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,037,000TOTAL. . . .$51,887,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESGA - Building Demolition (40000317)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) It is the intent of the legislature that the general administration building site be considered as the future location of a new Washington state library-archives building for the office of the secretary of state.(2) $16,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for fencing to secure the site once the building has been demolished.(3) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,705,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,116,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$6,110,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$12,216,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,595,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,680,000TOTAL. . . .$20,196,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESO'Brien Building HVAC Repair (40000339)Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$2,543,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,543,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Building Centennial Skylights (40000340)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1056, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$804,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,329,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,133,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,575,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$563,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,271,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCherberg - O'Brien Tunnel Repair (40000341)Appropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,007,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,007,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESWest Campus - Hillside Stabilization (40000396)Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$847,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,022,000TOTAL. . . .$13,869,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Arc Flash Study (40000474)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Security (40000476)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:Capitol Campus Access Controls - Exterior Doors. . . .$4,928,000Executive Residence Physical Hardening. . . .$2,749,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,677,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,708,000TOTAL. . . .$38,385,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Preservation (40000485)Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,266,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,064,000TOTAL. . . .$6,330,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Historic & Cultural Asset Preservation (40000499)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Infrastructure (40000505)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the Capitol Way pedestrian bridge. Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,265,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,060,000TOTAL. . . .$6,325,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Clean Buildings (40000527)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for the following list of projects:Cherberg Fluorescent to LED Lighting Conversion. . . .$1,133,000Executive Residence Fluorescent to LED LightingConversion . . . .$271,000Insurance Building Fluorescent to LED LightingConversion. . . .$739,000Insurance Building HVAC Control Upgrade and DuctSealing. . . .$1,425,000Legislative Building Rotunda Chandelier and LEDRetrofit. . . .$1,456,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,599,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,425,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,024,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,096,000TOTAL. . . .$25,120,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Elevator Modernization (40000551)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for Old Capitol Building elevators No. 1 and 2.Appropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,170,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$407,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$955,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,532,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,128,000TOTAL. . . .$12,660,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Fire and Life Safety Systems (40000553)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for the Cherberg and Insurance buildings fire system upgrades.Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,340,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,360,000TOTAL. . . .$6,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESDeschutes Estuary Restoration (40000607)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for design, acquisition, and administrative costs associated with advancing the Deschutes estuary restoration project. When developing and finalizing the design of a new 5th avenue bridge as an element of the project, the department must prioritize a design that places primary emphasis on multimodal transportation functionality, including for vehicles, mass transit, pedestrians, and cyclists. The department may include other pedestrian experience enhancement elements and considerations in the design of the bridge, such as a channel oculus, plaza and seat steps, and extended landscape elements, only to the extent that such additional elements and considerations add no more than an incidental cost to the overall cost of the design and construction of the bridge.(2) The department must provide quarterly written reports, beginning in the first quarter of fiscal year 2026, to the capital budget committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate, that provide, at a minimum, the current status of the project design as of the date of the report, including the elements included within the design and the projected design and construction costs.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$456,205,000TOTAL. . . .$470,955,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESO'Brien Hazardous Material Abatement (40000615)Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,013,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,013,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCampus Energy System Replacement (91000449)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the design of an ambient temperature loop project to replace the heating and cooling system on the capitol campus. Upon completion of 90 percent of the project design, or as soon as is feasible, the department must provide the house capital budget and senate ways and means committees with updated construction estimates. The construction estimates must consider phasing the construction of the project over three to four fiscal biennia, provided that such phasing does not increase the estimated construction costs by more than 10 percent.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$86,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,237,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$364,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,885,000TOTAL. . . .$170,572,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Campus Modernization (92000020)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7033 of this act.(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.(4) If the department receives information, after value engineering has been performed, that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5) or (6) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:(a) Provide at least three options that do not include square footage reduction to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, before proceeding with a reduced cost option; and(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.(5) $135,043,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject.(6) $10,923,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $672,000 of the climate commitment actâstate reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the capitol lot (opportunity site six east), 15th avenue southwest, the John A. Cherberg parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, the John L. O'Brien parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, and Water street site work.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$672,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$66,585,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$67,257,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$49,501,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$146,795,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$263,553,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLSS - Dolliver Building Relocation (91000474)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for relocation costs, including design, permitting, and renovation costs, associated with moving Legislative Support Services to the Dolliver building.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$500,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$340,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$840,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1060. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTMoses Lake Readiness Center Renovation (40000194)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,658,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,102,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,760,000Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$576,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$349,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$925,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$782,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,467,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1061. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTMinor Works Program 2025-27 Biennium (40000345)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$8,444,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,441,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$9,885,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$39,540,000TOTAL. . . .$49,425,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1062. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTMinor Works Preservation 2025-27 Biennium (40000346)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$10,290,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,502,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$17,792,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$71,168,000TOTAL. . . .$88,960,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1063. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTCamp Murray Mechanical Security Barricade Repair (40000347)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,660,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,660,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1064. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTJoint Base Lewis-McChord Army Aviation Support Facility 1 HVAC (40000348)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$4,462,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,462,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1065. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTMoses Lake Readiness Center Stormwater Repairs (40000349)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$113,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$113,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$226,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,962,000TOTAL. . . .$2,188,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1066. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTYakima Readiness Center Repairs (40000350)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$223,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$193,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$416,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,507,000TOTAL. . . .$3,923,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1067. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTYakima Training Center 960 (MATES) HVAC System Replacement (40000351)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$5,741,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,741,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1068. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTYakima Training Center Military Vehicle Parking Repair (40000352)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$3,623,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,623,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1069. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTGeiger Field 402 Renovation (40000356)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$537,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$465,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,002,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,681,000TOTAL. . . .$9,683,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1070. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTJoint Base Lewis-McChord 9608 (UTES) Interior Modification (40000357)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$782,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,791,000TOTAL. . . .$7,573,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1071. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTLongview Readiness Center Renovation (40000359)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$399,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$295,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$694,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,025,000TOTAL. . . .$6,719,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1072. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTSedro Woolley Field Maintenance Shop Renovation (40000366)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$5,520,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,520,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1073. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTTumwater Field Maintenance Shop (40000367)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$3,900,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$480,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,380,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,700,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$41,897,000TOTAL. . . .$49,977,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1074. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTYakima Readiness Center Deep Energy Retrofit and Decarbonization (40000368)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$205,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$78,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$283,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,305,000TOTAL. . . .$2,588,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1075. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTYakima Training Center (MATES) Renovation (40000369)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$7,950,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1076. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTRedmond Readiness Center (500 and 501) Renovation (40000403)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$649,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$127,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$776,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,616,000TOTAL. . . .$14,392,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2025-27 Historic Cemetery Capital Grant Program (40000037)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$515,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,060,000TOTAL. . . .$2,575,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2025-27 Historic Theater Capital Grant Program (40000039)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$515,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,060,000TOTAL. . . .$2,575,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2025-27 Historic County Courthouse Rehabilitation Grant Program (40000040)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Chelan County Courthouse. . . .$312,000Douglas County Courthouse. . . .$610,000Grays Harbor County Courthouse. . . .$467,000Klickitat County Courthouse. . . .$618,000Lewis County Courthouse. . . .$150,000Okanogan County Courthouse. . . .$800,000Pend Oreille County Courthouse. . . .$125,000Spokane County Courthouse. . . .$500,000Wahkiakum County Courthouse. . . .$365,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,947,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,788,000TOTAL. . . .$19,735,000(End of part)PART 2HUMAN SERVICESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONOmnibus Minor Works (40000025)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,616,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,464,000TOTAL. . . .$13,080,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2002. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONShooting Range Indoor Ventilation System (40000041)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,910,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,910,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2003. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONSW Regional Training Facility (91000007)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESMinor Works Preservation Projects (30000035)Reappropriation:Accident AccountâState. . . .$2,095,000Medical Aid AccountâState. . . .$2,085,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,180,000Appropriation:Accident AccountâState. . . .$1,117,000Medical Aid AccountâState. . . .$228,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,345,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,448,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,380,000TOTAL. . . .$13,353,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESEmergency Generator and Building Switchgear Upgrades (40000019)Appropriation:Accident AccountâState. . . .$896,000Medical Aid AccountâState. . . .$896,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,792,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,792,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESTransmission Electron Microscope Workspace Construction (40000023)Appropriation:Accident AccountâState. . . .$1,275,000Medical Aid AccountâState. . . .$225,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide: Clean Buildings Act (40000960)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for facility condition assessments, utility assessments, and design and installation of utility-grade sub-meters for utilities found in buildings on the department's campuses, except for buildings at the Rainier school, for the purposes of compliance with RCW 19.27A.210.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$3,248,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,390,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$479,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$922,000TOTAL. . . .$11,039,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Water System: Assessment and Improvements (40001089)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,922,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$27,162,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$568,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$29,652,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESOlympic Heritage Behavioral Health â Facility Modernization (40001145)Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$13,376,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$855,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$14,231,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$324,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,055,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESOlympic Heritage Behavioral Health - Joint Commission Compliance (40001175)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,772,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,772,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide - Infrastructure: Emergency Generator Replacement (40001182)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,611,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,532,000TOTAL. . . .$45,143,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide-Campus: Pendant Alarm System Replacement (40001183)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:Â The appropriations are provided solely to install a pendant alarm system at Eastern State Hospital.Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$7,460,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$775,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,235,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,235,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital - Campus Shower Upgrades (40001186)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,775,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,437,000TOTAL. . . .$36,212,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital - Building 29: CMS Certification (40001291)Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$3,776,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$157,739,000TOTAL. . . .$161,515,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital - Building 28: CMS Certification (40001292)Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$225,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$104,386,000TOTAL. . . .$104,611,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital: New Forensic Hospital (91000067)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$581,956,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$282,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$83,044,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$947,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMedical Lake Waterfront Park Property Transfer (91000094)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely to facilitate the transfer of the property known as the Medical Lake Waterfront Park to the city of Medical Lake. The department of social and health services must transfer the property known as the Medical Lake Waterfront Park to the city of Medical Lake for use as a community park. By May 30, 2026, the department must reach a memorandum of understanding to transfer the property for these purposes at no cost to the city, except for the city's assumption of closing costs. The memorandum must be reported to the house of representatives capital budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office by June 30, 2026.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$50,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMaple Lane - Rapid BH Bed Capacity (92000046)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$18,932,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,107,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,938,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,967,000TOTAL. . . .$50,944,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHReroute Existing Water Supply Mains (40000041)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$623,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,786,000TOTAL. . . .$7,409,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2025-27 DWSRF Repayment Appropriation (40000084)Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$120,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHPlanning and Engineering Loan (40000085)Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHFederal Emerging Contaminants Grants (40000086)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$26,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$26,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2025-27 DWSRF State Match (40000088)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department shall require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development agency.Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL. . . .$125,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2025-27 Minor Works (91000035)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$640,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,560,000TOTAL. . . .$3,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSSVH - Skilled Nursing Facility Replacement (40000109)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purchase of land for construction of a skilled nursing facility in Spokane.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$144,956,000TOTAL. . . .$152,956,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSTHP - BLDG 10 Fire Alarm System Replacement (40000110)Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$1,416,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,416,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSH - Model Toxins - Pollution Remediation (40000112)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$40,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSTransitional Housing Program Roosevelt Barracks HVAC Replacement (40000114)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,576,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,576,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSTransitional Housing Program Betsy Ross Building HVAC Replacement (40000116)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,356,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,356,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSSE Washington Veterans Cemetery (40000119)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Secure Facility Improvements (40000546)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,653,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,901,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,354,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School HVAC Upgrades (40000584)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$3,449,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,996,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,445,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,167,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,864,000TOTAL. . . .$15,477,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES6yr Statewide Facilities Master Plan (40000587)Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESMinor Works Project (40000589)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,440,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,760,000TOTAL. . . .$37,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Upper Campus Main Boiler HVAC Replacement (40000593)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School Visitor Screening & Security Improvements (40000596)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Central Family Visiting Center (40000603)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,800,000TOTAL. . . .$12,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES2025-27 Additional Juvenile Rehabilitation Capacity (91000078)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to fund predesign and design for the improvement of the Mission Creek correctional center buildings, to be converted into an institution or facility used for juvenile rehabilitation, for operationalization in the 2027-2029 biennial budget cycle depending on design outcomes.(2) $500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for predesign and $2,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for design.(3) The predesign and design must include recommendations for living units, recreation, education, programming, medical, and behavioral health. Recommendations must be informed by best practice models and must include a justification, estimated time of construction, and cost for each.(4) The department shall conduct the predesign in fiscal year 2026 and submit an estimate of anticipated construction costs in the 2026 supplemental budget and a full plan that includes a construction schedule for consideration in the 2027-2029 biennial budget.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMCC: WSR Perimeter Wall Renovation (30000117)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$869,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,674,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$331,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,540,000TOTAL. . . .$39,414,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSSW IMU Recreation Yard Improvement (30001123)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,997,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,614,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,003,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,614,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,691,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,897,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,438,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$44,200,000TOTAL. . . .$87,226,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCCW: MSC Living Unit Bathroom Renovations (40000263)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$488,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,448,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,948,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWestside Prison Housing Unit HVAC (40000516)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$350,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$115,453,000TOTAL. . . .$119,303,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSSW: Security Electronics Renewal & Adaptation (40000523)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$800,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,526,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$89,929,000TOTAL. . . .$92,255,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSSW: Fire Alarm Systems Stabilization Project (40000524)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$750,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,400,000TOTAL. . . .$31,250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSSW: Perimeter Fence Detection Stabilization Project (40000525)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$750,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,445,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,780,000TOTAL. . . .$32,975,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCCW: Women's Elder Care Unit (40000527)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$223,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,862,000TOTAL. . . .$28,609,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMinor Works - Preservation Projects (40000769)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$39,000,000TOTAL. . . .$48,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMcNeil Island Parcel Analysis (40000781)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services and the department of fish and wildlife, to complete a study of McNeil Island, to include each parcel's ownership, restrictions, current use, and options for possible future uses, and to include estimated costs of decommissioning.(a) The report must include a 10-year history of expenditures by the state to support operations and programs on the island, and projected capital costs for the next 10 years.(b) The report must include a 10-year census count of residents and incarcerated individuals served by state programs on the island, and the number of full-time equivalent state employees staffing the operation of programs on the island.(c) The report must include an analysis of effects of relocating or decommissioning services currently offered on McNeil Island in support of the special commitment center.(2) The department must report findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2026.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$522,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$522,000(End of part)PART 3NATURAL RESOURCESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000621)Appropriation:Waste Tire Removal AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000622)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Freshwater Aquatic Invasive Plants Grant Program (40000623)Appropriation:Freshwater Aquatic Weeds AccountâState. . . .$1,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,200,000TOTAL. . . .$6,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Freshwater Algae Grant Program (40000624)Appropriation:Aquatic Algae Control AccountâState. . . .$468,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,872,000TOTAL. . . .$2,340,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000625)Appropriation:Water Pollution Control Revolving FundâFederal. . . .$214,000,000Water Pollution Control Revolving FundâState. . . .$400,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$614,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,456,000,000TOTAL. . . .$3,070,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 State Match â Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000626)Appropriation:Water Pollution Control Revolving FundâState. . . .$41,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$164,000,000TOTAL. . . .$205,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000627)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,450,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$17,800,000TOTAL. . . .$22,250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000628)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$16,250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$65,000,000TOTAL. . . .$81,250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Cleanup Settlement Account Projects (40000629)Appropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$650,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$650,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 ASARCO Everett Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000641)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$7,239,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,939,000TOTAL. . . .$22,178,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000642)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$40,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000643)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$68,781,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$275,124,000TOTAL. . . .$343,905,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Affordable Housing Cleanup Grant Program (40000644)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$9,654,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$38,616,000TOTAL. . . .$48,270,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Product Replacement Program (40000651)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000652)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the replacement of uncertified heating devices to reduce toxic air pollution. Whenever possible and most cost-effective, the agency and local air agency partners must select home heating devices that are certified by the United States environmental protection agency or that do not use natural gas to replace noncompliant devices.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,164,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,656,000TOTAL. . . .$20,820,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Clean Up Toxic Sites-Puget Sound Initiative (40000653)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,600,000TOTAL. . . .$15,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (40000658)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$31,477,000TOTAL. . . .$35,477,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Reducing Diesel Greenhouse Gases and Toxic Emissions (40000659)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$15,632,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$62,528,000TOTAL. . . .$78,160,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Floodplains by Design (40000660)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$59,629,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$238,516,000TOTAL. . . .$298,145,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000674)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,320,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,280,000TOTAL. . . .$16,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000681)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation provided for the Odessa groundwater replacement program is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Moneys provided pursuant to this section are intended to provide funding resources for the construction of projects within the Odessa groundwater replacement program that are in addition to any funding resources that may be generated through the contributions of individual producers or through the sale of municipal bonds by the east Columbia basin irrigation district;(2) Projects constructed with moneys provided pursuant to this section may be constructed by private contractors, by public entities, or by a combination of both;(3) Projects constructed with moneys provided pursuant to this section may be constructed in phases; and(4) The east Columbia basin irrigation district may use moneys provided pursuant to this section as local match in order to satisfy federal draw-down requirements.Appropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$31,435,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$36,435,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$144,325,000TOTAL. . . .$180,760,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000705)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$49,020,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$196,080,000TOTAL. . . .$245,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 PFAS Response (40000719)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the remedial investigation, action plan, and other cleanup activities associated with PFAS contaminated drinking water in the Lower Issaquah Valley.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Puget Sound Nutrient Reduction Grant Program (40000720)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Stormwater Community-Based Public-Private Partnerships (40000721)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,000,000TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000724)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $64,779,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Chehalis Basin board-approved projects:(a) To protect and restore aquatic species habitat, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties;(b) To reduce flood damage, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition project planning and development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; completion of environmental review and endangered species act consultation on the proposed flood protection facility; refinement and evaluation of the local action non-dam alternative; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, project sponsors, landowners, and other parties; and(c) That advance both the habitat restoration and the flood damage reduction goals of the Chehalis Basin strategy using a multibenefit approach, including: Community outreach and education; construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of federal, state, and local agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties.(2) $5,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the staffing and operations of the office of Chehalis Basin and Chehalis Basin board to oversee the development, implementation, and amendment of the Chehalis Basin strategy, and this is the maximum amount the board may expend for this purpose. Oversight operations include, but are not limited to: Providing financial accountability, project management, technical assistance of grants and contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section, and board meeting administration and facilitation.(3) Specific projects must be approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the Chehalis Basin board. The Chehalis Basin board has the discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section as needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation and if approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the board. However, $5,250,000 is the maximum amount the department may expend for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$70,029,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000TOTAL. . . .$350,029,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000725)Appropriation:Watershed Restoration and Enhancement BondAccountâState. . . .$40,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Remedial Action Grant Program (40000726)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: When entering into project contracts using funding appropriated in this section, the department must prioritize ongoing projects that have received funding from a previous capital budget appropriation for the remedial action grant program.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$82,425,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$329,700,000TOTAL. . . .$412,125,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYNorth Shore Levee (92000200)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3036, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,467,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,033,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$35,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3030. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2025-27 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (40000005)Appropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$3,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$48,000,000TOTAL. . . .$51,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3031. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2025-27 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (40000007)Appropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$3,750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000TOTAL. . . .$35,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3032. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLake Easton - Infrastructure Improvements (30000177)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$780,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,922,000TOTAL. . . .$4,702,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3033. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLocal Grant Authority (30000857)Appropriation:Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâPrivate/Local. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,410,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$15,410,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3034. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFederal Grant Authority (30000858)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,550,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,000,000TOTAL. . . .$5,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3035. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONParkland Acquisition (30000976)Appropriation:Parkland Acquisition AccountâState. . . .$2,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,802,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000TOTAL. . . .$15,302,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3036. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMount Spokane Road Improvements (30000982)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$938,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,104,000TOTAL. . . .$5,042,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3037. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONKlickitat Trail Suburbia Bridge Replacement (30001024)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,066,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,066,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3038. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONStatewide - ADA Compliance 2025-27 (40000107)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,000,000TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3039. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONOcean City Fish Barrier Removal (40000123)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,895,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,728,000TOTAL. . . .$8,623,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3040. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONSun Lakes - Dry Falls Visitor's Center Renovation (40000156)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,382,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,382,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3041. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONWallace Falls Parking Expansion (40000207)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,386,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,386,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3042. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONTwanoh State Park Shoreline Restoration (40000235)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$534,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,534,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,534,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3043. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMoran Campground Renovation (40000394)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,275,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,844,000TOTAL. . . .$8,119,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3044. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONTwin Harbors South Beach Area Admin and Maint Facility (40000460)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,366,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,213,000TOTAL. . . .$6,579,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3045. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Worden Beach Campground Electrical Upgrades (40000473)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,864,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,872,000TOTAL. . . .$4,736,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3046. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONPotlatch Day Use Comfort Station Removal (40000483)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$419,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$419,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3047. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONRasar Day Use Upgrades (40000489)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$324,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,140,000TOTAL. . . .$1,464,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3048. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMillersylvania Retreat Center Road Fish Barrier Removal (40000499)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$245,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$821,000TOTAL. . . .$1,066,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3049. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONRecreational Marine Sewage Disposal Program (40000510)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3050. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONCama Beach State Park Study (91000454)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section must be used solely for an engineering study of both the short and long-term protection of the cabins, boathouse, store, roadways, and other structures in the historic resort area of Cama Beach state park. The study must include:(a) A determination of the best methods and practices for protecting the resort area from geological processes including, but not limited to, erosion, sea level rise, high tides, wave action, winds, and soil movement, as well as the estimated cost, implementation timeline, and required permits necessary for each method or practice; and(b) A proposal for mitigation of any nearshore or estuarine habitat damage or loss resulting from upgrades, replacement, or repairs to the existing seawall for marine shoreline stabilization. The proposal must be developed in consultation with interested local tribes, the department of ecology, the department of natural resources, and the appropriate jurisdictions.(2) In the performance of the work set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the commission must comply with the requirements in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of the recommended methods and practices on cultural resources.(3) The agency must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2026, that includes the work performed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and a summary of recommendations made in the study and proposal for mitigation.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3051. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000548)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-1-2025, developed March 31, 2025.Appropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .$12,000,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .$54,000,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$54,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$120,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$480,000,000TOTAL. . . .$600,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3052. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000550)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.(2) $640,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.(3) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.33 percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$80,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$105,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$420,000,000TOTAL. . . .$525,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3053. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Riparian Grant Programs (40000552)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL. . . .$125,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3054. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000554)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-2-2025, developed March 31, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.33 percent of the total grant award.(3) The Puget Sound partnership may retain up to $250,000 of the funds appropriated in this section for program administration.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$10,100,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$50,560,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,660,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$242,640,000TOTAL. . . .$303,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3055. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Youth Athletics Facilities (40000556)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-3-2025, developed March 31, 2025. The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed four percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$18,645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$74,580,000TOTAL. . . .$93,225,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3056. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000560)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-4-2025, developed March 31, 2025. The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.33 percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâState. . . .$3,610,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$228,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,838,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,352,000TOTAL. . . .$19,190,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3057. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Community Forest Grant Program (40000562)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-5-2025, developed March 31, 2025. The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.33 percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,390,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,560,000TOTAL. . . .$46,950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3058. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000564)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-6-2025, developed March 31, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the total grant award.(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,795,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$400,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$27,195,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$108,780,000TOTAL. . . .$135,975,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3059. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000566)(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-7-2025, developed March 31, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the total grant award.(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$11,086,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,668,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$17,754,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$71,016,000TOTAL. . . .$88,770,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3060. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000568)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-8-2025, developed March 31, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,200,000TOTAL. . . .$29,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3061. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000570)Appropriation:NOVA Program AccountâState. . . .$12,174,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$48,696,000TOTAL. . . .$60,870,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3062. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Boating Facilities Program (40000572)Appropriation:Recreation Resources AccountâState. . . .$13,618,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,472,000TOTAL. . . .$68,090,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3063. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (40000574)Appropriation:Firearms Range AccountâState. . . .$645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,580,000TOTAL. . . .$3,225,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3064. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Recreational Trails Program (40000576)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3065. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000578)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3066. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000580)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$20,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3067. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Planning for Recreation Access (40000582)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $302,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for a staff position to provide technical assistance to grant applicants and recipients.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,302,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,208,000TOTAL. . . .$6,510,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3068. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000803)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$7,904,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$31,616,000TOTAL. . . .$39,520,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3069. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Regional Conservation Partnership Program Match (40000043)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,320,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,280,000TOTAL. . . .$31,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3070. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Farmland Protection and Land Access (40000044)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3071. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Water Resource Conservation Irrigation Efficiencies (40000045)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The state conservation commission shall give preference to projects prioritized locally or regionally through a planning process that includes public and partner input addressing water resource concerns.(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be available for other instream and out-of-stream uses and users. The proportion of saved water made available for other uses and users must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$28,000,000TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3072. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Natural Resources Investments for the Economy and Environment (40000046)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3073. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000047)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,000,000TOTAL. . . .$17,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3074. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Voluntary Stewardship Program Capital Cost-Share (40000048)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3075. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Voluntary Riparian Grant Program (40000049)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the state conservation commission to provide grants for riparian restoration projects with landowners.(2)(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the commission shall develop and implement the voluntary riparian grant program to fund protection and restoration of critical riparian management zones. The commission is responsible for developing the voluntary grant program criteria to achieve optimal restoration of functioning riparian ecosystems in priority critical riparian management zones.(b) In adopting program criteria, the commission shall:(i) Invite federally recognized tribes to be full participants;(ii) Coordinate with private landowners and other interested stakeholders;(iii) Coordinate with the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, conservation districts, and the department of agriculture; and(iv) Consider the best available, locally applicable science that is specific to each region of the state where the program criteria will be applied.(3) The commission shall prioritize critical riparian management zones at the watershed or subbasin scale where grant funding under the program would be primarily targeted. The prioritization must be informed by, consistent with, and aligned with one or more of the following: Watershed plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.82 RCW; the action agenda developed under RCW 90.71.260; regional recovery plans created under RCW 77.85.090; the habitat project lists developed pursuant to RCW 77.85.050; the prioritization process developed under RCW 77.95.160; and priority projects identified for salmon recovery through agency grant programs.(4) Conditions for awarding funding for projects under this program include, but are not limited to:(a) Consistency with the program criteria established under subsection (2) of this section;(b) Tiered incentive rates tied to improving functionality for riparian areas; and(c) Other requirements as determined by the commission.(5) The commission must distribute riparian grant program funding equitably throughout the state, consistent with received grant applications and benefit to salmon habitat. The legislature intends for funding to be primarily for projects located in salmon recovery regions, as defined in RCW 77.85.010, but funding may also be distributed to a project not located in a salmon recovery region upon a determination by the commission that the project will provide a unique benefit to salmon habitat.(6) Allowable expenses to a grantee receiving funds under this section include, but are not limited to, labor, equipment, fencing, mulch, seed, seedling trees, manual weed control, and yearly maintenance costs for up to 10 years.(7) Any native woody trees and shrubs planted with funding provided under this section must be maintained for a minimum of five years or as otherwise set by the commission for each grantee. Vegetation must be chosen to prevent invasive weed populations and ensure survival and successful establishment of plantings.(8) The commission shall determine appropriate recordkeeping and data collection procedures required for program implementation and shall establish a data management system that allows for coordination between the commission and other state agencies. Any data collected or shared under this section may be used only to assess the success of the riparian grant program in improving the functions of critical riparian habitat.(9) The commission shall develop and implement a framework that includes monitoring, adaptive management, and metrics in order to ensure consistency with the requirements of the riparian grant program. The monitoring and adaptive management framework may include, but is not limited to, consideration of:(a) Acres identified as eligible for restoration within a watershed;(b) Acres planned to be restored;(c) Acres actually planted and maintained;(d) Success in targeting and achieving aggregated project implementation resulting in an increase in linear miles restored;(e) Plan review criteria; and(f) Other similar factors as identified by the commission.(10) The commission may use up to two percent of any amounts appropriated in this section for targeted outreach activities that focus on critically identified geographic locations for listed salmon species.(11) The commission may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in this section for administrative expenses.(12) For the purposes of this section, "critical riparian management zone" means the area adjacent to freshwaters, wetlands, and marine waters that has been locally or regionally identified as an area where salmon recovery efforts would significantly benefit from enhanced protection or restoration.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3076. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Washington Shrubsteppe Restoration and Resiliency (40000050)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,000,000TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,673,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,679,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$216,000TOTAL. . . .$15,065,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEWallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,387,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,146,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,466,000TOTAL. . . .$46,499,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESoos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,726,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,095,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$29,821,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESpokane Hatchery Renovation (30000663)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$8,647,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,506,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,153,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$12,978,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,447,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,369,000TOTAL. . . .$56,947,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFENaselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,516,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,324,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,116,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,656,000TOTAL. . . .$63,612,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEBeaver Creek Hatchery - Renovation (30000680)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,037,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$794,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,705,000TOTAL. . . .$66,536,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESamish Hatchery - Friday Creek Intake & Fish Passage (30000843)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,964,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$150,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,464,000TOTAL. . . .$17,578,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEToutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,114,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,504,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,895,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,665,000TOTAL. . . .$19,178,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESRKW - Sol Duc Hatchery Modifications (40000147)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$976,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,316,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$410,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,702,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESol Duc Barrier and Boat Chute Replacement (40000168)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,137,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,137,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEBingham Creek Smolt & Adult Trap Site Repair & Upgrade (40000269)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,878,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,878,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFECulvert Court Case Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (40000271)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$817,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,594,000TOTAL. . . .$5,411,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFENemah Hatchery Weir Replacement (40000272)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$381,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,705,000TOTAL. . . .$2,086,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Preservation 25-27 (40000278)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Programmatic 25-27 (40000279)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE2025-27 Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (40000345)Appropriation:Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâState. . . .$600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,400,000TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE2025-27 Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (40000347)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$10,000,000General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$1,000,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâState. . . .$500,000Special Wildlife AccountâFederal. . . .$1,000,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local. . . .$1,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000TOTAL. . . .$67,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESBridge Remediation (40000442)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,260,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,260,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESSchool Seismic Safety Site Class Assessments (40000444)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,165,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,330,000TOTAL. . . .$3,495,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Forest Riparian Easement Program (40000450)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$4,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,600,000TOTAL. . . .$24,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Safe and Sustainable Recreation (40000459)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,958,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,832,000TOTAL. . . .$14,790,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (40000467)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,930,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,720,000TOTAL. . . .$14,650,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 State Forest Land Replacement - Encumbered Lands (40000561)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided for under subsection (2) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to disburse grants in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as follows: (a) $1,820,000 to Pacific county; (b) $1,820,000 to Wahkiakum county; and (c) $1,820,000 to Skamania county.(2) The department may retain up to $273,000 of the appropriation in this section for its administrative costs.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,460,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,840,000TOTAL. . . .$27,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Correction of Fish Passage Culverts (40000562)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$246,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$246,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESDerelict Structure Removal Program (40000583)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,399,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,399,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEnvironmental Mitigation Projects (40000586)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$997,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,988,000TOTAL. . . .$4,985,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESDerelict Vessel Removal Program (40000587)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Federal Land Acquisition Grants (40000600)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$72,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$288,000,000TOTAL. . . .$360,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (40000601)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$4,631,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,524,000TOTAL. . . .$23,155,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESTukes Work Center Storm Water Mitigation (40000618)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$383,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$383,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWebster Nursery Expansion (40000650)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,091,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,217,000TOTAL. . . .$34,308,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESColville Firefighter Housing Project (40000651)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$387,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$387,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESState Trust Land Replacement (40000656)Appropriation:Community and Technical College Forest ReserveAccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Land Bank AccountâState. . . .$30,000,000Natural Resources Real Property ReplacementAccountâState. . . .$100,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$131,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$131,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Trust Land Transfer Program (40000685)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. DNR-1-2025, developed March 31, 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,050,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$68,200,000TOTAL. . . .$85,250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESCarbon Sequestration Forests (40000707)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in subsection (2) of this section is provided solely for the department to acquire working forestlands to be managed for increased carbon sequestration and carbon storage through sustainable timber harvests consistent with RCW 79.10.310 and 79.10.320. Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, it is the intent of the legislature that these lands serve as harvestable replacement lands for structurally complex, carbon-dense forested state trust lands designated for conservation and for existing encumbered state forestlands. Once acquired, these replacement lands must be held in the land bank created in RCW 79.19.020. The replacement lands must be purchased before the transfer of any existing forested state trust lands pursuant to this section is fully executed. The department must transfer the appropriated amount into the land bank account in accordance with RCW 79.19.120.(2)(a) If the department acquires replacement lands pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it must use the replacement lands for the following purposes:(i) To serve as replacement forested state trust lands to replace structurally complex, carbon-dense forested state trust lands designated for permanent conservation consistent with the process set forth in subsection (3) of this section in counties located to the west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, which may include, but are not limited to, Clallam, Thurston, Whatcom, Snohomish, Jefferson, and Pierce counties; or(ii) To serve as replacement state forestlands to replace existing encumbered state forestlands in Clallam, Pacific, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties.(b) If the department acquires land pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it must allocate the value of any land acquired as follows:(i) Up to $13,400,000 for the purposes specified in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section; and(ii) Up to $20,100,000 for the purposes specified in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section.(c) The department must designate any lands acquired for the purposes specified in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section as state forest transfer lands.(3) The department may not designate for conservation any forested state trust lands pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section unless the department has received letters of support from the legislative authority of the counties in which the parcel of forestland proposed for conservation is located, and the board of natural resources has approved the boundaries of the parcel proposed for conservation. County concurrence and board approval pursuant to this process must be finalized before any forested state trust lands may be transferred out of trust status pursuant to this section.(4) If the department acquires any replacement lands pursuant to this section, the department must ensure that any replacement of structurally complex, carbon-dense forested state trust lands pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section be of equal value to the land designated for conservation.(5)(a) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislative authority of a county seeking to participate in the conservation opportunity described in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section may, for any state forestlands included within the lands designated for conservation, request that the department distribute to the county a portion of the current market value of the parcel as a one-time payment, subject to the requirement that the department must retain no less than $12,000 per acre to invest in replacement trust land. Upon such a request in writing, and subject to prior approval by the board, the department shall distribute to the county the requested portion of the market value as provided in RCW 79.64.110. Any amount distributed to a county as a one-time payment must be deducted from the amount available to purchase replacement trust land for that county.(b) The county treasurer shall distribute any revenues received pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section to each appropriate taxing district in which the conserved forested state trust lands are located in the same manner as the revenues would otherwise be distributed if the revenues were received from timber harvest or other revenue-generating activities on such lands.(6) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department may designate the structurally complex, carbon-dense forested state trust lands identified in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section as a natural area preserve or a natural resource conservation area notwithstanding the requirements of chapters 79.70 and 79.71 RCW.(7) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare commercial thinning timber sales for the purposes of restoring habitat, increasing carbon storage and sequestration, and facilitating access to more timber volume than is possible under normal operating funding.(8) The department may use up to $500,000 of the total appropriation in this section for its administrative costs pursuant to this section.(9) For the purposes of this section, "forested state trust lands" includes both "state forestlands" as defined in RCW 79.02.010 and forested "state lands" as defined in RCW 79.02.010.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$40,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Programmatic (91000332)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,476,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$17,904,000TOTAL. . . .$22,380,000(End of part)PART 4TRANSPORTATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLFire Training Academy (FTA) Maintenance Building Roof Replacement (40000091)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLFire Training Academy (FTA) Fuel Farm Refurbishment (40000092)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLCrime Laboratory South I-5 Corridor Consolidated Facility (40000072)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to design a facility on agency-owned property in Federal Way.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,354,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,260,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$246,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL. . . .$114,860,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION2025-27 CARB Loans (40000004)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section must be deposited in the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000(End of part)PART 5EDUCATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 K-12 Capital Programs Administration (40000142)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that the office of the superintendent of public instruction use a portion of the funding provided in this section for additional full-time positions for administration of capital grant programs in the 2025-27 fiscal biennium as follows: (1) Two additional, temporary positions related to an anticipated personnel transition during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium; and (2) one additional, ongoing position related to publication of data analysis.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$6,312,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$31,314,000TOTAL. . . .$37,626,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School Inventory & Condition Data Collection (40000143)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,360,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,440,000TOTAL. . . .$6,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Classroom Indoor Air Quality Projects (40000144)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to school districts with enrollments exceeding 3,000 students for indoor air quality assessment, installation, repair, or replacement of HVAC, air filtration enhancements, and general air quality improvements that improve student health and safety.(b) Grantees under this subsection (1) may: (i) Seek technical assistance from state-funded entities, such as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce, and the department of health; (ii) seek technical assistance from other entities, such as local health jurisdiction school safety programs and the smart buildings center's K-12 ventilation and indoor air quality resource team; and (iii) use funding awarded to seek guidance and technical assistance from commercial entities that have specialized knowledge of troubleshooting modern HVAC or smart building systems.(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and if applications for assessment grants under this subsection exceed available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must first prioritize grants for school districts: (i) Without existing HVAC systems; (ii) that have documented proof of indoor air quality performance that does not meet current state energy code; (iii) with outdated or underperforming HVAC systems; and (iv) that have the most limited financial capacity. Assessments funded under this subsection (1)(c) must include professional cost estimates for mitigating the indoor air quality deficiencies identified.(2)(a) $18,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts with enrollments that are less than or equal to 3,000 students for assessment, installation, repair, or replacement of HVAC, air filtration enhancements, and general air quality improvements that improve student health and safety.(b) Grantees under this subsection may: (i) Seek technical assistance from state funded entities, such as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce, and the department of health; (ii) seek technical assistance from other entities, such as local health jurisdiction school safety programs and the smart buildings center's K-12 ventilation and indoor air quality resource team; and (iii) use funding awarded to seek guidance and technical assistance from commercial entities that have specialized knowledge of troubleshooting modern HVAC or smart building systems.(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and if applications grants under this subsection exceed available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must first prioritize grants for school districts: (i) Without existing HVAC systems; (ii) that have documented proof of indoor air quality performance that does not meet current state energy code; (iii) with outdated or underperforming HVAC systems; and (iv) that have the most limited financial capacity.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must first allocate, to the maximum extent feasible, the funding appropriated under this section to grants prioritized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, as necessary to award grants using the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section, the superintendent of public instruction may also prioritize grants under this section that will improve compliance with the state's energy-related building standards in chapter 19.27A RCW by reducing energy use intensity.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$28,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$33,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$132,000,000TOTAL. . . .$165,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School District Health and Safety (40000146)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $11,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.(2) $27,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for health and safety and equal access grants.(a) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (i) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $600,000, per three-year period; (ii) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (iii) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements.(b) $7,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (i) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $150,000, per three-year period; (ii) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (iii) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.(3) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$38,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$154,000,000TOTAL. . . .$192,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000147)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $9,500,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation and $4,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for healthy kids and healthy schools grants for projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities.(b) The appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for grant funding to school districts for the purchase of equipment or to make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving: (i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and (ii) children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for grant funding under this subsection (1) that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements: (i) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded under this section; (ii) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (iii) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.(2) $1,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes, drinking water fixtures, and the purchase of water filters, including the labor costs of remediation design, installation, and construction.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$9,500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,500,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Career Preparation and Launch Grants (40000148)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide competitive grants to school districts to purchase and install career and technical education equipment that expands career-connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts, career connect Washington, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects through a competitive grant program to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education; and(b) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.(3) No single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Small District and STEC Schools Modernization Program (40000150)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $218,551,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159.(2) $3,644,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $6,000,000 or less. In awarding planning grants pursuant to this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must follow the list of planning grants submitted to the governor and the legislature for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, except that the office shall review the planning grant list for project redundancies and may not award planning grants for any project receiving design or construction funding appropriated in other sections of part 5 of this act.(3) $27,371,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by September 15, 2026. The list must include: (a) A description of the project; (b) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $6,000,000 per project; (c) estimated total project costs; and (d) local funding resources.(5) In addition to the standard list required in subsection (4) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall also submit additional lists for consideration by September 15, 2026, alongside their 2027-2029 capital budget request. These additional lists must include the following information: (a) A description of the projects; (b) the proposed state funding level; (c) estimated total project costs; and (d) local funding resources for:(i) Small school districts with 1,000 students or less, with a state funding level not to exceed $12,000,000 per project; and(ii) Small school districts with 3,000 students or less, with a state funding level not to exceed $12,000,000 per project.(6) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, school districts receiving a small district modernization grant under this section may not combine this grant funding either with a school construction assistance program grant or with other grants awarded under this section to fund a single project.(7) The appropriations in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP Capital Document No. OSPI-1-2025, developed March 31, 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$249,566,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$998,264,000TOTAL. . . .$1,247,830,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School Construction Assistance Program (40000153)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $557,132,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.(2) $4,796,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation and $1,500,000 of the common school construction accountâfederal appropriation in this section are provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years, and for the acquisition of art pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$4,796,000Common School Construction FundâFederal. . . .$1,500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$557,132,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$563,428,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,630,433,000TOTAL. . . .$3,193,861,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Skills Center Minor Works (40000158)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,435,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,740,000TOTAL. . . .$32,175,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool Seismic Safety Grant Program (40000159)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following school seismic safety project grants, as authorized under RCW 28A.525.320: (1) The Cape Flattery - Neah Bay K-12 Campus Relocation project; (2) the Taholah - K-12 School Relocation project; (3) the North Beach - Ocean Shores Vertical Evacuation Tower project; and (4) the North Beach - Pacific Beach Elementary Relocation project.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$151,451,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$605,804,000TOTAL. . . .$757,255,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONDistressed Schools (92001915)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $237,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Acme Elementary Modernization project.(2) $6,227,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Lawton Elementary School project.(3) $4,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the Maritime 253: South Puget Sound Maritime Skills Center.(4) $3,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the TOPS K-8 School project.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,964,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,964,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSCAPR Transitional Projects (91002551)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to work with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and stakeholders to revise the school construction assistance program and to holistically examine the state's programmatic support of K-12 school construction through the planning process required under section 5011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024. Pursuant to this section, the legislature intends that this revision and examination will be completed in a manner that will modify and improve efficiencies within, and access to, the school construction assistance program, while also identifying cost-saving measures for awarding state grants for the construction and modernization of common school facilities. The legislature further intends that this revision and planning process will result in a prioritized list of school construction projects that recognizes the substantial variation between district sizes and financial capacities, and which categorizes reasonably comparable applicants into distinct school district groupings to foster a fair and equitable prioritization of projects. However, the legislature also recognizes that some school district projects will be ready to proceed to construction during this planning and revision period. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide funding to the school district projects listed in this section in recognition of this transitional period.(2) School districts receiving grant funding pursuant to this section may combine this funding with a school construction assistance program grant and must use available local resources to contribute financially to the completion of the project.(3) $8,131,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pe Ell school district's K-12 school modernization project.(4) $6,000,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Bridgeport school district's Bridgeport elementary school modernization project.(5) $3,972,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation and $6,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the Inchelium school district's K-12 school modernization project.(6) Grant funding provided to each school district in this section is contingent upon each of the applicable districts named in this section relinquishing all unspent construction grant funding previously awarded under section 7063 of this act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$18,103,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$24,103,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,103,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5013. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLINDDormitory Modernization (40000054)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$350,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,350,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5014. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLINDMinor works projects 2025-27 (40000060)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,110,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,440,000TOTAL. . . .$10,550,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5015. FOR THE CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTHNorthrop Primary School Building Renovation (40000006)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$905,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$16,162,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,195,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,262,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5016. FOR THE CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH2025-27 Minor Works (40000012)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,125,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,500,000TOTAL. . . .$10,625,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5017. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Major Infrastructure (30000808)Reappropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$6,577,000Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$10,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,223,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$42,300,000TOTAL. . . .$109,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5018. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONChemical Sciences & Bagley Hall (40000146)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$124,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$129,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5019. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONClean Energy Transformation 25-27 (40000148)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$13,750,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,350,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$31,100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$31,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5020. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONInfrastructure Renewal 25-27 (40000159)Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$39,350,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,350,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5021. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Campus Power Repairs (Phase 3) (40000160)Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$3,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,900,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5022. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000161)Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$4,530,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,120,000TOTAL. . . .$22,650,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5023. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000163)Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$22,080,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$88,320,000TOTAL. . . .$110,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5024. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000164)Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$5,415,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,660,000TOTAL. . . .$27,075,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5025. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONPreventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000029)Appropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$25,825,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$103,300,000TOTAL. . . .$129,125,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5026. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONFIFA World Cup Improvements (92000014)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,700,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5027. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYPullman Sciences Building (40000284)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$50,000,000TOTAL. . . .$75,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5028. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYClean Building Standard Energy Efficiency Improvements (40000346)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$90,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5029. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYSpokane Team Health Education Building (40000361)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,191,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$37,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,809,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$44,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5030. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYVancouver Central Chiller Plant Upgrades (40000371)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5031. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYWenatchee Tree Fruit Research & Ext. Center Plant Growth Facility (40000376)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5032. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYPreventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000037)Appropriation:Washington State University Building AccountâState. . . .$10,115,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,575,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,460,000TOTAL. . . .$101,150,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5033. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000046)Appropriation:Washington State University Building AccountâState. . . .$45,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$180,000,000TOTAL. . . .$225,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5034. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYPreventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction (40000222)Appropriation:Eastern Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$2,217,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,868,000TOTAL. . . .$11,085,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5035. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYBuilding Decarbonization Efforts (40000223)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5036. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000031)Appropriation:Eastern Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$9,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$39,200,000TOTAL. . . .$49,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5037. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHumanities & Social Science Complex (40000081)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$5,139,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$45,825,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$50,964,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,158,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$46,841,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$108,963,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5038. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYAviation Degree Expansion (40000125)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,968,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,968,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5039. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYSecondary Geothermal Module (40000161)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for Central Washington University to design and construct the smaller-scale geothermal system that was presented to the governor and the legislature for consideration during the 2024 legislative session.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$11,830,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$634,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,464,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5040. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYEmergency Backup Power System (40000163)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,773,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,773,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5041. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYInstitutional Equipment Upgrades (40000166)Appropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5042. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYPreventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000023)Appropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$2,422,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,940,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,688,000TOTAL. . . .$14,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5043. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000028)Appropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$8,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5044. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEPreventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000140)Appropriation:The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$880,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,520,000TOTAL. . . .$4,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5045. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEDormitories Decarbonization (40000143)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,287,000TOTAL. . . .$20,287,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5046. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGELabs 1 & 2 Third Floor Renovation (40000145)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$298,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,881,000TOTAL. . . .$19,179,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5047. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000042)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$9,144,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,144,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,576,000TOTAL. . . .$75,720,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5048. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYAccess Control Security Upgrades (30000604)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,213,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$109,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$6,322,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,070,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,443,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,835,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5049. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHeating Conversion Project (40000005)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$8,911,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$41,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,089,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$180,000,000TOTAL. . . .$231,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5050. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYPreventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000012)Appropriation:Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$3,614,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,614,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,456,000TOTAL. . . .$21,684,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5051. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYAcademic Facilities Renewal - Phase I - V (40000017)Appropriation:Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$5,524,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,096,000TOTAL. . . .$27,620,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5052. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYPoulsbo Instructional Facility (40000018)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$45,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$26,151,000TOTAL. . . .$71,151,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5053. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation and Program (91000014)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,670,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$4,660,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$7,330,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,320,000TOTAL. . . .$36,650,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5054. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION2025-27 Creative Districts Capital Construction Projects (30000018)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$416,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,664,000TOTAL. . . .$2,080,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYPreservation - Minor Works 2025-27 (40000182)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,550,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,200,000TOTAL. . . .$17,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5056. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYPermanent Gallery Renovation (40000183)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,386,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,386,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5057. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYHeritage Capital Grants 2025-27 (40000184)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5058. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYMuseum Expansion and Modernization (40000064)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5059. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESOlympic Innovation and Technology Learning Center (40000103)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,836,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$31,054,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$716,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$33,606,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5060. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESLower Columbia: Center for Vocational and Transitional Studies (40000106)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$985,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$45,196,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,221,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$48,402,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5061. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESColumbia Basin: Performing Arts Building Replacement (40000108)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$54,548,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$54,548,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5062. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESWhatcom: Technology and Engineering Center (40000137)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$51,042,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$51,042,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5063. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Program Improvements (25-27) (40001051)Appropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$18,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$27,446,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$45,446,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$182,972,000TOTAL. . . .$228,418,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5064. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Preservation (25-27) (40001110)Appropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$31,325,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$33,325,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$133,300,000TOTAL. . . .$166,625,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5065. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESGrays Harbor College: Lake Swano Dam (40001150)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5066. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Roof Repairs (25-27) (40001190)Appropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$12,153,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$48,612,000TOTAL. . . .$60,765,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5067. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Site Repairs (25-27) (40001226)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,771,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,084,000TOTAL. . . .$23,855,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5068. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (25-27) (40001262)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$43,400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$173,600,000TOTAL. . . .$217,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5069. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Facility Repairs (25-27) (40001298)Appropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$9,690,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$37,864,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$47,554,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$190,216,000TOTAL. . . .$237,770,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5070. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESClean Buildings Compliance - Equipment Inventory and Reporting (40001333)Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,490,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,490,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5071. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESPreventive Facility Maintenance & Bldg System Repairs (40001334)Appropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$22,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$91,200,000TOTAL. . . .$114,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5072. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES2025-27 Career Preparation and Launch Grants (40001337)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to provide competitive grants to community and technical colleges to purchase and install equipment that expands career-connected learning opportunities.(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop common criteria for providing competitive grant funding and outcomes for specific projects.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000(End of part)PART 6REAPPROPRIATIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6001. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATELibrary-Archives Building (30000033)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No later than September 1, 2025, the secretary of state shall present to the governor, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee funding options and a proposed construction schedule for construction of the library-archives building using anticipated revenue from a certificate of participation and state building construction account bonds.Reappropriation:Washington State Library-Archives BuildingAccountâState. . . .$5,177,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,776,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,347,000TOTAL. . . .$13,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1004, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$419,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,045,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$1,476,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,940,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$108,349,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$113,289,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEconomic Opportunity Grants (30000873)Reappropriation:Rural Washington Loan FundâState. . . .$313,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,437,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPublic Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6001, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,478,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$71,742,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$77,220,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWeatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$222,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,492,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,714,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,786,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$23,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 413, Laws of 2019, as amended by section 7002 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$16,425,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$111,912,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$128,337,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6002, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$38,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,962,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$19,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEBehavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6012, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7004 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,979,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$70,704,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$82,683,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6005, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,999,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,418,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$13,417,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$159,333,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$172,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPublic Works Board (40000038)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$9,311,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$84,267,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$93,578,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)Reappropriation:Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState. . . .$17,971,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$629,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Building Communities Fund Program (40000043)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 1036, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.(2) The reappropriation in this section shall lapse on December 31, 2026.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,888,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,897,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$36,785,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesRevolving AccountâState. . . .$6,740,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$185,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$718,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,643,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,543,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$34,186,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7008 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,196,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$113,035,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$122,231,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6010, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7009 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,618,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$142,689,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$169,307,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWashington Broadband Program (40000117)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6002, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Statewide Broadband AccountâState. . . .$14,402,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,148,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$21,550,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,164,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,508,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$32,672,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Early Learning Facilities-School Districts Grant (40000140)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1057, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$744,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,975,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,719,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Public Works Assistance Account-Construction (40000141)Reappropriation:Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$124,074,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$124,926,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$249,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Building Communities Fund Grant Program (40000142)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 1059, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.(2) The reappropriation in this section shall lapse on December 31, 2027.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,698,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,448,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$30,146,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000143)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1060, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,336,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,664,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 CERB Capital Construction (40000144)Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$19,169,000Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$29,169,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,831,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Library Capital Improvement Program (LCIP) Grants (40000147)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7018, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,633,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,211,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,844,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Clean Energy V-Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7005, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$37,058,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,394,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$39,452,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,846,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$56,298,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Weatherization Plus Health (40000150)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7015, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$41,955,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$960,000Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$733,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$43,648,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,467,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$67,115,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 PWB Broadband Infrastructure (40000152)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Coronavirus Capital Projects AccountâFederal. . . .$27,853,000Statewide Broadband AccountâState. . . .$13,762,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$41,615,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,385,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000153)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7006, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$36,121,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$17,603,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,366,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$16,801,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$80,891,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$206,800,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$287,691,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000219)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6014, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$10,901,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$46,375,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$57,276,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$62,961,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,237,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Investment from Operating (40000220)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$2,028,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,413,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$47,441,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$663,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,230,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$22,893,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$97,242,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,135,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1001, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7010 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$58,682,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$111,885,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$170,567,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEconomic Opportunity Grants Authority (40000246)Reappropriation:Rural Washington Loan FundâState. . . .$903,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$903,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000260)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7009, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Apple Health and Homes AccountâState. . . .$51,017,000Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$33,092,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$2,917,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,265,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$95,291,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,809,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$296,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7011 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$18,805,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,522,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$53,327,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPorts Infrastructure (40000278)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,179,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,867,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,046,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Building Communities Fund Grant Program (40000279)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1003, chapter 474, Laws of 2023, as amended by section 7014 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$20,193,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,386,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$30,579,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Building for the Arts (40000280)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1004, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,553,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,447,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 CERB Capital Construction (40000281)Reappropriation:Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDig-Once Pilot Project and Enhanced Program Development (40000282)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Energy Retrofits and Solar Power for Public Buildings (40000283)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7013 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$49,077,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,923,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$51,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHome Electrification and Appliance Rebates Program (HEAR) (40000284)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$56,200,000General FundâFederal. . . .$82,945,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$139,145,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,855,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$163,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Early Learning Facilities â School Districts (40000285)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$3,025,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,381,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,406,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Library Capital Improvement Program (40000286)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,138,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,813,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,951,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Public Works Assistance Account (PWAA) (40000289)Reappropriation:Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$360,204,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,796,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Weatherization Plus Health (40000291)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$16,492,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,323,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,815,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,185,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000292)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,726,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,274,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000294)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$48,164,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,836,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7016 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$85,137,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$351,043,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$8,500,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$444,680,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$82,859,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$527,539,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure (CHIP) (40000296)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$53,481,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,519,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCETransit Oriented Housing Development Partnership Match (40000298)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$25,000,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$50,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$1,250,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$256,417,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$257,667,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,059,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$293,726,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Early Learning Facilities Fund Grant Program (40000300)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7017 of this act.Reappropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$72,557,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesRevolving AccountâState. . . .$6,720,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$79,277,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,111,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$90,388,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7018 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$166,569,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,474,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$233,043,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCETribal Climate Adaptation Pass-through Grants (40000421)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$43,076,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,924,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDOE Hydrogen Hub -State Match (40000561)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$10,115,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,885,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHome Efficiency Rebates Program (40000564)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$81,734,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,466,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$83,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Defense Community Compatibility Projects (40000572)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,720,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$12,510,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,230,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,440,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$37,670,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECrisis Stabilization Facility-Trueblood Phase 3 (40000601)Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$4,997,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECommunities of Concern (40000603)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,731,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$636,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,367,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGreen Jobs and Infrastructure Grants (40000604)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$24,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$918,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy Community Grants (40000606)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1017, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$50,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025 Local and Community Projects (40000614)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7019 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$7,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,875,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$5,122,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$53,214,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$62,218,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,347,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$68,565,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community Solar Resilience Hubs (40000620)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1019, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$31,212,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,788,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community EV Charging (40000622)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7020 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$77,502,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,498,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$105,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnergy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Program (40000629)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1022, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan CapitalizationAccountâState. . . .$1,869,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,869,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Coronavirus Capital Projects AccountâFederal. . . .$12,310,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$2,275,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$14,585,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,865,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,566,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,964,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,530,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELibrary Capital Improvement Program (91001239)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,263,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,575,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,838,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCERapid Response Community Preservation Pilot Program (91001278)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1018, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$908,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,092,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEContinuing Affordability in Current Housing (91001659)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,286,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,714,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1043, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,698,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,527,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Early Learning Facilities (91001677)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$13,618,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$9,065,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$22,702,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,798,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$62,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEarly Learning Renovation Grants (91001681)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7014, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,440,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$60,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Youth Shelters and Housing (91001682)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1024, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7023 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,062,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,560,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,622,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGrants for Affordable Housing Development Connections (91001685)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1032, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$7,864,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,217,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,081,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,219,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWork, Education, Health Monitoring Projects (91001686)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7013, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$778,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$48,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$826,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEInfrastructure Projects (91001687)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7024 of this act.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$19,957,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$37,491,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,577,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$59,025,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$78,275,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$137,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECapital Grant Program Equity (91001688)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6067, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,860,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,140,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEFood Banks (91001690)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6016, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,033,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,553,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,586,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHomeless Youth Facilities (91001991)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1048, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$8,666,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,229,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,895,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Permanent Supportive Housing Remediation (91002160)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$27,156,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$6,975,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,131,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,539,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,670,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Rural Rehabilitation Grant Program (91002195)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,905,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$95,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHealth Care Infrastructure (91002197)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1018, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$28,716,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,202,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,918,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPublic Utilities Relocation (91002418)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$212,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$88,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHB 2131 - Thermal Energy Networks (91002447)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMultifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (91002449)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1028, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$54,981,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$55,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Building Performance Grants (91002451)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$45,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHarborview (91002471)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1030, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClimate Resilience & Environmental Equity Campus (91002476)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$243,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEThe Arc Legacy Center (91002637)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHard-to-Decarbonize Sector & Economic Development Grants (91002641)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$47,394,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,406,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7008, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,930,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,682,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,612,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Coronavirus Capital Projects AccountâFederal. . . .$108,788,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$122,024,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,655,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$240,467,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$63,352,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$303,819,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Community Relief (92000957)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,370,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,380,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEReimann Roads, Telecomm and Utility Relocation (Pasco) (92001004)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1088, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,790,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,710,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEIncreasing Housing Inventory (92001122)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1090, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Dental Capacity Grants (92001175)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1049, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,457,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,344,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,801,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$25,689,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,613,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$48,302,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPort of Everett (92001364)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1042, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$4,948,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPublic Facility Improvement Fund (92001367)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7027 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$163,000Youth Athletic Facility Nonappropriated AccountâState. . . .$16,187,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,350,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,872,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,222,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Dental Capacity Grants (92001393)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1036, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,764,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,768,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$22,532,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELarge Scale Solar Innovation Projects (92001669)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1040, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$38,917,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$83,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnergy Northwest (92001720)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGeothermal Energy Resources (92001925)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1038, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$542,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$542,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEAnaerobic Digester Development (92001947)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7028 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$11,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$44,000,000TOTAL. . . .$55,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEBroadband Infrastructure Federal Match Projects (92001948)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7029 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$114,034,000Federal Broadband AccountâFederal. . . .$1,227,743,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,341,777,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,341,777,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6108. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTCowlitz River Dredging (20082856)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$700,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESElevator Modernization (30000786)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7031 of this act.Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,605,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$167,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$704,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,476,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,608,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,084,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCampus Physical Security & Safety Improvements (30000812)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6023, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$55,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$149,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$51,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$255,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,021,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,276,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES21-31 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation (40000180)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$212,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$675,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$887,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Security & Safety Enhancements (40000226)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1039, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,316,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,472,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,788,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCampus - Critical Fire System Upgrades (40000245)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1047, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,006,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$759,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,765,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESB&G Maintenance Facility - Rebuild (40000247)Reappropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$4,919,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$663,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,582,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESNRB - Replace Piping for Wet Fire Suppression (40000249)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$246,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES2023-25 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation (40000250)Reappropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,473,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$668,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,141,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES2023-25 Statewide Minor Works - Programmatic (40000305)Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$472,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$9,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$481,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$155,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$636,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESWashington Building (40000331)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1042, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$198,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$103,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$301,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESOld Cap - Roof Replacement (40000338)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,224,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,177,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$6,401,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$349,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6120. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Emergency Generator Replacement (40000393)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$812,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$42,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$854,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6121. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Building Cleaning (40000400)Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,879,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$91,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,970,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6122. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESExecutive Guard Post One (40000448)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$727,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$740,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES2023-25 Capitol Campus Security (91000450)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1060, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$281,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,025,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,306,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,069,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,375,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESTemple of Justice HVAC, Lighting & Water Systems (92000040)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1045, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,456,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$469,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,925,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,582,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$33,507,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCal Anderson Memorial (92000058)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$74,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$75,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6126. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLFTA Emergency Power Generator Replacement (30000171)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$101,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$774,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$875,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6127. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLVancouver Crime Lab - New Roof (30000240)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,102,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$492,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,594,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6128. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLCrime Laboratory I-5 North Corridor Consolidated Facility (30000290)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 4001, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,184,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$349,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,533,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6129. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLFire Training Academy Roof Replacement (40000077)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$283,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$289,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$572,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6130. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLSeattle Crime Laboratory Generator Replacement (40000081)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$450,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6131. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLVancouver Crime Lab Chiller Replacement (40000097)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$988,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$988,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6132. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONNorthwest Region Training Facility Renovation and Upgrades (40000042)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,082,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6133. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONCafeteria Water Damage Repairs (40000043)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESModernize Lab and Training Facility (30000043)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Accident AccountâState. . . .$1,248,000Medical Aid AccountâState. . . .$210,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,458,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$51,745,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$53,203,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESAir Handler Retrofit and Cooling Tower Replacement (30000059)Reappropriation:Accident AccountâState. . . .$45,000Medical Aid AccountâState. . . .$45,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$90,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,648,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,738,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESInterior Lighting and Controls Upgrade (40000014)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,925,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,925,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESSolar Panel Installation - Lab & Training Facility (40000015)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,637,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,097,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,734,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6138. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTJoint Force Readiness Center: Replacement (30000591)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$42,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,869,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$53,869,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$431,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$54,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6139. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTKing County Area Readiness Center (30000592)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1116, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,566,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,489,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,055,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6140. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTTri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1047, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7035 of this act.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$928,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$340,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,268,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,672,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$17,940,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6141. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTSnohomish Readiness Center (30000930)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7023, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$7,756,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,456,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$11,212,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,306,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,518,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6142. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTAnacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1100, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$367,000Military Department Capital AccountâState. . . .$36,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$152,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$555,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,696,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,251,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6143. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTStryker Canopies Kent Site (40000073)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,167,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,833,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6144. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTStryker Canopies Bremerton Site (40000077)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$338,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,162,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6145. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTField Maintenance Shop Addition-Sedro Woolley FMS (40000104)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$837,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,413,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6146. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTCamp Murray Bldg 65 Barracks Replacement (40000191)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,195,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$805,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6147. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTCamp Murray Bldg 34 Renovation (40000192)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$5,274,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,473,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$9,747,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$252,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,999,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6148. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTJBLM Non-Organizational (POV) Parking Expansion (40000196)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,318,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$577,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,895,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6149. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTMinor Works Program 2023-25 Biennium (40000274)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$6,851,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,972,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,823,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,662,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,485,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6150. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTWA Army National Guard Vehicle Storage Buildings (40000290)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$11,031,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$750,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$11,781,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$419,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6151. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTYakima Training Center 951 Renovation (40000297)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,864,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$196,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,060,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6152. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTCentral Building Automation System for National Guard Buildings (40000298)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,227,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,227,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6153. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTSpokane Readiness Center IT Infrastructure Upgrade (40000300)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$559,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$297,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$856,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$994,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,850,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6154. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTMinor Works Preservation 2023-25 Biennium (40000301)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,914,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,469,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,383,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,067,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6155. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTWenatchee Army National Guard Aviation Support Facility (40000305)Reappropriation:Military Department Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6156. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTKent Readiness Center Water Damage Repairs (40000311)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,206,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$402,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,608,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$668,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,276,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6157. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESFircrest School-Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$273,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,927,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6158. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$255,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,124,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,379,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6159. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may allocate the reappropriation within this section to the completion of minor works preservation projects submitted in the department's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request in order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$80,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,605,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$26,685,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6160. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESLakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,773,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,932,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,705,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6161. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESRainier School-Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$221,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,409,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,630,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6162. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESFircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7023, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$583,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,710,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,293,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6163. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,456,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,394,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,850,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6164. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,696,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,804,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$30,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6165. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESDOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$839,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,116,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,955,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6166. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESDOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Main Dock: Float & Dolphin Replacement (30003234)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$183,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6167. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESState Psychiatric Hospitals: Compliance with Federal Requirements (30003569)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$67,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,933,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6168. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2016, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$69,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$456,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$525,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6169. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESSpecial Commitment Center-Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2023, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$10,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,946,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,956,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$544,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6170. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$55,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$945,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6171. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Elevator Modernization (30003582)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$39,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,061,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6172. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESFircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$44,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$449,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$493,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6173. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,929,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,955,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6174. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital: Emergency Electrical System Upgrades (30003616)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$577,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,478,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,055,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6175. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESBehavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2033, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$124,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,776,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,900,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6176. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may allocate the reappropriation within this section to the completion of minor works preservation projects submitted in the department's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request in order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$53,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,997,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6177. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Doors Replacement (40000392)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,681,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,419,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6178. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Eastlake & Westlake: Fire & Smoke Controls (40000404)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,553,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$497,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6179. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Westlake: Fire Stops (40000405)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$891,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,239,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,130,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6180. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESChild Study and Treatment Center-Ketron: LSA Expansion (40000411)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,731,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$269,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6181. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-EL & WL: HVAC Compliance & Monitoring (40000492)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$504,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,411,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,915,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6182. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Activity Therapy Building: HVAC Upgrades (40000493)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,366,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$349,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,715,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6183. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESChild Study & Treatment Center-Gymnasium: Floor Replacement (40000555)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,909,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,925,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6184. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESChild Study & Treatment Center-Emergency Power: Replacement (40000559)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6185. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMaple Lane-Columbia Cottage: Behavioral Health Expansion (40000567)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$88,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,862,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6186. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000569)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may allocate the reappropriation within this section to the completion of minor works program projects submitted in the department's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request in order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed, subject to the provisions of section 2046, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$426,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,329,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,755,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6187. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000571)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may allocate the reappropriations within this section to the completion of minor works preservation projects submitted in the department's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request in order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed.Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$524,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,314,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,838,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,752,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,590,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6188. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESLakeland Village-Cottages: Roofing Replacement (40000572)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$590,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$710,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6189. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESRainier School-Cottages: Roofing Replacement (40000573)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,460,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$340,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6190. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide-Behavioral Health: Patient Safety Improvements 2021-23 (40000578)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,134,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,866,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6191. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Building 29: Roofing Replacement (40000589)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,060,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,975,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,035,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6192. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Multiple Bldgs: Sprinkler Head Replacement (40000594)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,246,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$148,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,394,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6193. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Commissary: Building Repairs (40000606)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$810,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,350,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,160,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$290,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6194. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Building 27: Roofing Replacement (40000888)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$437,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$763,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6195. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESFircrest School-ICF Cottages: HVAC & Water Heater Improvements (40000946)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,410,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$370,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,780,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6196. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-Building 29: CMS Certification (40000948)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$30,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$190,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$220,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6197. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works Programmatic 2023-25 (40000953)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may allocate the reappropriations within this section to the completion of minor works program projects submitted in the department's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request in order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed.Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$1,623,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,434,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,057,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$938,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,995,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6198. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works Preservation 2023-25 (40000954)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may allocate the reappropriations within this section to the completion of minor works preservation projects submitted in the department's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request in order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed.Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$2,658,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,480,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$9,138,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,010,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,148,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6199. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESDOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades 2023-25 (40000955)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,451,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,451,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6200. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide: Communications Systems Condition Assessment (40000959)Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$5,271,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,021,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,292,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESYakima Valley School-Main Building: Exterior Window Replacement (40000962)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$5,204,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$126,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,330,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMedical Lake-Campus: Electrical Feeder Replacement (40000964)Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$49,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,271,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,320,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$757,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,077,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESSpecial Commitment Center-Campus: Fire Alarm Replacement (40000965)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,065,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,115,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-AT Bldg: Electrical & Emerg. Generator (40000969)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,803,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$402,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,205,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Eastlake: Nursing Station Improvements (40000970)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$879,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$861,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,740,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESRainier School-Laundry: Commercial Washing Machines Replacement (40000971)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,855,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,855,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESDiversion and Recovery Community Capacity (40001140)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2027, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$149,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$351,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital-East Campus: Well Replacement (40001149)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,540,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,540,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESESH and WSH-All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$782,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,887,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,669,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESDSHS & DCYF Fire Alarms (91000066)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2036, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,470,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,349,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,819,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital Elevators (91000068)Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$620,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,080,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital & CSTC Power Upgrades (91000070)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,278,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESBH: State Operated Community Civil 16-Bed Capacity (91000075)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$275,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,915,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,190,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESBH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000077)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2054, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,747,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$63,007,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$78,754,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESRainier School-PATs E,C Cottage Cooling Upgrades (91000078)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$28,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,972,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWestern State Hospital Treatment & Recovery Center (91000080)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,954,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,646,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESChild Study & Treatment Center - Youth Housing (91000084)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,104,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$307,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,411,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESBH Rapid Community Capacity (91000090)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2030, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESResidential Habilitation Center Land Management (92000044)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2060, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$150,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHDrinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)Reappropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$2,377,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,623,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHPublic Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$53,872,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,755,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$58,627,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHDrinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$292,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,708,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)Reappropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederal. . . .$2,592,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,408,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2068, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$342,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,158,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHSmall & Disadvantaged Communities DW (40000031)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2020, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$19,261,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,545,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,806,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHReplace Air Handling Unit (AHU) in A/Q-wings (40000034)Reappropriation:Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$213,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,681,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,894,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2021-23 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000049)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2023, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederal. . . .$103,755,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,145,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$112,900,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHLakewood Water District PFAS Treatment Facility (40000052)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$167,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,402,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,569,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHNew LED lighting and controls in existing laboratory spaces (40000054)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$28,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$337,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$365,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHImprove Critical Water Infrastructure (40000058)Reappropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$9,791,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$40,209,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHIncrease DWSRF Preconstruction Loans (40000059)Reappropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHNew Deionized Water (DI) Piping at Public Health Laboratories (40000063)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$686,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$486,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,172,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHDrinking Water System Rehabilitations and Consolidations (40000065)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,322,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,322,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2023-25 DWSRF Construction Loan Program (40000067)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2037, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederal. . . .$131,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$131,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHEmergency Generator for Environmental Laboratory Wing (40000072)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,066,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$153,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,219,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHLower Yakima Valley Groundwater Management Area Water Supply (92000208)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$270,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$580,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$850,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHHannah Heights PFAS Contaminated Well and Water Supply (92000210)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,827,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$152,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,979,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSMinor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,407,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,991,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,398,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$745,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$131,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$369,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSNorthwest Washington State Veterans Cemetery Feasibility Study (40000035)Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$44,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$156,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSVC - Raise, Realign, and Clean Markers (40000070)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$598,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$652,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSH Master Plan (40000075)Reappropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .$82,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$118,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSVC - Burial and Columbarium Expansion Grant (40000092)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$4,839,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$79,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,918,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$491,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,409,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWVH - Fire Alarm Replacement - 240 Building (40000099)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,235,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,280,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSDVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$24,515,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,055,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,570,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,639,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,209,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSHB 1390 -District Energy Systems (91000017)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSExtended Care Facilities Construction Grants (92000001)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$8,020,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,113,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,133,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSH - Roosevelt Building Restroom Renovation (92000002)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$686,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,114,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2078, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$264,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,336,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2013, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,959,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,803,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$31,762,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School - Baker North Remodel (40000534)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,056,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,568,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,624,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Emergency Generator & Fuel Storage Tank (40000547)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2050, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$530,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,630,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill Spruce Living Unit Renovation Minimum Security (40000552)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,071,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$199,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,270,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESStatewide Minor Works (40000557)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,109,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$850,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,959,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Academic School Walkway Roofing & Lighting (40000586)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$498,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWashington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$856,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,729,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,585,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCC: Paint & Repair 300,000 Gallon Water Storage Tank (30000697)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2053, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$600,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,677,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,277,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,229,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,506,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMCC: TRU Roof Programs and Recreation Building (30000738)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,489,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,507,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,996,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSSCCC Roof Replacement (30001128)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,749,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$445,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,194,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSECWR: Foundation and Siding (40000067)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,559,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$402,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,961,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSSW: Electric Car Chargers (40000178)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMCC: WSR Clinic Roof Replacement (40000180)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,104,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,229,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,333,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMinor Works - Preservation Projects (40000254)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,590,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,733,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,323,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$625,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,207,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,832,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$415,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,247,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSCBCC: Fire Pump Replacement (40000324)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,152,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$259,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,411,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCC: Support Buildings Roof Replacement (40000380)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$169,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,831,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSCRCC Sage Unit Move to AHCC (40000414)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,353,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$149,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,502,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSAHCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000415)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,122,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$77,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,199,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSCRCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000416)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,134,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$71,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,205,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMcNeil Island Passenger Ferry Replacement (40000418)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$764,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$136,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$900,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMcNeil Island Transport Barge Replacement (40000419)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$722,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$178,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$900,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMinor Works Preservation Projects (40000427)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,222,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,770,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,992,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWSP: IMU South Fire Protection & Smoke Dampers (40000526)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,622,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,622,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCC: Medical Intake Modular Building (40000528)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,146,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$54,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSHB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000434)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,595,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWSP: Unit Six Roof Replacement (92000037)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,494,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,994,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSCorrections Training Center (92001125)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2067, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$333,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$350,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6279. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$672,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$552,322,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$552,994,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6280. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONTri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,803,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,807,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6281. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$6,229,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$6,239,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$904,803,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$911,042,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6282. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Lvl (40000013)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6040, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$22,129,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$41,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$22,170,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$999,672,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,021,842,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6283. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONWest Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$27,734,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,027,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$52,761,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6284. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool District Health and Safety 2019-21 (40000019)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$101,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,845,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,946,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6285. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSkills Centers Minor Works (40000023)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$216,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,784,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6286. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 School Construction Assistance Program (40000034)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7061, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâFederal. . . .$2,207,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$8,488,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$59,449,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$70,144,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$365,283,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$435,427,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6287. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000039)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,874,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,239,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,113,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6288. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000040)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$876,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,512,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,388,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6289. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONPierce County Skills Center - Evergreen Building Modernization (40000048)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,348,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,482,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,830,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6290. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSeattle Public Schools Skills Center - Rainier Beach High School (40000050)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6291. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONPuget Sound Skills Center Preservation (40000051)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$345,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$679,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,024,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6292. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 School District Health and Safety (40000052)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$134,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$476,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$610,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,283,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,893,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6293. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 Career Preparation and Launch Grants (40000056)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$161,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,839,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6294. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 School Construction Assistance Program (40000063)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5002, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7061 of this act.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâFederal. . . .$1,500,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$170,954,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,352,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$183,806,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,467,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$220,273,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6295. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Small District and State Tribal Compact Schools Mod (40000065)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7063 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$6,630,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$128,368,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,717,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$145,715,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$69,165,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$214,880,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6296. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (40000066)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$40,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6297. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 School District Health and Safety (40000067)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$14,208,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,092,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$28,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6298. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000068)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$4,434,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$422,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,856,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,144,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6299. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Career Preparation and Launch Capital Grants (40000069)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$1,178,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,822,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6300. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000070)Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$2,912,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,223,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,135,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6301. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONChief Leschi School HVAC (40000099)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$819,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,181,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6302. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool District Indoor Air Quality & Energy Efficiency (40000104)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$30,000,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$14,472,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$44,472,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$553,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,025,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6303. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools: Physical Health & Nutrition (91000464)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$220,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,780,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6304. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools: Remediation of Lead (91000465)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$270,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,965,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,235,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$363,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,598,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6305. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONGreen Schools: Stormwater Infrastructure Projects (91000466)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5011, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$263,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$612,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$875,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6306. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONHealthy Kids/Healthy Schools - T-12 Lighting (91000483)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,361,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$139,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6307. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONEnergy Assessment Grants to School Districts (91000509)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$4,900,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$50,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,950,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6308. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool-based Health and Behavioral Health Clinics (91000519)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,864,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,064,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6309. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONCareer and Technical Education Projects (91000534)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5010, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$65,735,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,468,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$68,203,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6310. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool Construction Assistance Program Revision (SCAPR) Planning (91000535)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6311. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONPierce College at New Bethel High School (92000036)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5012, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6312. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONK-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5023, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,224,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$231,276,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$234,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6313. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONDistressed Schools (92000041)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$143,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,343,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,486,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6314. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2019-21 Small District Modernization Grants (92000139)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$176,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,207,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$23,383,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6315. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2019-21 STEM Grants (92000140)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5029, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,696,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6316. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2019-21 Distressed Schools (92000142)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$784,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,153,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,937,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6317. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,545,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,695,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,240,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6318. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 Distressed Schools (92000917)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5010, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,734,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,686,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$30,420,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6319. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (5933) (92000923)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6537, chapter 474, Laws of 2023, as amended by section 7062 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,429,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,622,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,051,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6320. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2022 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (92000925)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5011, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$84,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,528,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,612,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6321. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Distressed Schools (92000928)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5012, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$8,941,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$21,132,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,073,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,042,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$32,115,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6322. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Agricultural Science in Schools Grant to FFA Foundation (92000931)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,997,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6323. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2024 School Construction Assistance Program Enhancement (92001066)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$24,216,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$55,000,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$79,216,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$79,216,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6324. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND2023-25 Campus Preservation (Minor Works) (40000021)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,329,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,271,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6325. FOR THE CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTHAcademic and Physical Education Building (30000036)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,382,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$63,147,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$67,529,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6326. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2021-23 Heritage Barn Grants (40000005)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$280,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$720,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6327. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2021-23 Historic County Courthouse Rehabilitation Program (40000006)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1144, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,502,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$360,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,862,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6328. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2021-23 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000007)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$34,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$266,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6329. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2021-23 Historic Theater Capital Grant Program (40000012)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1146, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$62,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$238,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6330. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2023-25 Historic County Courthouse Rehabilitation Grant Program (40000015)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1082, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,624,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$538,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,162,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6331. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2023-25 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000016)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$349,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$166,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$515,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6332. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2023-25 Historic Theater Capital Grant Program (40000017)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1084, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$383,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$515,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6333. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION2023-25 Heritage Barn Grant Program (40000018)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$866,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$134,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6334. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONAnderson Hall Renovation (20091002)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,171,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,679,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$28,850,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6335. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Bothell (30000378)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,263,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$78,175,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$79,438,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6336. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONMagnuson Health Sciences Phase II - Renovation/Replacement (40000049)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$35,457,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,543,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$64,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6337. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Clean Energy Testbeds (40000098)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5015, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$7,500,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,501,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,001,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,999,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6338. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONIntellectual House - Phase 2 (40000100)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,978,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6339. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (40000101)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,199,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,501,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6340. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000103)Reappropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$19,044,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,352,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$37,396,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6341. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000129)Reappropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$2,096,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,799,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,895,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6342. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000131)Reappropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$1,407,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,827,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,234,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6343. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONInfrastructure Renewal (40000132)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$6,296,000University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$8,499,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$14,795,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,380,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,175,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6344. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONFY24 Energy Renewal Program (40000147)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5019, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$38,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,900,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6345. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONCtr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,533,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,467,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$29,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6346. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUWMC NW - Campus Behavioral Health Renovation (91000027)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5055, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,822,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,178,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6347. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,953,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,305,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$20,258,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6348. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYMinor Capital Preservation 2023-25 (MCR) (40000340)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$652,000Washington State University Building AccountâState. . . .$11,483,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$12,135,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,865,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$41,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6349. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYNew Engineering Student Success Building & Infrastructure (40000342)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,467,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,533,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6350. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYKnott Dairy Infrastructure (40000343)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,438,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,562,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6351. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYBustad Renovation (SIM for Vet Teaching Anatomy) (40000344)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,782,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,218,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6352. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYEastlick-Abelson Renovation (40000362)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,250,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$22,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6353. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYDecarbonization Planning (91000043)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5021, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6354. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYKnott Dairy Center Digester (92001132)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5022, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6355. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYScience Renovation (30000507)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$52,089,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,198,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$111,287,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6356. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYInfrastructure Renewal III (40000070)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$739,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,261,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6357. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYSports and Recreation Center Energy Improvements (40000112)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5023, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$9,998,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,998,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6358. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMartin - Williamson Hall (40000113)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$64,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$286,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$350,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6359. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYInfrastructure Renewal IV (40000114)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,268,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,732,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6360. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works: Preservation 2023-25 (40000116)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,843,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,532,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,375,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6361. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works: Program 2023-25 (40000120)Reappropriation:Eastern Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$2,919,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,081,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6362. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHB 1390 â District Energy Systems (91000027)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$49,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$151,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6363. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYNutrition Science (30000456)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$210,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,370,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$59,580,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6364. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYArts Education (30000836)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$38,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$262,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6365. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHealth Education (40000009)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$114,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$62,091,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$62,205,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6366. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYElectrical Grid Security (40000121)Reappropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$43,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$43,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$86,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,422,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,508,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6367. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMulticultural Center (40000123)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,874,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,126,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6368. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation 2023-2025 (40000128)Reappropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,481,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$355,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,836,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,793,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,629,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6369. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Program 2023 -2025 (40000145)Reappropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$815,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$185,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6370. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYScience Building Carbon Reduction (40000162)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5026, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$4,509,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,509,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6371. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHB 1390 â District Energy Systems (91000024)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$55,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$745,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6372. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGESeminar I Renovation (30000125)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,884,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,555,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$28,439,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6373. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEMinor Works Preservation 2023-25 (40000085)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$290,000The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,416,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,706,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,384,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,090,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6374. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYCoast Salish Longhouse (30000912)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5105, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$509,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,211,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,720,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,780,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6375. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYStudent Development and Success Center (30000919)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$46,589,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,586,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$48,175,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6376. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYEnvironmental Studies Renovation (40000004)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$495,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6377. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works - Preservation 2023-25 (40000006)Reappropriation:Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$3,777,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,611,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,388,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6378. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works - Program 2023-25 (40000007)Reappropriation:Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,346,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,654,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6379. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYClassroom, Lab, and Collaborative Space Upgrades (40000008)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,300,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6380. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSIONCreative Districts Capital Construction Projects (30000002)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$235,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$177,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$412,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6381. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION2023-25 Creative Districts Capital Projects Program (30000003)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$407,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$416,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6382. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSIONPreserving State-owned Public Art (30000004)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$735,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$735,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6383. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYHeritage Capital Grant Projects 2021-2023 (40000099)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,520,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,296,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,816,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6384. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYPreservation - Minor Works 2021-23 (40000136)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$613,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,084,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,697,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6385. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYGreat Hall Core Exhibit Renewal (40000145)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,273,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,953,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,226,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6386. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYHeritage Capital Grant Projects 2023-25 (40000150)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,849,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,151,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6387. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYPreservation - Minor Works 2023-25 (40000180)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$896,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$77,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$973,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6388. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYProgram - Museum Audio Visual Upgrades (40000181)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$310,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$127,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$437,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6389. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYCampbell and Carriage House Repairs and Restoration (40000017)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$648,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,308,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,956,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6390. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYGarage & Emergency Exit Concrete Remediation (40000053)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,179,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$199,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,378,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6391. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYMinor Works: Preservation 2023-25 (40000054)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$982,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,482,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6392. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYLow-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:Site Closure AccountâState. . . .$1,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,405,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,902,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6393. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYTwin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$129,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$621,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6394. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYTransfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$57,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$393,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6395. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYRemedial Action Grant Program (30000216)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$12,414,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$49,855,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$62,269,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6396. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$2,071,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,856,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$19,927,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6397. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYWatershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$857,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,143,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6398. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYDungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3029, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$242,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,808,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6399. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYASARCO Cleanup (30000334)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3001, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$387,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,873,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$36,260,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6400. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYEastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$542,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,231,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,773,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYRemedial Action Grants (30000458)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,262,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,726,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$43,988,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6402. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYASARCO Cleanup (30000538)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$51,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,910,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,961,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6403. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYCleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,321,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,151,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,472,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6404. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYSunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,125,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,930,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6405. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYYakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3031, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$294,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,456,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$26,750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYWatershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$875,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,125,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6407. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYASARCO Cleanup (30000670)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$4,833,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,927,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$28,760,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6408. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYSunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,653,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,031,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,684,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6409. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2015-17 Restored Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000704)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$307,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,129,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,436,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6410. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYColumbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply DevelopmentAccountâState. . . .$3,645,000Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .$689,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$556,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,890,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,910,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$33,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6411. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYWatershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3017, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,287,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,713,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6412. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYWater Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$204,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,296,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6413. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,369,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$371,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,740,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6414. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2015-17 Restored Clean Up Toxic Sites â Puget Sound (30000763)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$658,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,038,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,696,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6415. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYVW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$60,278,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,422,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$112,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6416. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYReduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3019, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:Air Pollution Control AccountâState. . . .$2,302,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,098,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$28,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6417. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000111)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,330,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,904,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,234,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6418. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 ASARCO Cleanup (40000114)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$4,844,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,956,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6419. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000116)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,304,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,696,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6420. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000117)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$11,273,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$837,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,110,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6421. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYPadilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (40000127)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6422. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Floodplains by Design (40000129)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,795,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,605,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6423. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Clean Up Toxics Sites â Puget Sound (40000130)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$5,521,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,246,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,767,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6424. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$12,152,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,854,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,006,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6425. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2015 Drought Authority (40000146)Reappropriation:State Drought Preparedness and Response AccountâState. . . .$634,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$669,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6426. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3087, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .$1,464,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,371,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,990,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$20,825,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,175,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6427. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)Reappropriation:Watershed Restoration and Enhancement BondAccountâState. . . .$17,697,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,303,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6428. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000179)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,727,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,187,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$36,914,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6429. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYZosel Dam Preservation (40000193)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$78,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$139,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$217,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6430. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000194)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6032, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,158,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,046,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,204,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6431. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Remedial Action Grants (40000211)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$23,334,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,548,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$48,882,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6432. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2020 Remedial Action Grants (40000288)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$10,923,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,733,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$32,656,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6433. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 ASARCO Everett Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000303)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$9,973,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$841,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,814,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6434. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Remedial Action Grant Program (40000304)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$60,730,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,464,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$71,194,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6435. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000336)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$39,122,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,878,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6436. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000340)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$18,938,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,882,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,820,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6437. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Clean Up Toxic Sites â Puget Sound (40000346)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,344,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,464,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,808,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6438. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000359)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3089, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$18,342,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,658,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6439. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000360)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$7,778,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,315,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,093,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6440. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000371)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3091, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$14,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,986,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6441. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000378)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7050, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,080,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,470,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,550,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6442. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 ASARCO Tacoma Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000386)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$3,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6443. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000387)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3096, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$24,930,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,070,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6444. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000388)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,383,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,617,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6445. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Floodplains by Design (40000389)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,264,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,644,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,908,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6446. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Reducing Diesel GHG & Toxic Emissions (40000390)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,236,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,764,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6447. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000391)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,903,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$378,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,281,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6448. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Puget Sound Nutrient Reduction Grant Program (40000396)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3101, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,467,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,533,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6449. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000397)Reappropriation:Watershed Restoration and Enhancement BondAccountâState. . . .$30,369,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,631,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6450. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000399)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3103, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .$1,329,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$31,169,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$32,498,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,502,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6451. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000422)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$15,270,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,730,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6452. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Product Replacement Program (40000436)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,224,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,276,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6453. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYPacific Wood Treating Site Cleanup â Cleanup Settlement Account (40000464)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$2,006,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$320,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,326,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6454. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2022 Clean Up Toxic Sites â Puget Sound (40000465)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,737,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$263,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6455. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2022 Community-Based Public-Private Stormwater Partnership (40000470)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$405,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$595,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6456. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2022 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000473)Reappropriation:Water Pollution Control Revolving FundâState. . . .$194,063,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,937,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6457. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Reducing Diesel Greenhouse Gases (GHG) and Toxic Emissions (40000474)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$13,036,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,596,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,632,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6458. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000475)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$14,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6459. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000476)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3003, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$56,450,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,550,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6460. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Freshwater Aquatic Invasive Plants Grant Program (40000477)Reappropriation:Freshwater Aquatic Weeds AccountâState. . . .$1,035,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$665,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6461. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Freshwater Algae Grant Program (40000478)Reappropriation:Aquatic Algae Control AccountâState. . . .$542,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$168,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$710,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6462. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000479)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,606,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,538,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,144,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6463. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Affordable Housing Cleanup Grant Program (40000480)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7049 of this act.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$8,683,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$522,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$36,820,000TOTAL. . . .$46,025,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6464. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Product Replacement Program (40000486)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$5,336,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,164,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6465. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Clean Up Toxic Sites â Puget Sound (40000487)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$7,455,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,455,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6466. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Remedial Action Grant Program (40000495)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$112,943,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,168,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$115,111,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6467. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000526)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,358,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$92,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6468. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 ASARCO Everett Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000529)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$7,178,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$501,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,679,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6469. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 PFAS Contaminated Drinking Water (40000530)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$7,807,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,500,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$9,307,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,357,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6470. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000533)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$801,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$149,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6471. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (40000538)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6472. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000539)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$53,771,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,229,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$68,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6473. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Floodplains by Design (40000540)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$16,972,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$47,320,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$64,292,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,100,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$67,392,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6474. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000559)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,246,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,246,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6475. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000563)Reappropriation:Water Pollution Control Revolving FundâFederal. . . .$101,525,000Water Pollution Control Revolving FundâState. . . .$434,808,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$536,333,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$98,667,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$635,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6476. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000565)Reappropriation:Watershed Restoration and Enhancement BondAccountâState. . . .$40,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6477. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Sewer Overflow & Stormwater Reuse Municipal Grants Prog (40000567)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$16,614,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$86,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6478. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000568)Reappropriation:Waste Tire Removal AccountâState. . . .$233,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$767,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6479. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Stormwater Public Private Partnerships (40000569)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$2,935,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$65,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6480. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYElevator Restorations at Ecology Facilities (40000570)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,728,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,735,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6481. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000571)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$36,305,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,695,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6482. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000572)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$44,368,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,632,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6483. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000583)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3001, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .$1,500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$60,759,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$62,259,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,941,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$66,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6484. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Zosel Dam Preservation (40000605)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,193,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$356,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,549,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6485. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYImproving Air Quality in Overburdened Communities Initiative (40000606)Reappropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .$20,646,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$754,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$21,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6486. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYLandfill Methane Capture (40000611)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$14,597,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$403,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6487. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYPadilla Bay Samish Conservation Area (40000612)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$113,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,220,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,333,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6488. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYCleanup Settlement Account Projects (40000613)Reappropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .$1,687,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$513,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6489. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYLower Issaquah Valley PFAS Cleanup (40000618)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6490. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYState Parks Relocation to Ecology Headquarters Building (40000718)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,618,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,618,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6491. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYSkagit Water (91000347)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6326, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,521,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$979,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6492. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6027, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,707,000State Drought Preparedness and Response AccountâState. . . .$8,606,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$12,313,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,687,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6493. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYPSCAA Ultra-fine Particle Monitoring (91000378)Reappropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .$29,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$371,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6494. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYDDT Soil Remediation Pilot (91000383)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3038, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,548,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$452,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6495. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYCity of Ruston Contamination Remediation (91000390)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,003,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$106,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,109,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6496. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYStorm Water Improvements (92000076)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,802,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$88,164,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$96,966,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6497. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYDrought Response (92000142)Reappropriation:State Drought Preparedness and Response AccountâState. . . .$808,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,915,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,723,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6498. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2022 Stormwater Projects (92000195)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$4,855,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,855,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6499. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Drought Response (92000205)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3037, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,720,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$280,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6500. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Program TrustAccountâState. . . .$206,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,594,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6501. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$3,603,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,397,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6502. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2019-21 (30000702)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$10,645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,855,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6503. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2021-23 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (30000705)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$9,823,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$444,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,267,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6504. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2023-25 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (40000002)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$11,561,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$439,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6505. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2023-25 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (40000003)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$7,465,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$535,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6506. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .$7,883,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,817,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6507. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Flagler - Welcome Center Replacement (30000097)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$967,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$479,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,446,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6508. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONSun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$262,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$140,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$402,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6509. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$240,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,076,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,316,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6510. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONKopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,539,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,469,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,008,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6511. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$443,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,338,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,781,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6512. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONPalouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$204,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$220,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6513. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONStatewide New Park (30001019)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$47,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$266,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$313,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6514. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONStatewide Electric Vehicle Charging Stations (40000016)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$86,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$114,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6515. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONSaltwater - Green Vision Project (40000053)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3045, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$450,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6516. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONPreservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$271,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,176,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,447,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6517. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONNisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$30,682,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,628,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,310,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6518. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Ebey Replace Campground Restroom (40000186)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$128,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$142,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$270,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6519. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Flagler Historic Theater Restoration (40000188)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,384,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$179,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,563,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6520. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONNisqually Day Use Improvements (40000202)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,063,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$788,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,851,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6521. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONSaint Edward Maintenance Facility (40000218)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,297,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$227,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,524,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6522. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMinor Works - Preservation 2021-23 (40000364)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,764,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,236,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6523. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMinor Works - Program 2021-23 (40000365)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,067,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$869,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,936,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6524. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONPalouse to Cascades Trail - Trail Structure Repairs (40000438)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,196,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$65,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,261,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6525. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Worden Geothermal Heating (40000457)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6526. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLake Sammamish Dock Design & Permitting (40000461)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6527. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONAnderson Lake - New Day Use Facilities and Trail Development (91000441)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$80,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$255,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$335,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6528. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2023-25 Capital Preservation Pool (91000443)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,928,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,454,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,382,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6529. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONState Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000014)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,043,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,922,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$29,965,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6530. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2021-23 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000017)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,434,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,079,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6531. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONEnhancement of Puget Sound Pump Out Facilities (92001127)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3053, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$758,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$242,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6532. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2023-25 State Parks Capital Projects Pool (92001128)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3054, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$975,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,519,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$20,494,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,429,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,923,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6533. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEWashington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3029, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .$962,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .$660,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$1,373,000Riparian Protection AccountâState. . . .$117,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,112,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,211,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$55,323,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6534. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESalmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6361, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$4,100,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,042,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,142,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$61,203,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$66,345,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6535. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICERecreational Trails Program (30000229)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$418,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,169,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,587,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6536. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESalmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$15,859,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$967,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,826,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$49,387,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$66,213,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6537. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .$3,829,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .$4,889,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$3,529,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$12,247,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,753,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$80,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6538. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEBoating Facilities Program (30000410)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:Recreation Resources AccountâState. . . .$2,272,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,753,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,025,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6539. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICENonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)Reappropriation:NOVA Program AccountâState. . . .$2,227,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,968,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,195,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6540. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEYouth Athletic Facilities (30000412)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$501,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,576,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,077,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6541. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEAquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3037, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâState. . . .$508,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,613,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,121,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,164,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,285,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6542. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEPuget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,612,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,388,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6543. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEPuget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$847,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,153,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6544. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEFirearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)Reappropriation:Firearms Range AccountâState. . . .$390,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$423,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$813,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6545. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEWashington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$958,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,542,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6546. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEFamily Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$97,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,903,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6547. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3200, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .$3,926,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .$11,893,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$5,297,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$21,116,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$63,884,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$85,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6548. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3201, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$3,743,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,367,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,110,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,890,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6549. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Boating Facilities Program (40000005)Reappropriation:Recreation Resources AccountâState. . . .$5,848,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,024,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$17,872,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6550. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000006)Reappropriation:NOVA Program AccountâState. . . .$1,210,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,201,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,411,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6551. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3041, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,405,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,595,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6552. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000008)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3202, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,429,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,171,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6553. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,240,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,267,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,507,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6554. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000010)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,051,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,949,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6555. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3208, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$567,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,519,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,086,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6556. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000012)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3209, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,715,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,776,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$26,491,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6557. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Recreational Trails Program (40000014)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$805,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,195,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6558. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000016)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,843,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,157,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6559. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000017)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$119,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,881,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6560. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000019)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3213, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .$7,841,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .$25,215,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$19,700,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$52,756,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$47,244,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6561. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000021)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3042, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$33,777,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$12,183,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$45,960,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$49,040,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$95,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6562. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Boating Facilities Program (40000023)Reappropriation:Recreation Resources AccountâState. . . .$7,796,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,154,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6563. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000025)Reappropriation:NOVA Program AccountâState. . . .$2,648,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,352,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6564. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000027)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3217, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,376,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,851,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,227,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6565. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000029)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3048, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâState. . . .$126,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,733,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,859,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,659,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,518,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6566. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000031)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$28,980,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,827,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$52,807,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6567. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000033)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3220, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,627,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,686,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,313,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6568. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000035)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3043, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$12,684,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,111,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$26,795,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6569. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Recreational Trails Program (40000039)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$2,198,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,802,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6570. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000041)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,939,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$261,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6571. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000043)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$8,432,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,568,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6572. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000045)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3226, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,175,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,533,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,708,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6573. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Community Forest Grant Program (40000047)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3227, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,382,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,917,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,299,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6574. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Outdoor Recreation Equity (40000049)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3203, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$643,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,357,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6575. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000053)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3018, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .$8,592,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .$49,418,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$41,600,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$99,610,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,390,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6576. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000054)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$67,466,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,976,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$107,442,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,558,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6577. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Boating Facilities Program (40000055)Reappropriation:Recreation Resources AccountâState. . . .$8,851,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,949,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6578. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000056)Reappropriation:NOVA Program AccountâState. . . .$10,303,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,760,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,063,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6579. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (40000057)Reappropriation:Firearms Range AccountâState. . . .$714,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$126,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$840,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6580. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Youth Athletics Facilities (40000058)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3017, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Youth Athletic Facility Nonappropriated AccountâState. . . .$8,521,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,919,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,440,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6581. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000059)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâState. . . .$3,242,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,308,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,550,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$308,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,858,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6582. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Community Forest Grant Program (40000060)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$5,770,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,411,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,181,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,396,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,577,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6583. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000061)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3063, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$10,115,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$27,812,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$37,927,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,238,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$59,165,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6584. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000062)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$11,110,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,654,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$20,764,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,655,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6585. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000063)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3014, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$7,928,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,704,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$15,632,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,430,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,062,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6586. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000064)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3015, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$36,487,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$21,023,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$57,510,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,095,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$70,605,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6587. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Recreational Trails Program (40000065)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$4,868,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6588. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000066)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$4,531,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$469,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6589. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000067)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$19,768,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$232,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6590. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000068)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$5,093,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,687,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,780,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6591. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 Salmon Recovery Investment from Operating (40000069)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7053, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$38,724,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,276,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6592. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 Grants For Watershed Projects from Operating (40000070)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7054, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$15,543,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,457,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6593. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 Duckabush Estuary Restoration Project from Operating (40000071)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7055, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6594. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEPlanning for Recreation Access Grants (40000503)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,797,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,203,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6595. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICECoastal Restoration Grants (91000448)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$622,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,563,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,185,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6596. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEUpper Quinault River Restoration Project (91000958)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,906,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,094,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6597. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEFish Barrier Removal Projects in Skagit County (91001662)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3046, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,254,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$746,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6598. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESalmon Recovery Funding Board: Riparian Grant Program (91001679)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$24,854,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$146,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6599. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICERecreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3049, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$353,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,616,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,969,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,812,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$34,781,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6600. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICECommunity Outdoor Athletic Facilities Program (92000458)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3076, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,900,000Youth Athletic Facility Nonappropriated AccountâState. . . .$6,568,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$12,468,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6601. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICECity of LaCenter Breezee Creek Culvert Replacement (92000461)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6602. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONMatch for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,369,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,506,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,875,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6603. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2019-21 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000009)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3224, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,738,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,262,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6604. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000013)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3241, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,959,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,041,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6605. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2021-23 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000014)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6606. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) PIP Loan (40000015)Reappropriation:Conservation Assistance Revolving AccountâState. . . .$160,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$160,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6607. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2021-23 Regional Conservation Partnership Program (RCPP) Match (40000017)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,260,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,740,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6608. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 VSP Project Funding (40000021)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,528,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$472,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6609. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment (40000022)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,602,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,398,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6610. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000023)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7056 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,854,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,146,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6611. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Farmland Protection and Land Access (40000024)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,921,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$79,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6612. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Irrigation Efficiencies (40000025)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$16,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,484,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6613. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Regional Conservation Partnership Program (RCPP) (40000026)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3083, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$92,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,908,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6614. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) PIP (40000027)Reappropriation:Conservation Assistance Revolving AccountâState. . . .$100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6615. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Washington Shrubsteppe Restoration & Resiliency Initiative (40000028)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$344,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,156,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6616. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000029)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,909,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,591,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6617. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement from Operating (40000038)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7057, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6618. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Alternative Manure Management (40000052)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7057 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,600,000TOTAL. . . .$14,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6619. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONRiparian Restoration with Landowners (91000020)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7056, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$21,938,000Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$1,294,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$23,232,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,768,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6620. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONNatural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment 2017-19 (92000011)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3090, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,000,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6621. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONWhitman County Fire Recovery (92000017)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$383,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$578,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$961,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6622. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONSkagit County Voluntary Stewardship (92001497)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$770,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$230,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6623. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEDeschutes Watershed Center (20062008)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,216,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,479,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$17,695,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6624. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMigratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)Reappropriation:Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâState. . . .$1,214,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,223,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,437,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6625. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3236, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation AccountâState. . . .$172,000General FundâFederal. . . .$20,371,000General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$2,999,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâState. . . .$1,379,000Special Wildlife AccountâFederal. . . .$2,846,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local. . . .$3,327,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$31,094,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$94,627,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$125,721,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6626. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEEells Springs Hatchery Renovation (30000214)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$51,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,442,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,493,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6627. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESamish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$134,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,598,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,732,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6628. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEWooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$313,000General FundâFederal. . . .$5,700,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$6,013,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,687,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6629. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE2023-25 Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3243, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$292,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,308,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6630. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEPuget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$227,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$727,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$273,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6631. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESnow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3057, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$98,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,038,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,136,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6632. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEForks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,084,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,288,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,372,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6633. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEHurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$973,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,625,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,598,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6634. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEDungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$281,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,121,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,402,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6635. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEPSNERP Match (30000846)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$40,563,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$361,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$40,924,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,163,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$44,087,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6636. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEKalama Falls Hatchery Replace Raceways and PA System (30000848)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$616,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$816,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6637. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Programmatic 2019-21 (40000008)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$414,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,013,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,427,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6638. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEElochoman Hatchery Demolition and Restoration (40000024)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6639. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFERegion 1 Office - Construct Secure Storage (40000087)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$56,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$94,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$150,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6640. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Preservation 21-23 (40000089)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,054,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,936,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,990,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6641. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEFish and Wildlife Health and BioSecurity Facility (40000090)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$496,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$388,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$884,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6642. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Program 21-23 (40000092)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,331,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,597,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,928,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6643. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFERingold Hatchery Replace Ponds (40000101)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$10,776,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$58,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,834,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6644. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESRKW - New Cowlitz River Hatchery (40000145)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$124,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$176,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6645. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESRKW - Kendall Creek Hatchery Modifications (40000146)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,829,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,488,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,317,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6646. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESRKW - Voights Creek Hatchery Modifications (40000148)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,273,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$278,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,551,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6647. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEKlickitat WLA - Simcoe Fencing (40000161)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$450,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6648. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFETaneum Creek Property Acquisition Post Closing Activities (40000162)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$136,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6649. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEDuckabush Estuary Habitat Restoration (40000163)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3101, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$30,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,189,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$43,189,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$811,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$44,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6650. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Preservation 23-25 (40000164)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,137,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,393,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,530,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6651. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESRKW - Palmer Ponds Expansion (40000175)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$878,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$72,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$950,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6652. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Programmatic 23-25 (40000178)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,829,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,021,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,850,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6653. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESekiu Boat Ramp Acquisition (40000255)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,703,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,703,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6654. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEUpper Columbia River Salmon Reintroduction from Operating (40000266)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7058, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$48,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,952,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6655. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEWestern Pond Turtle Nest Hill Restoration (91000161)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$112,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$88,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6656. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFECooperative Elk and Deer Damage Fencing (91000162)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3106, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$935,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$465,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6657. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFETribal Hatcheries (91000163)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3108, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,137,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$346,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,483,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6658. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFENaches Rearing Ponds (92000049)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$412,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$188,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6659. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEShrubsteppe and Rangeland Cooperative Wildlife Fencing (92000050)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3294, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$590,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$910,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6660. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFERecreational Fishing Access on the Grande Ronde River (92000051)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3064, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$218,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$282,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6661. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMitchell Act BiOp Implementation (92001251)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$536,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$536,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6662. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEWashougal Intake Replacement (92001252)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$13,946,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$328,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,274,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6663. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESTeanaway (40000038)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$244,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,612,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,856,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6664. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2021-23 Forestry Riparian Easement Program (40000077)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,116,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$884,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6665. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESRural Broadband Investment (40000082)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,248,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$752,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6666. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2021-23 Road Maintenance and Abandonment Planning (40000092)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3303, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$312,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,566,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,878,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6667. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Safe and Sustainable Recreation (40000141)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,149,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$766,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,915,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6668. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWhiteman Cove Restoration (40000143)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,462,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,475,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,937,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6669. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESLakebay Marina UST Cleanup (40000144)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$946,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$63,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,009,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6670. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESRemoval of Aquatic Derelict Structures (40000147)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3132, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$5,306,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,344,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,650,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6671. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Structurally Deficient Bridges (40000150)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,074,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$988,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,062,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6672. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (40000151)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,722,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$370,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,092,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6673. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESRevitalizing Trust Land Transfers (40000152)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3027, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$10,804,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,482,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$12,286,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,843,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$28,129,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6674. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWebster Nursery Seed Plant Replacement (40000153)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,933,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$812,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,745,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6675. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Minor Works Preservation (40000154)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$433,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,180,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,613,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,430,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,043,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6676. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESCorrection of Fish Barrier Culverts (40000155)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$750,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6677. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESOmak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000156)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$585,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,204,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,789,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6678. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWebster Nursery Production Expansion (40000157)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$379,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$284,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$663,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6679. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Emergent Environmental Mitigation Projects (40000158)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$373,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$347,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$720,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6680. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Minor Works Programmatic (40000162)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,955,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$277,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,232,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6681. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEatonville Work Center and Fire Station (40000163)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$872,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$880,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6682. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESForestry Riparian Easement Program from Operating (40000376)Reappropriation:Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$1,241,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,759,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6683. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESPort Angeles Fire and Seasonal Employee Housing (40000409)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$444,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$488,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6684. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESState-Owned Lands Carbon Sequestration (40000405)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions Account. . . .$613,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$82,387,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$83,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6685. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESDrought Resilience Infrastructure Investments (40000411)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3031, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$247,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$747,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$750,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6686. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESRecreational Target Shooting Pilot Sites (40000413)Reappropriation:Firearms Range AccountâState. . . .$900,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$900,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6687. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESYMCA Camp Colman Investments (40000424)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,670,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,670,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6688. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESPort of Willapa Harbor Energy Innovation District Grant (91000099)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$100,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6689. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEncumbered Lands - Acquisition (91000323)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$15,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6690. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESFallen Firefighter Memorial (SHB 2091) (91000328)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3036, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$371,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$371,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6691. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESCamp Colman Cabin Preservation and Upgrades (92000039)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3075, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,301,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$99,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6692. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWildfire Reforestation Grants (92000063)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3035, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$8,971,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,029,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6693. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREAgricultural Carbon Storage and Sequestration (40000001)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3038, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6694. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREState Lands Assessment (91000011)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3039, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6695. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE2021-23 WA State Fairs Health and Safety Grants (92000005)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$385,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,620,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,005,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6696. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE2023-25 WA State Fairs Health and Safety Grants (92000006)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,623,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,377,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6697. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESGrays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$420,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$47,757,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$48,177,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6698. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESClark College: North County Satellite (30000135)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,012,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$53,906,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$58,918,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6699. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESEverett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,415,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$47,684,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$52,099,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6700. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESShoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$893,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$46,547,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$47,440,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6701. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESWalla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$36,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,603,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,639,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6702. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSpokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,406,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,763,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,169,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6703. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESLake Washington: Center for Design (40000102)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$29,835,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,274,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,109,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6704. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESTacoma: Center for Innovative Learning and Engagement (40000104)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,161,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,437,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,598,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6705. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSpokane: Apprenticeship Center (40000107)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,995,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$373,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,368,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6706. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCentralia: Teacher Education and Family Development Center (40000109)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,262,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,268,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6707. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSkagit: Library/Culinary Arts Building (40000110)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$13,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,244,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,257,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6708. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESEdmonds: Triton Learning Commons (40000114)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$495,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,161,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,656,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6709. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESBates: Fire Service Training Center (40000130)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$37,871,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,066,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,937,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6710. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESBellevue: Center for Transdisciplinary Learning and Innovation (40000168)Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$38,420,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$40,420,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,361,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$44,781,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6711. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESEverett: Baker Hall Replacement (40000190)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$38,040,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$139,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,179,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6712. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESWenatchee: Center for Technical Education and Innovation (40000198)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$48,209,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,244,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$51,453,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6713. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESRenton: Health Sciences Center (40000204)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,029,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$968,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,997,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6714. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESShoreline: STE(A)M Education Center (40000214)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$32,801,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,930,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$42,731,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6715. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCascadia: CC5 Gateway building (40000222)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$819,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,277,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,096,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6716. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESPierce Puyallup: STEM building (40000293)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,364,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$40,605,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$41,969,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6717. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESPierce College Olympic South Asbestos Abatement and Restoration (40000516)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,832,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,327,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$13,159,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6718. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Facility Repairs (23-25) (40000595)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5031, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$904,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,720,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,624,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,822,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,446,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6719. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Roof Repairs (23-25) (40000670)Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$3,035,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,172,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,207,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6720. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Site Repairs (23-25) (40000698)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5032, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$691,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,300,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,991,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,180,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,171,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6721. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (23-25) (40000721)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,397,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,130,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,527,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,773,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6722. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Program Improvements (23-25) (40000754)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$3,200,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,180,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,380,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$48,820,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$53,200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6723. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCBPS SBCTC Statewide: Utility Submeters for Clean Buildings Act (40000878)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$7,822,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$722,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,544,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6724. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCTC Energy Efficiency Program (40000880)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5036, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6725. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESBellingham Technical College: Campus Center Emergency Repairs (40000916)Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$5,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,624,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,624,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,760,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$19,384,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6726. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESHB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000443)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$907,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$907,000(End of part)PART 7SUPPLEMENTALSec. 7001. 2023 c 474 s 6005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.(2) The reappropriation for any project for which the department has not executed a contract by December 31, 2023, shall lapse. The department shall provide a list of lapsed projects to the legislative fiscal committees no later than January 15, 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,229,000))Â Â Â Â Â $645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,517,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($10,746,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,162,000Sec. 7002. 2019 c 413 s 6003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000Adams County Industrial Wastewater and TreatmentCenter (Othello). . . .$1,250,000Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District(Arlington). . . .$46,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center Design andPreconstruction (Tacoma). . . .$250,000Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound IndustrialCtr (Belfair). . . .$515,000Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center(Vancouver). . . .$500,000Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall(Tumwater). . . .$200,000Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000Carnation Central Business District Revitalization(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000Centennial Connect Project (Marysville). . . .$642,000Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement(College Place). . . .$900,000Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development(Covington). . . .$820,000Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (((Puyallup))). . . .$103,000Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation(Fox Island). . . .$17,000Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique(Federal Way). . . .$500,000Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition(Granger). . . .$255,000Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation(Harrington). . . .$97,000Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements(George). . . .$700,000Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels(Belfair). . . .$12,000Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library(Silverdale). . . .$250,000Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement(Chelan). . . .$300,000Lake City Comm Center, Renovate Magnuson Comm Center(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr(Onalaska). . . .$80,000LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000Longview Police Department Range and Training(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps(Chinook). . . .$77,000Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000South Snohomish County Community Resource Center(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000South Thurston County Meals on Wheels KitchenUpgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof(Chehalis). . . .$54,000Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep(Shelton). . . .$27,000Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,800,000Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation(Federal Way). . . .$1,250,000Whidbey Island Youth Project (Oak Harborand Coupeville). . . .$300,000White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan.(9) $1,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:(A) Current uses;(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:(A) Any potential private partners or investors;(B) Necessary real estate transactions;(C) Federal funding opportunities; and(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs; and(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs.(e) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.(f) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.(g) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. It is the intent of the legislature that beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium no state funding is provided to the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$130,941,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$130,941,000Sec. 7003. 2023 c 474 s 6014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($978,000))Â Â Â Â Â $967,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,556,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($15,534,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,523,000Sec. 7004. 2024 c 375 s 6012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEBehavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 413, Laws of 2019, except that $416,000 of the appropriation has been moved to section 1009 ((of this act)), chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($18,747,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,173,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$63,936,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($82,683,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,109,000Sec. 7005. 2023 c 474 s 6021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000041)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,190,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,132,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,690,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($5,880,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,822,000Sec. 7006. 2023 c 474 s 6023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Building Communities Fund Program (40000043)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1036, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($15,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,319,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,530,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($36,785,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,849,000Sec. 7007. 2023 c 474 s 6024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((1006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020))6006, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:Early Learning Facilities Development AccountâState. . . .(($1,140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $306,000Early Learning Facilities Revolving AccountâState. . . .$13,292,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,767,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($18,199,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,365,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,821,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($35,020,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,186,000Sec. 7008. 2024 c 375 s 6013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except ((that))as provided for under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.(2) $1,960,000 of the appropriation for the Lummi Nation and $1,960,000 of the funding for the Comprehensive Walla Walla project has been moved to section 1009 of this act.(3) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($31,999,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,999,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$90,232,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($122,231,000))Â Â Â Â Â $119,231,000Sec. 7009. 2024 c 375 s 6010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that:(1) ((Funding))The funding provided in this section may not be directed to the Arivva Community Center;(2) The Main Street Redevelopment Project appropriation level is reduced from $985,000 to $865,000;(3) $120,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the Steilacoom Cultural Center; ((and))(4) $200,000 of the $2,000,000 reappropriation for the Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle) project must be used to facilitate community engagement and a community needs assessment to inform design of the redevelopment of the Lake City Community Center;(5) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Seattle Goodwill (Seattle) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section; and(6) $78,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Hoh Tribe Broadband (Grays Harbor) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($50,532,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,454,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$115,775,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($166,307,000))Â Â Â Â Â $164,229,000Sec. 7010. 2024 c 375 s 1001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7012 of this act, except that:(a) $2,000,000 of the reappropriation is for the Tiny House Villages (Seattle) project, and not the Tiny House Villages and Cottages (Seattle) project; and(b) $206,000 of the reappropriation is for the Renton Housing Repair Assistance Program (Renton) project, and not the 300 Rainier Ave Building (Renton) project.(2) The department must reimburse the city of Chelan for its expenditures for the Chelan municipal airport extension project. The amount of the reimbursement to the city of Chelan under this section may not exceed the amount appropriated for the Chelan municipal airport extension project in section 1022, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.(3) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the remaining costs of the Chelan municipal airport extension project.(4) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Port of Olympia Marine Center (Olympia) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.(5) $38,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Communications Tower (Ocean Shores) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.(6) $155,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Trails End Community Meeting Space (Tumwater) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($117,688,000))Â Â Â Â Â $117,245,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$51,879,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($170,567,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,124,000Sec. 7011. 2024 c 375 s 6009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7007 of this act, except that:(1) $273,000 of the reappropriation is for the City of Arlington Jensen Park Improvements (Arlington) project, and not the Senior Resources Svc HUB Feasibility Study (Freeland) project; ((and))(2) No funding may be directed to the Allyn Community Center((.));(3) $1,200,000 of the appropriation is for the Camp Boucher Civil Air Patrol Building Refurbishment, and not the Civil Air Patrol Hanger (Ephrata) project;(4) The Newman Lake Milfoil Wash Station (Newman Lake) project is renamed the Newman Lake Oxygenation System project; and(5) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Craft Beverage (Tumwater) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$309,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($48,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,801,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$48,310,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,017,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($53,327,000))Â Â Â Â Â $53,127,000Sec. 7012. 2023 c 474 s 6033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000139)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1056, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,019,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,222,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$670,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($3,689,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,892,000Sec. 7013. 2024 c 375 s 1002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Energy Retrofits and Solar Power for Public Buildings (40000283)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $14,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.(2) $22,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.(3) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the energy efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works, stand-alone, and emergency projects at facilities owned by agencies that repair or replace existing building systems and reduce greenhouse gas emissions from state operations, including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request.(4) (($4,000,000))$5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington state association of counties to provide funding for energy audits on county-owned tier 1 and tier 2 covered buildings and collect and manage data on the costs for counties to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.27A.210 and 19.27A.250.(a) The Washington state association of counties may award grants to counties with qualifying buildings to assess current energy performance and determine the approximate costs of facility and system upgrades to meet state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27A RCW.(b) The Washington state association of counties shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 31, ((2025))2026, a report detailing the current energy performance of each county-owned tier 1 and tier 2 building for which an energy audit was completed with the funding provided in this subsection (4), and an estimate of the costs for bringing each building into compliance with the state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27 RCW.(c) Up to 12 percent of the amount of the grants awarded in (a) of this subsection may be retained by the Washington state association of counties for administrative costs.(5) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the association of Washington cities to provide funding for energy audits on city-owned tier 1 and tier 2 covered buildings and collect and manage data on the costs for cities to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.27A.210 and 19.27A.250.(a) The association of Washington cities may award grants to cities with qualifying buildings to assess current energy performance and determine the approximate costs of facility and system upgrades to meet state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27A RCW.(b) The association of Washington cities shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2025, a report detailing the current energy performance of each city-owned tier 1 and tier 2 building for which an energy audit was completed with the funding provided in this subsection (5), and an estimate of the costs for bringing each building into compliance with the state energy performance standards in chapter 19.27 RCW.(c) Up to 12 percent of the amount of the grants awarded in (a) of this subsection may be retained by the association of Washington cities for administrative costs.(6) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.(7) If a grant is provided in subsection (1) or (3) of this section to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.(8) Grants provided in subsections (1) through (3) of this section to state agencies are exempt from the match requirements in this section.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($50,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($250,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $251,000,000Sec. 7014. 2023 c 474 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Building Communities Fund Grant Program (40000279)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(3) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:American Legion Veteran Housing and ResourceCenter. . . .$493,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center Renovation. . . .$1,082,000Behavioral Health Clinic. . . .$250,000Benston Hall. . . .$247,000Capital Expansion for Job Skills, Training,Support, and More. . . .$100,000Carl Maxey Center Remodel - Phase 3. . . .$350,000Cham Community Center. . . .$2,050,000Childcare and Development Center Phase II. . . .$200,000CLR Certified Community Behavioral Health Center. . . .$2,446,000Community Meal Program. . . .$672,000Culinary Training Academy and Community EventSpace at HopeWorks. . . .$635,000CYS Marina View Building Renovation. . . .$100,000Eloise's Cooking Pot Food Bank Capital RemodelProject. . . .$243,000Energy Retrofit Project. . . .$135,000Eritrean Community Center Expansion Project. . . .$312,000Expanding Capacity for Workforce Development. . . .$99,000Expansion of and Updates to GLOW Children ELCSpace. . . .$185,000Expansion of Public Food Business Incubator. . . .$100,000Food Bank Renovation. . . .$425,000Food Pantry Renovation in Kittitas County. . . .$473,000Global Neighborhood Building Expansion: EnhancingServices for Local Refugees. . . .$229,000HVAC Replacement for ECEAP Classrooms. . . .$188,000Lake Stevens Food Bank Building. . . .$675,000Landing Youth Service Center. . . .$297,000Latino Arts and Culture Community Center. . . .$90,000Makah Community Gymnasium. . . .$160,000New Family Resource Center Construction. . . .$325,000NEW Health Newport Capital Expansion. . . .$823,000Nisqually Health and Wellness Center Project. . . .$6,000,000North Seattle Family Support Center. . . .$1,090,000((Puyallup Food Bank Facilities. . . .$558,000))RAI Maker Space and Cultural Center. . . .$778,000ReCyclery Infrastructure, Bathroom and ShopImprovement Project. . . .$144,000Scott and Sis Names Family YMCA. . . .$3,000,000Sea Mar CHC - Concrete. . . .$186,000Sea Mar CHC - Elma. . . .$187,000Sedro-Woolley Club Renovation. . . .$100,000SEYFS Renovations. . . .$187,000Snohomish Family Center Improvements. . . .$206,000South Everett/Mukilteo Building Communities. . . .$100,000Step By Step Early Learning Center. . . .$2,622,000Teen Center Building Renovation. . . .$318,000UHeights Community Kitchen, Safety, andAccessibility Project. . . .$250,000Unbridled Spirit: Outdoor Program Space. . . .$68,000United Learning Center. . . .$100,000William Grose Innovation Center. . . .$250,000Yelm Boys & Girls Club Remodel. . . .$100,000YWCA Clark County Community Office Repairs andRenovation. . . .$101,000(4) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to organizations interested in applying for the building communities fund grants.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($30,579,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,021,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$122,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($152,579,000))Â Â Â Â Â $152,021,000Sec. 7015. 2024 c 375 s 1005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCECapital Pre-Development Funding (40000293)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Of the amounts provided in this section, (($3,800,000))$3,783,000 is provided solely for the LETI Incubator for Family Success project in Everett.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,783,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($23,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,783,000Sec. 7016. 2024 c 375 s 1007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $180,663,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this subsection with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.(2) $35,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation and $8,500,000 of the Washington housing trust fund accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021.(3) (($100,000,000))$92,785,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in chapter 216, Laws of 2022. Of the amounts provided in this subsection((:(a))), $5,000,000 is provided solely for the St. Agnes Haven project in Spokane((; and(b) $7,000,000 is provided solely for the CoLead Northgate project in Seattle)).(4) (($60,000,000))$46,680,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $13,320,000 of the state taxable construction accountâstate appropriations((is))are provided solely for awards to organizations eligible under RCW 43.185A.040 for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households throughout the state. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. Eligible organizations may include those that plan to provide housing to socially disadvantaged communities as defined in 13 C.F.R. Sec. 124.103. The department shall strive to invest at least 50 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $1,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Boulevard Townhomes project; and(b) $248,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Crail Cottages project.(5) $25,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:(a) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.(b) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.(c) The funding provided under this subsection (5) is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.(d) The amount awarded under this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.(6) $14,000,000 of the state ((taxable)) building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to acquire mobile or manufactured home communities for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years.(7) $7,000,000 of the state ((taxable)) building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for capital improvements to mobile home or manufactured home communities and includes the following:(a) $5,500,000 is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are "mobile home park cooperatives" or "manufactured housing cooperatives" under RCW 59.20.030 for completing capital improvement processes. Subgrants provided under this subsection may be used solely for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost; and(b) $1,500,000 is provided solely for the Alpine Ridge Utility Upgrades project.(8) (($71,876,000))(a) $78,091,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:African Diaspora Cultural Anchor Village (SeaTac). . . .$4,000,000Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence Shelter. . . .$8,720,000Broadway Senior Housing. . . .$1,000,000Casa MiA: Supporting Housing for Survivors. . . .$1,030,000Cedar House. . . .$112,000CoLead Northgate project in Seattle. . . .$7,215,000Generations Place Workforce Housing. . . .$1,600,000Gravelly Lake Commons at LASA (Lakewood). . . .$500,000((Habitat for Humanity. . . .$6,000,000))KCR Mills Crossing Affordable Housing. . . .$2,000,000Leavenworth Affordable Workforce Rental Housing(Leavenworth). . . . $2,300,000Lewis County Homeless Shelter (Chehalis). . . .$2,500,000Lincoln District Family Housing (Tacoma). . . .$5,050,000Mary's Place Shelter Replacement (Burien). . . .$6,000,000Mount Baker Housing Association Trenton Apartments. . . .$500,000Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000Multicultural Village Design (Kent). . . .$550,000New Hope Family Housing (Seattle). . . .$325,000Peninsula Community Health Housing (Bremerton). . . .$412,000PHPDA Intergenerational Housing. . . .$5,000,000Raymond Manor Low-Income Senior Housing. . . .$1,500,000Redmond Supportive Housing. . . .$3,200,000Saint Vincent de Paul. . . .$1,000,000Shiloh Baptist Church New Life Housing (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000Skyway Affordable Housing (Skyway). . . .$3,000,000Sky Valley Youth Center. . . .$1,153,000Tacoma/Pierce County Habitat Affordable Housing(Pierce County). . . .$14,000,000The House of Bethlehem. . . .$424,000West Klickitat Assisted Living Facility. . . .$3,000,000(b) $6,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following project:Habitat for Humanity (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000(9) $20,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for eligible organizations defined under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire, renovate, and prepare real property for rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, tiny homes, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may only approve funding for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity.(a) Acquisition of multifamily housing is a priority, and the department shall prioritize housing projects that rapidly move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into housing, including, but not limited to, individuals living in unsanctioned encampments, the public rights-of-way, or other public spaces.(b) Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs, supportive services, or debt service.(c) Awards made to tiny homes under this subsection (9) may be made to noncode compliant structures and may be exempted from the 40-year affordability requirement under RCW 43.185A.060.(10) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair grants to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150. The funding may be provided to address nonreoccurring repair projects including repair of units or buildings, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements of affordable housing. Each repair grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization.(a) For purposes of this subsection (10), "affordable housing" means:(i) Permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030; and(ii) Multifamily affordable housing projects in the housing trust fund portfolio.(b) If the department receives application requests that exceed the appropriation level in this subsection (10), the department must prioritize projects under (a)(i) of this subsection.(11) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).(12) The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of the funds provided in this section to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.(13) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($90,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $103,680,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($429,039,000))Â Â Â Â Â $420,359,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$8,500,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($527,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $532,539,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,076,156,000TOTAL. . . .(($2,603,695,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,608,695,000Sec. 7017. 2024 c 375 s 1010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Early Learning Facilities Fund Grant Program (40000300)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $7,350,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.(2) (($46,550,000))$39,830,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate and $6,720,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities revolving accountâstate appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.(3) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(4) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.(5) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.(6) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.(7) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. These projects are not subject to section 8015 of this act or RCW 43.88.150.(8) It is the intent of the legislature to reappropriate funding in the 2023-2025 omnibus capital appropriations act for early learning facilities appropriated in this section.(9) (($37,438,000))$36,138,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:Boys and Girls Club of Lewis County. . . .$1,950,000Brightonview Childcare Expansion. . . .$2,305,000Cora Whitley Family Center (Tacoma). . . . $3,015,000Eastside Early Childhood Center (Bellevue). . . .$1,100,000Lions Park Community Center. . . .$2,550,000Montesano Child Care. . . .$515,000New Tomorrow's Hope Child Development Center(Everett). . . .$1,000,000((Northaven Green Space Restoration. . . .$1,300,000))Northgate Jose Marti Early Learning Center(Seattle). . . . $2,488,000Rainier Valley Early Learning Center (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000ReWA MLK Early Learning Center. . . .$4,252,000Shore Metro Park District Child Care Expansion. . . .$773,000Skyway Affordable Housing and Early LearningCenter (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000Step by Step's Early Learning Center. . . .$515,000Whatcom Meridian Early Learning. . . .$3,000,000YMCA Early Learning Center (Port Angeles). . . . $2,500,000Young Child & Family Center, North Thurston PS(Olympia). . . .$1,000,000YWCA Walla Walla Childcare Center. . . .$175,000(10) $350,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facilities capital readiness pilot program. The department, in partnership with the department of children, youth, and families, shall administer the program as part of the early learning facilities program. The early learning facilities capital readiness pilot program must support no more than 10 licensed early learning providers that will serve children through working connections child care or through the early childhood education and assistance program to study the feasibility of expanding, remodeling, purchasing, or constructing early learning facilities and classrooms. Participants must receive small grants and project support to conduct capital feasibility studies that cover financing, architectural design, construction, business operations, and other relevant topics. Participants must also have access to professional consultation related to financing, architectural design, construction, and business operations.Appropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .(($91,688,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,668,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesRevolving AccountâState. . . .$6,720,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$90,388,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$366,752,000TOTAL. . . .(($458,440,000))Â Â Â Â Â $457,140,000Sec. 7018. 2024 c 375 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) ((The))Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:57th Ave Sewer Project (University Place). . . .$200,000ACT Historic Landmark Roof Restoration (Seattle). . . .$539,000ADA For Northwest Center Janitorial (SpokaneValley). . . .$20,000Admiral Theatre Facility Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$165,000Affordable Housing Land Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$1,500,000Afterschool Program Expansion (Walla Walla). . . .$45,000Agricultural Innovation Center (Pasco). . . .$200,000Airlift Northwest Hangar(East Wenatchee). . . .$1,700,000Airway Heights Public Safety (Airway Heights). . . .$1,340,000Algona Wetland Preserve Interpretive Trail(Algona). . . .$600,000American Indian Community Center (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000American Legion Post 79 Roof Replacement(Snoqualmie). . . .$49,000Anderson Island Multipurpose Building (AndersonIsland). . . .$258,000Angleside Reservoir Capacity Upgrades (Shelton). . . .$1,850,000Arlington Commercial Kitchen (Arlington). . . .$581,000ARTE NOIR Capital Construction Completion(Seattle). . . .$381,000Asbestos Abatement Old City Hall (Benton City). . . .$309,000Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$515,000Ashley House (Tacoma). . . .$500,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000ASUW Shell House (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000Athletic Field Lights For Ridgefield Outdoor(Ridgefield). . . .$250,000Auburn Avenue Theater Rebuild (Auburn). . . .$1,545,000Avista Stadium Improvements (Spokane Valley). . . .$543,000B5 Community Learning Center (Kennewick). . . .$773,000Ball Field at Historic Petes (Enumclaw). . . .$439,000Ballard Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring Replacement(Seattle). . . .$49,000Behavioral Health Wellbeing Clinic (Spokane). . . .$1,571,000Bonney Lake Senior Center Rehab Project (BonneyLake). . . .$650,000Boys & Girls Club Parking Lot Renovation (FederalWay). . . .$168,000Boys & Girls Club Seismic Upgrade & RoofReplacement (Vancouver). . . .$412,000Brewster Boys and Girls Club Facility (Brewster). . . .$300,000Bridge Meadows Pre-Development (Tacoma). . . .$515,000Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic ViolenceShelter (Yakima). . . .$125,000Browse Infrastructure (Seattle). . . .$144,000Camp Thunderbird Wastewater Treatment Facility(Olympia). . . .$618,000Cannery Parking Lot & Sidewalk Rehab (Anacortes). . . .$110,000Capitol Land Trust Public Access Preconstruction(Olympia). . . .$77,000Cathlamet Waterfront Park (Cathlamet). . . .$86,000Cedarwood Community Recreation Ctr Redevelopment(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,123,000Celebration Park Synthetic Turf Upgrade (FederalWay). . . .$822,000Center Senior Living Housing Development (GrandCoulee). . . .$361,000Central Colville Apartments (Colville). . . .$52,000Central Whidbey Fire & Rescue Station 53(Coupeville). . . .$2,750,000Centralia Quad Infield Turf Project (Centralia). . . .$2,480,000Chehalis River Raw Water (Chehalis). . . .$250,000Chelan Butte Acquisition Feasibility Study(Chelan). . . .$125,000Children's Therapy Center (University Place). . . .$500,000Chinese Reconciliation Project Design (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000City Hall Structural Assessment (Toledo). . . .$53,000City of Longview Mint Valley Golf CourseIrrigation Replacement (Longview). . . .$2,000,000City of Othello Lions Park (Othello). . . .$600,000City of Selah Wastewater Treatment PlantImprovements (Selah). . . .$1,442,000City of Sequim Park Acquisition (Sequim). . . .$375,000Clallam Joint Public Safety Facility (PortAngeles). . . .$5,750,000Cloney Inclusive Playground (Longview). . . .$1,000,000Colfax Community Center (Colfax). . . .$72,000Colfax Pool (Colfax). . . .$1,030,000Columbia Grove Community Playground (EastWenatchee). . . .$72,000Columbia Play Project Children's Museum(Vancouver). . . .$515,000Commercial Pumpouts to Save Puget Sound(Anacortes). . . .$800,000Communications Devices for Officials (Olympia). . . .$15,000Community Center at Lake Chelan (Chelan). . . .$1,723,000Community Center Roof Replacement (Aberdeen). . . .$165,000Community Homes Renovations 41st LD (Bellevue). . . .$106,000Community Homes Renovations 45th LD (Woodinville). . . .$77,000Community Homes Renovations 48th LD (Bellevue). . . .$243,000Community Homes Upgrades 1st LD (Bothell). . . .$104,000Conconully Service Complex/Fire Hall (Conconully). . . .$2,050,000Coupeville Food Bank & Workforce HousingApartments (Coupeville). . . .$230,000Cross Kirkland Corridor 132nd Avenue NEImprovements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000Day Island Bridge Design Project (UniversityPlace). . . .$200,000Des Moines Marina Steps (Des Moines). . . .$1,000,000deWilde Rugby Fields (Ferndale). . . .$150,000Diking District 7 Fish Passage and Levee(Stanwood). . . .$1,900,000Dishman Hills Conservancy Education Ctr SitePlanning (Spokane). . . .$46,000Double Culvert Replacement (Castle Rock). . . .$2,000,000Downtown Pasco North Plaza (Pasco). . . .$155,000Eagle Track Raceway Stadium Light Project(Republic). . . .$117,000East Hill North Community Park Phase 1 (Kent). . . .$1,000,000Eaton Urban Pathway Project (Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000Ebey Waterfront Trail Phase 4 (Marysville). . . .$1,030,000Edmonds Boys & Girls Clubs Capital Project(Edmonds). . . .$1,385,000Edmonds Center for the Arts Design (Edmonds). . . .$200,000Ejidos Community Farm (Everson). . . .$824,000El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Campus (FederalWay). . . .$1,545,000Electron Way & Contra Costa Ave IntersectionImprovemt (Fircrest). . . .$153,000Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,030,000Emergency Operation Generator (Coupeville). . . .$386,000Emergency Shelter Capital Improvements (Shelton). . . .$103,000Enumclaw Community Center (Enumclaw). . . .$500,000Evans Creek Relocation Project (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000EWAM Handicap Parking Improvement Project(Pomeroy). . . .$98,000Fair Building Improvements (Graham). . . .$77,000Fall City Business District Septic Project (FallCity). . . .$1,550,000Family Resource Center at Cedar Crossing (Seattle). . . .$360,000Felts Field Gateway Improvement (Spokane). . . .$515,000Ferndale Civic and Community Organization Campus(Ferndale). . . .$3,050,000Ferry County Fairgrounds (Republic). . . .$50,000Fife Aquatic & Community Center Improvements(Fife). . . .$1,500,000Fire Panel Replacement & Integration (Seattle). . . .$294,000FISH Food Bank Expansion (Ellensburg). . . .$573,000Foothills Trail Crossing at Main Street (Buckley). . . .$128,000Forest Park Pickleball Court Installation(Everett). . . .$345,000Free Clinic & Central Construction Project (WallaWalla). . . .$515,000Frontier Park Horse Cover (Graham). . . .$1,388,000Ft Steilacoom Park Nisqually Indian TribeImprovements (Lakewood). . . .$309,000Gibson Hall Improvement Project (Issaquah). . . .$206,000Glen Tana (Spokane). . . .$3,000,000Golden Tiger Multi-Use Trail Phase 2 (Republic). . . .$168,000Goldendale Municipal Airport - Land Acquisition(Goldendale). . . .$361,000Greater Wenatchee Irrigation Dist Infrastructure(East Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000Greenwood Early Learning Playground (Seattle). . . .$69,000Greg Cuoio Park Accessibility Improvements (Lacey). . . .$515,000Harbour Point Boulevard Pathway (Mukilteo). . . .$258,000Harlequin Theater Renovation (Olympia). . . .$700,000Heritage Center at Meeker Mansion (Puyallup). . . .$496,000Heritage Heights Remodel and Conversion to MedicalCare (Chelan). . . .$824,000High Prairie Fire District 14 EmergencyPreparedness (Lyle). . . .$248,000Highland Park Improvement Club Rebuild (Seattle). . . .$500,000Historic Lamar Cabin Preservation (Prescott). . . .$267,000HUB Sports Fields (Liberty Lake). . . .$1,030,000ICOM 911 Microwave Radio Broadband System (((OakHarbor))). . . .$500,000Indian American Community Services CommunityCenter (Kent). . . .$794,000Interurban Trail War Memorials (Pacific). . . .$400,000Issaquah Senior Ctr Veterans Memorial ConsolidatedPrk (Issaquah). . . .$721,000Japanese American Exclusion Memorial Vis Ctr(Bainbridge Island). . . .$350,000Jarstad Aquatic Center Assessment & Roof Repair(Bremerton). . . .$309,000Jenkins Creek Recreation Trail (Covington). . . .$250,000Kalama Creek Hatchery Renovation (Olympia). . . .$3,350,000KCFD #50 Generator (Baring). . . .$20,000Kelso School District-Construction & RenovationProjects (Kelso). . . .$165,000Kelso Train Station Roof Replacement (Kelso). . . .$575,000Kennewick Kiwanis Playground (Kennewick). . . .$258,000King County Sheriff's Office Air Support Unit(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000King Street Station Creative Youth Empowerment Hub(Seattle). . . .$500,000Kirkland Boys & Girls Clubs Community Playfield(Kirkland). . . .$150,000Kirkland Performance Center Safety Improvements(Kirkland). . . .$1,288,000Kitsap Humane Society Veterinary Lifesaving Center(Silverdale). . . .$412,000Klineline Bridge and ADA Improvements (Vancouver). . . .$1,365,000Kulshan View (Mount Vernon). . . .$309,000Lacamas Lake Water Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000Lake Boren CrossTown Recreational Trail(Newcastle). . . .$824,000Lake Chelan Food Bank Building Remodel & Addition(Chelan). . . .$2,000,000Lake Hills Clubhouse Renovation (Bellevue). . . .$583,000Lake Wilderness Arboretum Improvements (MapleValley). . . .$450,000Lakebay Marina (Lakebay). . . .$300,000Lambert House Flood Abatement & FoundationReplacement (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000Larson Playfield Irrigation Conversion (MosesLake). . . .$258,000Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project (Latah). . . .$180,000Latino Community Service Center (((Lynnwood))). . . .$515,000Lester Creek Personnel to Water Intake (Pe Ell). . . .$640,000Lewis County Senior Centers (Chehalis). . . .$500,000Lincoln County Fair and Livestock (Davenport). . . .$1,000,000Local Grain Conveyance & Storage System (Tumwater). . . .$255,000Logistics Facility (Vancouver). . . .$874,000Lynden Senior and Community Center (Lynden). . . .$309,000Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000Lyon Creek Culvert at SR 104 (Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,820,000Madison Street School Sidewalk Project (SouthBend). . . .$175,000Manson Fire Station - Training Room and LivingQuarters (Manson). . . .$206,000Marine Spills Operations Base (Friday Harbor). . . .$210,000Marshall Park Inclusive Community Playground(Vancouver). . . .$685,000Mason County Jail Expansion (Shelton). . . .$1,030,000Mason PUD 1 Vuecrest Water System Storage Project(Union). . . .$618,000Mason PUD Water Infrastructure (Matlock). . . .$1,000,000Masonic Building Roof Renovation (Centralia). . . .$170,000Mays Pond Playground (Bothell). . . .$650,000Medical Lake Storm Water Mitigation (Medical Lake). . . .$1,000,000Medically-Tailored Meals & Groceries Expansion(Seattle). . . .$1,175,000Memorial Stadium (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000Menastash Grange Revitalization and Expansion(Ellensburg). . . .$85,000Mental Health Quiet Room (Moses Lake). . . .$31,000Mill Creek City Hall North Renovation (Mill Creek). . . .$515,000Mill Creek Multiuse Recreational Property (MillCreek). . . .$1,030,000MLK Jr. Resource & Technology Center (Pasco). . . .$250,000MLK Jr.Park & Swimming Pool (Yakima). . . .$1,160,000Modernization of Pacific County Jail Facility(South Bend). . . .$464,000Monroe Therapeutic Facility (Monroe). . . .$1,100,000Montesano Economic Development (Montesano). . . .$700,000Mt. Spokane Ski & Snowboard Park (Mead). . . .$100,000Mukilteo First Responder Wellness Center(Mukilteo). . . .$258,000Muslim American Youth Foundation Center (Burien). . . .$500,000National Nordic Museum East Garden Capital Project(Seattle). . . .$258,000Nespelem Community Longhouse (Nespelem). . . .$1,850,000New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$440,000No. County Rec. Association Youth Sports (CastleRock). . . .$256,000Nooksack Community Housing (Deming). . . .$470,000North Fork Skykomish River 911 Extension Project(Index). . . .$420,000North Seattle Boys & Girls Clubs FlooringReplacement (Seattle). . . .$134,000NW Stream Center Sustainable Infrastructure(Everett). . . .$273,000Oak Harbor Boys & Girls Club Sports Court (OakHarbor). . . .$250,000Oak Harbor Economic Development (Oak Harbor). . . .$621,000ODT Land Purchase (Port Townsend). . . .$750,000Old Fort Lake Subarea Remediation & Public AccessProj (DuPont). . . .$215,000Othello's Regional Water Plan (Othello). . . .$412,000Parkland School (Parkland). . . .$500,000Pasado's Safe Haven Water and Safety Upgrades(Monroe). . . .$485,000Pasco Boulevard Soccer Field (Pasco). . . .$750,000Pasco Clubhouse Safety Modernization (Pasco). . . .$840,000Peninsula Medical Respite & Housing Center(Bremerton). . . .$1,000,000Peninsula Senior Activity (Ocean Park). . . .$272,000PenMet Parks Community Recreation Center (GigHarbor). . . .$1,030,000Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$730,000Pierce County Food Hub (Bonney Lake). . . .$300,000Pike Place Market Elevator & Stair Replacement(Seattle). . . .$515,000Plaza Retreat Space (Vashon). . . .$544,000Pond to Pines Infrastructure (Ellensburg). . . .$518,000Port Gamble Shoreline Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$2,400,000Port of Allyn Public Pier Replacement (Allyn). . . .$515,000Port of Anacortes T-Dock Reconfiguration(Anacortes). . . .$1,000,000Port of Mattawa Event Center Phase 3 UpgradeProject (Mattawa). . . .$361,000Port of Skamania Cascades Business Park (NorthBonneville). . . .$1,000,000Port of Willapa Harbor (South Bend). . . .$800,000Port Orchard Breakwater Replacement (Port Orchard). . . .$1,000,000Port Remediation (Olympia). . . .$2,200,000Portland Avenue Park Sprayground (Tacoma). . . .$500,000Poulsbo Historical Society - Nilsen-Sonju House(Poulsbo). . . .$300,000Prosser City Entrance Sign (Prosser). . . .$110,000Public Works Facility & Vehicle Storage (SedroWoolley). . . .$500,000Puyallup Elks Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$370,000Rainier Court Phase V (Seattle). . . .$750,000Raze Development Capital Project (Spokane). . . .$500,000Redondo Fishing Pier Replacement Phase 1 (DesMoines). . . .$1,000,000Refugee Welcoming & Healing Center (SeaTac). . . .$515,000Regional Athletic Complex Transformer Upgrade(Olympia). . . .$103,000Regional Water & Sewer UpgradesMason County. . . .$250,000Rejuvenation Community Day Center (Bremerton). . . .$200,000Remembrance Gallery (Puyallup). . . .$257,000Renovation and Addition to RP Theater Building(Richland). . . .$350,000Renton Public Square (Renton). . . .$1,485,000Republic Community Library (Republic). . . .$183,000Reservoir Capacity & Seismic (Battle Ground). . . .$1,288,000Ritzville Legion Hall Renovation (Ritzville). . . .$165,000Ritzville Rodeo Bleachers Replacement (Ritzville). . . .$194,000Ritzville Theater (Ritzville). . . .$75,000Rock Creek Horse Park (Ravensdale). . . .$206,000Roslyn Old City Hall Community Center (Roslyn). . . .$77,000Rotary Boys & Girls Clubs HVAC Replacement(Seattle). . . .$309,000Rotary Morrow Community Park (Poulsbo). . . .$100,000Roy Water Preliminary Design (Roy). . . .$250,000Sail Sand Point (Seattle). . . .$258,000Sam Chastain Trail (Renton). . . .$500,000School Based Health Care Facility (Tacoma). . . .$515,000Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland(Woodland). . . .$350,000Scriber Place Housing for Homeless Students(Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000Search & Rescue Headquarters Feasibility Study(Snoqualmie). . . .$103,000Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000Seattle Public Library Holds Pick-Up Locker(Seattle). . . .$93,000Seattle Public Theater Accessibility Upgrades(Seattle). . . .$77,000Security & Access Improvements (Shelton). . . .$250,000Sentinel Gap Community Park (((Mattawa))). . . .$1,000,000Sewer Pump Station 12 & Force Main (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000Shelton Day Care & Building Project (Shelton). . . .$215,000Short's Farm Purchase (Chimacum). . . .$1,000,000Skagit PUD 10th District Waterlines (Skagit). . . .$650,000Skagit PUD 39th District Waterline Relocations(Mt. Vernon). . . .$600,000Skagit PUD Headquarters Public Meeting Room (Mt.Vernon). . . .$206,000Slavonian Hall (Tacoma). . . .$472,000Snohomish Boys & Girls Club Teen Center(Snohomish). . . .$412,000Snohomish Public Safety & City Services Campus(Snohomish). . . .$700,000Snoqualmie Indian Tribe Consultation(Snoqualmie). . . .$150,000Snoqualmie Valley Youth Center Barn with Storage(North Bend). . . .$232,000South Seattle Community Food Hub (Seattle). . . .$499,000South Thurston Fire & EMS New Fire Station(Tenino). . . .$3,050,000South UGA Water and Sewer Extensions (Kennewick). . . .$1,122,000South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$360,000Southwest Boys & Girls Clubs Safety & SecurityImprove (Seattle). . . .$3,000SPARC Capital Campaign (Mount Vernon). . . .$750,000Spokane Civic Theatre Facility (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000Spokane International Airport (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000Spokane Scale House Market (Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000Spring Box Replacement/Water (Concrete). . . .$450,000St. Mary Medical Center (Walla Walla). . . .$75,000Stanwood Art Center Design (Stanwood). . . .$327,000Stonerose Fossil Center (Republic). . . .$721,000Storm Upgrades Downtown Phase N2 (Puyallup). . . .$696,000Sue Bird and Lenny Wilkens Statues (Seattle). . . .$412,000Sultan Basin Park (Sultan). . . .$500,000Sumas Ave Water Pipe Replacement (Sumas). . . .$150,000SW WA Agricultural Business (Tenino). . . .$1,250,000Swede Hall Renovation Project (Rochester). . . .$198,000Take-A-Break Park Playground (Maple Valley). . . .$412,000Tam O'Shanter Multi-Purpose Court Fencing andLighting (Kelso). . . .$46,000Taproot Theatre Jewell Mainstage Renovation(Seattle). . . .$515,000Tasveer Art Center (Bellevue). . . .$258,000Tenino Stone Carvers Guild Workshop and Classroom(Tenino). . . .$160,000Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project(Aberdeen). . . .$3,500,000Thun Field - Emergency Response and Meeting Space(Puyallup). . . .$1,000,000Town of Elmer City Fire Station Improvements(Elmer City). . . .$537,000Town of Index Water Line Repair and Replacement(Index). . . .$628,000Township Hall North & West (Spokane). . . .$100,000Tribal Cultural Center & Museum Restoration(Steilacoom). . . .$200,000Tugboat Parthia Pavilion Construction (Olympia). . . .$148,000Tukwila Community Center HVAC Replacement(Tukwila). . . .$515,000Tukwila Immigrant & Refugee Wadajir LandAcquisition (Tukwila). . . .$2,250,000Tulalip Creek Hatchery (Marysville). . . .$1,000,000United Way Elevator and Disability Access (Tacoma). . . .$129,000Van Zandt Community Hall Renovation (Deming). . . .$502,000Veterans Memorial Balfour Park (Spokane Valley). . . .$207,000VFW Post 2224 Critical Renovations (Puyallup). . . .$206,000Village Theatre's Francis J Gaudette HVACReplacement (Issaquah). . . .$489,000Wallace Heights Septic Elimination Program(Vancouver). . . .$500,000Washougal Civic Campus Project (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000Washtucna Town Hall (Washtucna). . . .$20,000Wastewater Lift Stations (Concrete). . . .$450,000Wastewater Treatment Facility & Loss Project(Carbonado). . . .$500,000Wastewater Treatment System Upgrades (Long Beach). . . .$340,000Waterfront Organic Soil Removal (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000Weld Seattle Reentry Resource Center (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000Wenatchee Valley Museum Expansion and Redesign(Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$1,030,000West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000Whatcom Ag Research Station (Lynden). . . .$764,000What-Comm Dispatch Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000White Bluffs Rail/Rail Replacement (Richland). . . .$1,250,000White Center Community Hub (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000White Center Food Bank Renovation (Seattle). . . .$275,000Wilkeson Infrastructure (Wilkeson). . . .$824,000Windermere Park Playground (Longview). . . .$155,000WRF Upgrades Solid Side (Yelm). . . .$442,000Yakama Nation "Creator Law Sculpture" (Roslyn). . . .$99,000Yakima Co Fire Emergency Responder Radio System(Yakima). . . .$139,000Yakima County Fire District 12 Wildfire Response(Yakima). . . .$38,000Yakima County Meals on Wheels (Union Gap). . . .$1,000,000Yakima Trolley Museum (Yakima). . . .$25,000Youth Assist Program Skills Training Center(Tacoma). . . .$500,000Youth Emergency Shelter (Longview). . . .$250,000Zillah Park Renovation (Zillah). . . .$300,000(9) The model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port of Vancouver Dock Demo and Removal of Creosote project in Vancouver.(10) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the Lakebay Marina (Lakebay) project in this section.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$229,543,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$233,043,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$916,800,000TOTAL. . . .$1,149,843,000Sec. 7019. 2024 c 375 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025 Local and Community Projects (40000614)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) ((The))Except as provided for under subsection (14) in this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) (($58,862,000))$58,162,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:192nd & Hemlock Public Engagement and Design Program. . . .$129,00023rd & Cherry Fellowship Hall RenovationPre-development. . . .$110,000Abu Bakr Youth Center Renovation. . . .$350,000Adams County Evidence Processing & Public SafetyImprovements. . . .$1,000,000African Business Innovation Center. . . .$25,000Alatheia Capacity Building Capital Project. . . .$150,000Aquatic Center At Martin Luther King Jr. Park. . . .$75,000Auburn Downtown Plaza Design/Development. . . .$258,000Bainbridge Island Senior/Community Center. . . .$100,000Battle Ground Health Care Clinic. . . .$400,000Battle Ground Senior Center. . . .$309,000Benaroya Hall Street Front Poster Boxes. . . .$200,000BIPOC Farm Fresh HUB. . . .$103,000Bremerton Mason County Sewer Expansion. . . .$3,000,000Buckley Foothills Trailhead Doc Tait Pavilion. . . .$52,000Buddhist Temple Arson Restoration. . . .$225,000California Creek Estuary Park Expansion. . . .$185,000Chamber of Commerce Historical Archive. . . .$38,000Charter Park Master Plan Bathroom. . . .$52,000Chelan County Hazard Mitigation. . . .$98,000Chimacum Grange Hall Roofing Replacement. . . .$26,000Chinese American Legacy Artwork Project. . . .$25,000City of Bonney Lake ADA Accessible Playground. . . .$151,000City of Lacey Regional Public Safety Training Center. . . .$50,000City of Mill Creek Veteran's Monument Expansion &Memorial. . . .$258,000City of Roy Water Infrastructure. . . .$300,000City of Sequim Park Acquisition. . . .$171,000CLC Childcare Fire Alarm System. . . .$77,000Coastal CAP Fire Remodel. . . .$515,000((Columbia Basin Rodeo Association. . . .$258,000))Columbia Grange #87 Safety Improvements. . . .$25,000Commercial Platform Lift. . . .$17,000Connections Mental Health. . . .$44,000Cougar Mountain Zoo Indoor Educational Exhibit Space. . . .$206,000Council for the Homeless Building Rehabilitation. . . .$200,000Coupeville Boy and Girls Club Pathway. . . .$36,000Crescent Grange Hall Urgent Roof Repairs. . . .$103,000Crosby Community Center Restoration. . . .$412,000Davenport Senior Center Capital Improvement. . . .$120,000Des Moines Marina Electrification. . . .$100,000District Distributed Antenna System Installation. . . .$258,000Douglas Building HVAC Replacement. . . .$110,000Downtown Camas Lighting Transformation Project. . . .$300,000DV Shelter and Advocacy Center HVAC Upgrade. . . .$100,000Eatonville Community Track & Field Restrooms. . . .$300,000Edmonds BGC Capital Project. . . .$300,000Elevator Purchase and Installation. . . .$274,000Ellensburg Community Fieldhouse. . . .$72,000Emergency Communications Radio Microwave. . . .$235,000Engineering and Surveying of Essential Fire Recovery. . . .$300,000Eritrean Community Center Expansion. . . .$100,000Everest Park Facilities Update. . . .$300,000Everett Labor Temple Roof. . . .$500,000FACYV and APIC Building. . . .$103,000FareStart Job Training & Social Enterprise CapitalImprovements. . . .$300,000Fire Station 41 Headquarters. . . .$300,000Fire Station Restoration. . . .$314,000Firefighting PPE Decontamination CO2 DemonstrationProject. . . .$100,000Florence Robison North Park Equipment Replacement. . . .$173,000Foss Waterway Seaport Esplanade Connector. . . .$185,000Gage Academy of Art South Lake Union Building. . . .$100,000Garfield Super Block. . . .$3,000,000GCA Dignity Completion. . . .$112,000Glenwood Little League Facility Improvements. . . .$50,000Goldsborough Switching Station. . . .$52,000Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment. . . .$3,000,000Granger Community Electric Sign. . . .$31,000Granite Falls Boys & Girls Club. . . .$103,000Grant County Bleachers. . . .$258,000Green Waste Recycling at Point Roberts. . . .$94,000Idylwood Beach Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$215,000Inclusive Playground at Cirque Park. . . .$258,000Institute for Black Justice. . . .$75,000Intergenerational Community and Expanded AquaticCenter. . . .$206,000Japanese American Exclusion Visitor Center - I. . . .$300,000Kalama Community Building Architectural Survey. . . .$62,000Kelso Rotary Park. . . .$72,000KidsQuest Children's Museum Stories of Water. . . .$350,000Kirkland BGC Upgrades and Expansion. . . .$128,000KVH Surgical Services Clinic Remodel. . . .$100,000La Center Wheel Club Community Center Remodel. . . .$250,000Lake Sacajawea Irrigation Pump. . . .$200,000Lakebay Marina Renovation and Historic Preservation. . . .$206,000Latah Valley Fire Station. . . .$350,000Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project. . . .$187,000Lincoln Creek Grange #407. . . .$81,000Little Saigon Landmark. . . .$100,000Lopez Food Center. . . .$197,000Lynnwood Convention Center Expansion. . . .$400,000Main Street. . . .$42,000Manson Grange Hall Improvement Project. . . .$193,000Maple Valley Permanent Message Boards. . . .$200,000Mason PUD No. 1 ((Lilliwaup Corner Project))Utility Relocation Projects. . . .$1,800,000Matlock Grange Safety & Structure Improvements. . . .$90,000Medical Equipment Bank - Building. . . .$250,000Mt View Grange. . . .$100,000Municipal Services Campus Design & Infrastructure. . . .$103,000Murakami Building. . . .$100,000Nespelem Community Park. . . .$52,000New Facility for South Kitsap Helpline. . . .$250,000Next Chapter Maroon Village. . . .$315,000NEYFS Creativity Project. . . .$93,000North Mason Food Bank Relocation. . . .$47,000Northside Flood Reduction and Open Spaces. . . .$223,000Northaven Green Space Restoration. . . .$1,300,000NWYS PAD Shelter Whatcom County. . . .$250,000Oak Harbor Recreation Center Feasibility Study. . . .$200,000Ohop Grange Insulation & Electrical Upgrades. . . .$36,000Olalla Recovery Centers Facility Improvements. . . .$250,000Old Swim Hole Revitalization Project. . . .$206,000Omak Arena LED Lighting Project. . . .$185,000Open Doors for Multicultural Families. . . .$5,000,000Operation GROW - A Regional Processing Facility for WA. . . .$42,000Oroville Grange Drainage Remediation. . . .$62,000Othello Water Supply. . . .$400,000Parkwood Community Club Repairs. . . .$232,000PAWS Community Support Center. . . .$250,000Pea Patch Community Campus. . . .$360,000People's Community Center. . . .$400,000Perry Tech for Clean Energy Jobs. . . .$5,000,000Pierce Center for Arts & Technology. . . .$129,000Port of Benton Inland. . . .$240,000Port of Quincy Business & Event Center Upgrade. . . .$309,000Port of Skagit Granary Expansion. . . .$125,000Preserve and Maintain RTOP Theatre. . . .$77,000Prosser Clubhouse. . . .$105,000Providence Academy Elevator & Rehabilitation. . . .$103,000Public Dock Emergency Repair. . . .$41,000Puget Sound Estuarium Property. . . .$250,000Rainier Beach Family Empowerment Center. . . .$100,000Redmond Academy Renovations. . . .$87,000Regional Sports Complex-Site Evaluation andPre-Design. . . .$300,000Rehab and Care Center Shower Renovation. . . .$206,000Rejuvenation Community Day Center. . . .$500,000Renovations for Children's Developmental Center. . . .$174,000Republic Library and Community Center. . . .$315,000Resurface and Revitalize Prescott Public Pool. . . .$98,000Riverwalk Sports and Entertainment Facility. . . .$309,000Rose Valley Grange Capital Improvement. . . .$40,000Roza Drought Funding. . . .$200,000Ruston Community Center Repairs & ADA Improvements. . . .$360,000School Playground Renovation. . . .$258,000Seattle Aquarium Ocean Pavilion. . . .$400,000Seattle Black Panther Legacy Project. . . .$200,000Seattle Storm Center. . . .$500,000Sheffield Trail. . . .$100,000Shelton Multi-Use Trail. . . .$206,000Skagit PUD Olsen Creek Waterline Relocation. . . .$300,000Skamania County Public Safety Radio System. . . .$200,000South Camano Grange #930. . . .$132,000South End Community Center. . . .$200,000South King Cultural Public Market. . . .$77,000South Seattle Community Food Hub. . . .$135,000South Yakima Avenue Senior Housing. . . .$400,000Southwest Washington Fair Equestrian Facility. . . .$206,000Spokane CD Gray and Oregon Road Forest Fire Recovery. . . .$975,000Spokane Scale House Market & Kitchen. . . .$300,000Spokane Valley Cross Country Course. . . .$150,000Stanwood Police Station. . . .$100,000Summit Park Sewer Upgrade Project. . . .$103,000Sunnyside Beach Park Beach Nourishment Project. . . .$103,000Sunnyside Safe Haven Baby Box. . . .$16,000SVE Expansion Equipment & Furnishing. . . .$108,000SW Youth & Family Services HVAC Replacement. . . .$165,000Tekoa Parks and Recreation. . . .$200,000Terrain Cultural Hub. . . .$207,000Town of Index Safety and ADA Access Improvements. . . .$25,000Transload Area Sewer. . . .$515,000Tristate Health Hospital. . . .$1,000,000Tukwila Health & Wellness Center. . . .$25,000((Tumwater Mazama Pocket Gopher Habitat Acquisition andRestoration. . . .$2,000,000))Uplift Northwest's Beacon of Hope. . . .$300,000Vancouver Family Resource Center Expansion. . . .$200,000Vancouver Waterfront Gateway Event Plaza. . . .$197,000W. Valley Centennial Middle School Field Fences &Dugout. . . .$32,000WA Soldier's Home Cemetery Pavement & ParkingExtension. . . .$72,000Wahkiakum PUD - Puget Island Water Source Project. . . .$309,000Waitsburg Childcare Center. . . .$100,000Wallace Heights Septic Elimination. . . .$515,000Washington Masonic Services Library & Museum Remodel. . . .$47,000Water Treatment Facility Project. . . .$920,000Water Valve-Pipeline, Intersection Replacement. . . .$103,000Water Way 18 Dock Replacement. . . .$250,000West Echo Lake Public Engagement and Design Program. . . .$129,000Western Ranchettes Water Distribution System. . . .$150,000Wilkeson Town Hall Renovation. . . .$134,000Yakima Trolley Carbarn Fire Suppression System. . . .$197,000Yakima Valley Local Crime Lab Facility. . . .$200,000Yelm Activated Alleyway. . . .$46,000(9) $5,122,000 of the model toxics control stormwater accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Boat Haven Stormwater Improvement. . . .$3,100,000Silver Bay Logging Property Acquisition. . . .$1,250,000City of Puyallup Stormwater. . . .$772,000(10) $4,641,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:APCC Asbestos Abatement. . . .$286,000Spokane and Pend Oreille County Gray and OregonRoad Fire Cleanup. . . .$3,500,000PFAS Treatment at City of DuPont Water Wells. . . .$855,000(11) $500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $100,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Langley Library Historic Preservation project.(12) $40,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Temple Association Energy Efficiency Improvements project.(13) In addition to the requirements in subsection (5) of this section, the contract for the Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment (Seattle) project must require that the redevelopment of the property into affordable housing under subsection (8) of this section be completed within 10 years of the contract execution.(14) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the Lakebay Marina Renovation and Historic Preservation project in this section.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,641,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$5,122,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($59,362,000))Â Â Â Â Â $58,662,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$140,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($69,265,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,565,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$237,448,000TOTAL. . . .(($306,713,000))Â Â Â Â Â $306,013,000Sec. 7020. 2024 c 375 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community EV Charging (40000622)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) Except as provided in subsections (10) and (11) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.(2) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.(3) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.(4) Grant funding must be used for level two or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including, but not limited to, construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.(5) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:(a) Multifamily housing;(b) Publicly available charging at any location;(c) Schools and school districts;(d) State and local government buildings and office buildings;(e) All other eligible projects.(6) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.(7) The department may:(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.(8) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project. (9) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.(10) (($412,000))$1,304,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Town of Steilacoom Electrical Charging StationInfrastructure. . . .$103,000EV Chargers Federal Way Community Center. . . .$309,000Interim CDA I5 EV Chargers in City of Seattle. . . .$892,000(11) The department may directly reimburse a state agency for costs to review proposed construction on property leased by the state.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$105,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$420,000,000TOTAL. . . .$525,000,000Sec. 7021. 2024 c 375 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 FIFA World Cup (40000650)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(((a))) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects for capital improvements required to host the 2026 World Cup in Seattle:University of Washington Practice Field. . . .$2,577,000Seattle University Practice Field. . . .$1,017,000Washington State Public Stadium Authority. . . .$6,406,000(((b)))(2) As a condition of receiving moneys, Seattle University must provide one-to-one matching funds for the improvement of the practice field and make the practice field available as needed for the 2026 World Cup.(((2) The stadium world cup capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purpose of advancing funds, to the extent needed, to the Washington state public stadium authority for capital improvements required to host the 2026 FIFA World Cup. Loan and repayment terms must be in accordance with the provisions of section 9, chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6098), Laws of 2024.))Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000((Stadium World Cup Capital AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($20,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,000,000Sec. 7022. 2024 c 375 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects:Algae Carbon Sequestration and Regenerative Soils. . . .$2,500,000((C6 Forest to Farm Biochar Pilot Plant(Leavenworth)))Chelan County Processing Facilityfor Wood Biomass / Small Diameter Wood. . . .$1,425,000College Place Fire Department Energy Efficiency. . . .$1,137,000Douglas PUD Storage & Fuel Cell. . . .$1,348,000Great Northern School District HVACInstallation (Spokane). . . .$1,613,000HAPO Community Center. . . .$3,000,000Kenmore Public Works Geothermal System. . . .$464,000KVH Hydrogen Storage System. . . .$300,000Meydenbauer Center Energy Efficiency (Bellevue). . . .$6,000,000Outdoor Fields LED Retrofit and Solar Installation(Tukwila). . . .$500,000Nisqually Indian Tribe Microgrid System. . . .$8,600,000Process Water Reuse Facility (Pasco). . . .$5,050,000Small Faces Preschool HVAC Upgrades (Seattle). . . .$435,000Squaxin Island Tribe Blue Carbon Sequestration. . . .$3,050,000SW Youth & Family Services HVAC Replacement. . . .$273,000Tacoma Power Grid Upgrades & Feasibility Study. . . .$2,875,000Waterfront Low Carbon District Energy System(Bellingham). . . .$100,000(2) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(3) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(4) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(((5)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.(b) If the climate commitment account or the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.))Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$31,695,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$6,975,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$38,670,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$87,396,000TOTAL. . . .$126,066,000Sec. 7023. 2024 c 375 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Youth Shelters and Housing (91001682)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Community Youth Services (Olympia). . . .$200,000((Housing and Services for Youth Wellness (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000))New Horizons (King County). . . .$75,000OlyCap Pfeiffer House (Port Townsend). . . . $97,000ROOTS Young Adult Shelter Phase 2 Renovations(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000Safe Harbor Support Center (Kennewick). . . .$300,000Serenity House (Port Angeles). . . .$50,000Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$1,200,000Skagit Valley Family YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$2,200,000VOA Crosswalk 2.0 (Spokane). . . .$2,500,000YouthCare (Seattle). . . .$2,500,000(2) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(3) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(4) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($15,622,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,622,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$62,488,000TOTAL. . . .(($78,110,000))Â Â Â Â Â $73,110,000Sec. 7024. 2024 c 375 s 6007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEInfrastructure Projects (91001687)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that:(1) $618,000 of the reappropriation is for the Port of Mattawa Water Infrastructure (Mattawa) project, and not the Port of Mattawa Wastewater Infrastructure (Mattawa) project;(2) No funding may be directed to the Dryden Wastewater Improvement project;(3) No funding may be directed to the New Well for the Community of Peshastin project;(4) The Fall City Waste Management System total appropriation is adjusted from $6,500,000 to $7,536,000; ((and))(5) $1,030,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the Skamania PUD Water Tank Replacement project; and(6) The coronavirus state fiscal recovery accountâfederal appropriation for the Packwood sewer system is reduced to $1,607,000.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$25,714,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .(($94,106,000))Â Â Â Â Â $87,166,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$485,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,087,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($130,392,000))Â Â Â Â Â $123,452,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,908,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($137,300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $130,360,000Sec. 7025. 2024 c 375 s 6018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEProjects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.(2) The reappropriation for any project for which the department has not executed a contract by December 31, 2023, shall lapse. The department shall provide a list of lapsed projects to the legislative fiscal committees no later than January 15, 2024.(3) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, funding for the Seabrook Trail project has lapsed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($559,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,102,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($31,661,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,137,000Sec. 7026. 2023 c 474 s 6074 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1030, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.(2) The reappropriation for any project for which the department has not executed a contract by December 31, 2023, shall lapse. The department shall provide a list of lapsed projects to the legislative fiscal committees no later than January 15, 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,917,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,829,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$123,002,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($128,919,000))Â Â Â Â Â $124,831,000Sec. 7027. 2024 c 375 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPublic Facility Improvement Fund (92001367)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $24,000,000 of the youth athletic facility accountâstate appropriation and $1,162,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects:Bellingham: Joe Martin Stadium. . . .$700,000City of Everett: New Stadium. . . .$7,400,000((Lower Columbia College: David Story Field. . . .$1,300,000))Lower Columbia College: Softball Facilities. . . .$700,000Pasco: Gesa Stadium. . . .$3,000,000Port Angeles: Civic Field. . . .$600,000Ridgefield: Ridgefield Outdoor Recreational Complex. . . .$450,000Spokane County: Avista Stadium. . . .$5,800,000Tacoma: Cheney Stadium. . . .$3,000,000Walla Walla: Borleske Stadium. . . .$525,000Wenatchee Valley College: Paul Thomas Sr. Field. . . .$700,000Wenatchee Valley College: Softball Facilities. . . .$462,000Yakima County: Yakima County Stadium. . . .$525,000(2) The funding appropriated under this section must be combined with local funds.(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) $360,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for administrative costs.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $222,000Youth Athletic Facility AccountâState. . . .$24,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($25,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,222,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($25,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,222,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7028. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEAnaerobic Digester Development (92001947)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $10,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for cost share agreements regarding anaerobic digester development and maintenance projects at dairies. Grants awarded must have at least a 15 percent nonstate match and be awarded through a competitive process that considers:(a) The amount of greenhouse gas reduction expected to be achieved by the proposal; and(b) The amount of untreated effluent expected to be reduced by the proposal.(2) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington State University energy extension program to provide technical assistance in the administration of the competitive grant process and to provide ongoing support to dairies and digester operators regarding opportunities to enhance digester function, advance nutrient recovery, and improve the economic sustainability of on-farm digesters.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$11,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$44,000,000TOTAL. . . .$55,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7029. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEBroadband Infrastructure Federal Match Projects (92001948)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $114,034,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely as match for federal authority allocated under this section for the statewide broadband office to administer the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), or a substantially similar successor federal program. Expenditure of the amount appropriated in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding.(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the office shall provide state matching funds only for projects where the lead applicant is a public or tribal government entity. The office must allocate state matching funds in a manner that prioritizes projects based on affordability, fair labor practices, speed to deployment, open access, local and tribal coordination, and the provision of digital navigation services, as outlined in the scoring criteria contained in the plan submitted by the statewide broadband office to the national telecommunications and information administration.(c) The legislature intends to provide sufficient funds to match federal funds available. To the extent that appropriated state funds are insufficient to satisfy federal matching requirements for federal funds, the department must secure from subgrantees such additional cash, in-kind contributions, or other eligible forms of match as are necessary to provide sufficient funds in order to meet federal matching requirements.(2) To the extent permitted by federal law, in addition to scoring and weighting criteria established pursuant to the federal broadband equity, access, and deployment program, or a substantially similar successor federal program, the state broadband office must establish additional secondary selection criteria, including, but not limited to, criteria that give weight to projects that:(a) Provide open-access wholesale last-mile broadband service for the useful life of the subsidized networks on fair, equal, and neutral terms to all potential retail providers; and(b) Demonstrate support from the local government or any tribal government with oversight over the location or locations to be served.(3) To the extent permitted by federal law, up to $300,000 of the federal broadband accountâfederal appropriation provided in this section is for a staff position dedicated to advising the statewide broadband office on the availability and feasibility of deploying new and emerging technologies in broadband internet service.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$114,034,000Federal Broadband AccountâFederal. . . .$1,227,743,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,341,777,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,341,777,000Sec. 7030. 2023 c 474 s 6087 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTFircrest School Land Use Assessment (92000035)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1100, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($165,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$335,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $338,000Sec. 7031. 2023 c 474 s 1044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESElevator Modernization (30000786)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Plaza Garage, Elevator #4. . . .(($1,417,000))Insurance - Elevator No. 1. . . .(($932,000))Leg - Elevator No. 5. . . .(($2,229,000))Leg - Elevator No. 6. . . .(($2,229,000))TOJ - Elevator No. 1. . . .(($886,000))Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,316,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,229,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,545,000Appropriation:Capitol Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,693,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,846,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,084,000Sec. 7032. 2024 c 375 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESWashington Building (40000331)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)$150,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of a plan and necessary steps to vacate and dispose of the Washington building and property. No later than September 15, 2024, the department must submit to the governor and the capital committees of the legislature a timeline and proposed budget for each item below that includes:(a) A plan to relocate the current tenants of the building on or near the capitol campus. In identifying space, the department must also look to space that may be currently leased but is being underutilized. The plan must include a statement of the revenue for each of the current tenants;(b) Improvements and maintenance necessary for the comfort and safety of the current tenants until the building can be vacated;(c) Preservation of the building pending disposal of either the building or property, or both; and(d) Recommendations for the most efficient use of the building and property that minimizes the cost to the state.(2) The department must work with legislative support services to identify space that meets the long-term needs of the tenants.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $301,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($1,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $301,000Sec. 7033. 2024 c 375 s 1044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Campus Modernization (92000020)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((1059, chapter 296, Laws of 2022))1044, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives' executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.(4) If the department receives information, after value engineering has been performed, that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5), (6), or (7) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:(a) Provide at least three options that do not include square footage reduction to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, prior to proceeding with a reduced cost option; and(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.(5) $25,651,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement design and construction subproject on opportunity site six west. The department must:(a) Start Newhouse building construction by July 1, 2023;(b) Complete Newhouse building construction by October 31, 2024; and(c) Consult with the leadership of the senate, or their designees, at least every month, beginning July 1, 2023.(6) (($84,593,000))$85,542,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject. The legislature intends to provide funding in the amount of (($134,097,000))$135,043,000 over the course of the 2023-2025 and the 2025-2027 fiscal biennia for design and construction of this project. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the department may enter into a multibiennium contract for the construction of the subproject. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to make an expenditure without an appropriation. (7) (($11,872,000))$10,923,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $1,000,000 of the climate commitment actâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the ((visitor))capitol lot (opportunity site six east), 15th avenue southwest, the John A. Cherberg parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, the John L. O'Brien parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, and Water street site work.(8) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for Newhouse parcel soil decontamination.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$72,346,000Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$2,665,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$75,011,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$122,116,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$124,116,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,925,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($49,504,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,501,000TOTAL. . . .(($263,556,000))Â Â Â Â Â $263,553,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7034. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLSS - Dolliver Building Relocation (91000474)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for relocation costs, including design, permitting, and renovation costs, associated with moving Legislative Support Services to the Dolliver building.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$340,000TOTAL. . . .$840,000Sec. 7035. 2024 c 375 s 1047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTTri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,421,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$265,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,686,000Appropriation:((General FundâFederal. . . .$2,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($944,000))Â Â Â Â Â $244,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,944,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,010,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($20,640,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,940,000Â Â Â Â Â Sec. 7036. 2023 c 474 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTSnohomish Readiness Center (30000930)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$3,872,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,406,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,278,000Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .(($2,196,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,196,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,707,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,407,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($3,903,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,603,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$637,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($9,818,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,518,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7037. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTTumwater Field Maintenance Shop (40000367)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$3,900,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$480,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,380,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,597,000TOTAL. . . .$49,977,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7038. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONNorthwest Region Training Facility Renovation and Upgrades (40000042)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,082,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7039. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONCafeteria Water Damage Repairs (40000043)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$200,000Sec. 7040. 2023 c 474 s 2032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHPublic Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,131,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($53,452,000))Â Â Â Â Â $53,498,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$998,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($58,581,000))Â Â Â Â Â $58,627,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7041. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHImprove Critical Water Infrastructure (40000058)Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .$50,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 7042. 2023 c 474 s 2036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2023-25 DWSRF State Match (40000066)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department shall require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development agency.Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($3,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,468,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$69,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($72,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $70,468,000Sec. 7043. 2024 c 375 s 2011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHHannah Heights PFAS Contaminated Well and Water Supply (92000210)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($2,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,979,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($2,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,979,000Sec. 7044. 2024 c 375 s 6023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$424,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$326,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,550,000Sec. 7045. 2023 c 474 s 6244 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYRemedial Action Grant Program (30000216)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($15,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,865,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$47,404,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($62,659,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,269,000Sec. 7046. 2023 c 474 s 6251 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYEastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($4,684,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,649,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,124,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($7,808,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,773,000Sec. 7047. 2023 c 474 s 6252 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYRemedial Action Grants (30000458)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section ((3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.))3010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($9,421,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,404,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,584,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($44,005,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,988,000Sec. 7048. 2023 c 474 s 6310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000378)((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7050 of this act.))Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($10,273,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,251,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$299,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($10,572,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,550,000Sec. 7049. 2023 c 474 s 3007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Affordable Housing Cleanup Grant Program (40000480)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $3,985,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the 35th Street Landfill project. If funding provided for this project is not under contract by June 30, 2025, the funds provided in this subsection (1) shall lapse.(2) $1,805,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the SEED Murakami Project. Funding in this subsection is contingent upon the lapse of funding for the 35th Street Landfill project in subsection (1) of this section.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($12,259,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,205,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($49,036,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,820,000TOTAL. . . .(($61,295,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,025,000Sec. 7050. 2024 c 375 s 3004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY((Eastside Fire and Rescue Pilot))Lower Issaquah Valley PFAS Cleanup (40000618)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7051. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYState Parks Relocation to Ecology Headquarters Building (40000718)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,618,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,618,000Sec. 7052. 2023 c 474 s 3041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$72,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($574,000))Â Â Â Â Â $523,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,772,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($2,418,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,367,000Sec. 7053. 2023 c 474 s 6344 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONField Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($538,000))Â Â Â Â Â $420,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,210,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($1,748,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,630,000Sec. 7054. 2023 c 474 s 6345 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,732,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$339,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($691,000))Â Â Â Â Â $710,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($2,441,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,781,000Sec. 7055. 2024 c 375 s 3011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Worden ((Energy Efficiency Update))Geothermal Heating (40000457)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,000,000TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000Sec. 7056. 2023 c 474 s 6359 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2021-23 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000017)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($31,583,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,412,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,667,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($40,250,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,079,000Sec. 7057. 2024 c 375 s 3019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000023)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state conservation commission may expend the state building construction accountâstate appropriation ((and natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation)) in this section as grants to private land owners who were enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program, and whose acreage meets state program goals of providing riparian habitat or hydrologically connected wetland enhancements in salmon-bearing streams as determined by the Washington state department of fish and wildlife, but are now disenrolled due to a contract termination by the United States department of agriculture (USDA) farm service agency, or who voluntary terminated their enrollment as a result of the USDA farm service agency audit.Appropriation:((Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$11,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($75,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $64,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7058. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2023-25 Alternative Manure Management (40000052)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the commission to provide financial and technical assistance for alternative manure management project development and implementation.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000Sec. 7059. 2023 c 474 s 3134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESLand Appraisals (92000057)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to conduct land appraisals of parcel number 55161.9025 located in the City of Liberty Lake in Spokane county and the Geiger field property operated by the national guard and located at the Spokane international airport. The department shall complete the land appraisals and provide the legislature with findings by December 1, 2023.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($40,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($40,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,000Sec. 7060. 2024 c 375 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREState Lands Assessment (91000011)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $200,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of natural resources, to perform an assessment of unused and underutilized state-owned, unimproved lands to determine the suitability of such lands for agricultural purposes, including grazing. For the purposes of this section, "underutilized state-owned lands" means lands that do not assist in meeting the goals of the state agency that owns or manages the land and that are already being considered for sale or surplus. "Underutilized state-owned lands" does not include state-owned lands held under lease, held in trust, or that are otherwise intended for specific purposes.(2) (($100,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to incorporate into the assessment an examination of the use of such lands for agrivoltaics. For the purposes of this section, "agrivoltaics" means the use of land that intentionally integrates agriculture and solar photovoltaic energy generation.(3))) The department must complete the assessment by June 1, 2025, and must submit it to the governor, the commissioner of public lands, the director of the Washington State University energy program, the director of the department of commerce, and the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over agricultural matters.(((4)(a) Subsection (2) of this section takes effect January 1, 2025.(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then subsection (2) of this section is null and void on December 31, 2024, and the amount appropriated in this section from the climate commitment accountâstate shall lapse.))Appropriation:((Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$100,000))State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$200,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$300,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $200,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7061. A new section is added to 2024 c 375 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLVancouver Crime Lab Chiller Replacement (40000097)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$988,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$988,000Sec. 7062. 2024 c 375 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 School Construction Assistance Program (40000063)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($117,522,000))$44,145,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation, $169,871,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation, and $1,500,000 of the common school construction accountâfederal appropriation in this section are provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.(2) $4,757,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years, and for the acquisition of art pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must consult with the department of enterprise services and the department of commerce to identify cost-effective steps for new buildings and building modernization projects to comply with the clean buildings act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$174,628,000Common School Construction FundâFederal. . . .$1,500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($117,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,145,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($293,650,000))Â Â Â Â Â $220,273,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,050,097,000TOTAL. . . .(($2,343,747,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,270,370,000Sec. 7063. 2023 c 474 s 6537 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2021-23 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (5933) (92000923)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($100,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,051,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($100,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,051,000Sec. 7064. 2024 c 375 s 5003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Small District & Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000065)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($191,646,000))$173,543,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Of this amount, (($86,000,000))$74,000,000 is provided solely for small district modernization grants, not to exceed $6,000,000 per grant, to school districts that were awarded a planning grant during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium pursuant to LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1.1-2023, developed ((April 10, 2023))March 31, 2025. Small districts awarded a planning grant pursuant to this list that do not receive a modernization grant in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium are eligible for the maximum state funding level of $12,000,000 established under subsection (5)(a) of this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report the status and award amounts of all grants awarded pursuant to this section to the governor and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than October 15, 2024.(2) $2,307,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with estimated total project costs of $6,000,000 or less or $12,000,000 or less, as applicable under this section.(3) $12,145,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.(4) (($6,800,000))$3,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy assessment grants for small school districts eligible under RCW 28A.525.159. Grant funding awarded may be used to perform facility energy assessments of instructional buildings.(5)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by October 15, 2024. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $12,000,000 per project; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources.(b) In addition to the standard list required in (a) of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction shall also submit an alternative list with the agency's request for capital appropriations for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium that includes small school districts with 3,000 students or less, with a state funding level not to exceed $12,000,000 per project. This list must include the following information: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources.(6)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection (6), the appropriations in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1.1-2023, developed ((April 10, 2023))March 31, 2025, and in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2024, developed March 2, 2024.(b) To the extent that the amounts appropriated for small districts and state-tribal compact schools specified in the LEAP capital documents in (a) of this subsection exceed the actual costs of funding these projects, the department may reallocate excess funding to eligible projects pursuant to RCW 28A.525.159. However, the total funding appropriated to eligible small district projects must remain allocated to eligible small district projects, and the total funding appropriated to eligible state-tribal compact school projects must remain allocated to eligible state-tribal compact school projects.(7)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, $1,982,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for preconstruction grants and administrative implementation pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1044.(b) If Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (capital assistance/schools) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection is instead provided solely for small district modernization grants, not to exceed $6,000,000 per grant, to school districts that were awarded a planning grant during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium pursuant to LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1.1-2023, developed ((April 10, 2023))March 31, 2025.(8) In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, school districts receiving a small district modernization grant under this section may not combine this grant funding with a school construction assistance program grant or combine other grants awarded under this section to fund a single project.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($6,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,800,000Common School Construction AccountâState. . . .(($195,935,000))Â Â Â Â Â $177,832,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$12,145,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($214,880,000))Â Â Â Â Â $193,777,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($2,727,220,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,642,808,000TOTAL. . . .(($2,942,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,836,585,000Sec. 7065. 2023 c 474 s 6492 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEMWenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,974,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,258,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,397,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($32,371,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,655,000Sec. 7066. 2023 c 474 s 6505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEMBellevue: Center for Transdisciplinary Learning and Innovation (40000168)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$41,749,000Appropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,032,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($42,781,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,781,000Sec. 7067. 2023 c 474 s 5080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEMWenatchee: Center for Technical Education and Innovation (40000198)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,949,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($46,471,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,187,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,317,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($49,737,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,453,000Sec. 7068. 2023 c 474 s 5083 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEMMinor Works - Preservation (23-25) (40000630)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Community and Technical College CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$1,200,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,724,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($28,724,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,924,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$114,896,000TOTAL. . . .(($143,620,000))Â Â Â Â Â $144,820,000Sec. 7069. 2023 c 474 s 8019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERS(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to thewater pollution control revolving accountâstate, up to$17,500,000 for fiscal year 2024 and up to $17,500,000for fiscal year 2025. . . .$35,000,000(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transferto the drinking water assistance accountâstate, up to(($1,750,000))$1,468,000 for fiscal year 2024 ((andup to $1,750,000 for fiscal year 2025)). . . .(($3,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,468,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7070. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2024 c 375 s 1004 (uncodified);(2) 2024 c 375 s 3020 (uncodified);(3) 2023 c 474 s 1013 (uncodified);(4) 2023 c 474 s 1033 (uncodified);(5) 2023 c 474 s 6006 (uncodified);(6) 2023 c 474 s 6071 (uncodified); and(7) 2023 c 474 s 6088 (uncodified).(End of part)PART 8MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are $76,105,816 for the 2025-2027 biennium, $425,999,496 for the 2027-2029 biennium, and $655,708,813 for the 2029-2031 biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.(3) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a parking lot replacement. (4) Community and technical colleges: (a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $18,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct student housing. (b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds College for up to $9,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire student housing. (c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Technical College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire and renovate an eastside training facility.(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to continue renovations in Building J.(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an athletic field and related support amenities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8003. (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $10,000,000. For purposes of this section, "total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.(4) For projects exceeding the $10,000,000 predesign threshold established in this section, the office of financial management may make an exception to some or all of the predesign requirements in this section. The office of financial management shall report any exception to the fiscal committees of the legislature:(a) A description of the major capital project for which the predesign waiver is made;(b) An explanation of the reason for the waiver; and(c) A rough order of magnitude cost estimate for the project's design and construction.(5) In deliberations related to submitting an exception under this section, the office of financial management shall consider the following factors:(a) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding the site of the project;(b) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding whether the project will involve renovation, new construction, or both;(c) Whether, within six years of submitting the request for funding, the agency has completed, or initiated the construction of, a substantially similar project;(d) Whether there is any anticipated change to the project's program or the services to be delivered at the facility;(e) Whether the requesting agency indicates that the project may not require some or all of the predesign requirements in this section due to a lack of complexity; and(f) Whether any other factors related to project complexity or risk, as determined by the office of financial management, could reduce the need for, or scope of, a predesign.(6) If under this section, some or all predesign requirements are waived, the office of financial management may instead propose a professional project cost estimate instead of a request for predesign funding.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8004. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.(2) Agencies must develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. Agencies must choose the most reasonable and cost-effective solution, as supported by the life-cycle cost analysis. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8005. Agencies administering construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $10,000,000 must submit progress reports to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st of each year in a format determined by the office of financial management. After the project is completed, agencies must also submit a closeout report that identifies the total project cost and any unspent appropriations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8006. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8007. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the fiscal committees of the legislature by the office of financial management at least 30 days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within 30 days from the date of transfer.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8008. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8009. Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity, and minimizes greenhouse gas emissions. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:(1) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Consider all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.(2) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.(3) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, target reducing energy use by 50 percent below prerenovation baseline.(4) On-site renewable energy: Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.(5) High-efficiency electric equipment: Use only high-efficiency electric equipment for water and space heating needs not met through on-site renewable energy, when life-cycle cost effective.(6) Measurement and verification: For buildings over 50,000 square feet, install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Where appropriate, install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.(7) Benchmarking: Compare performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8010. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8011. Executive Order No. 21-02, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective April 7, 2021. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of projects on cultural resources and historic properties proposed in state-funded construction or acquisition projects, including grant or pass-through funding that culminates in construction or land acquisitions. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated early in the project planning process, prior to construction or taking title.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8012. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSIONâART WORK ALLOWANCE.(1) One-half of one percent of the moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.(2) One-half of one percent of the moneys appropriated in this act for original construction, or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.(3) One-half of one percent of the moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.(4) At least 75 percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art; no more than 20 percent may be expended for program administration; and no more than four percent may be expended to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection.(5) Beginning with new appropriations made in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, art allocations not expended by the end of the second full fiscal biennium from the issuance of a certificate of occupancy shall lapse, except for art allocations made under K-3 class size reduction grants under section 6313 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8013. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8014. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8015. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8016. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state treasurer, on behalf of the state finance committee, to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 ((H-2081.3/25) state general obligation bonds and related accounts) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account, or any other account receiving taxable bond proceeds, to the state building construction account may be made.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8017. (1) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,500,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be initially allotted until agencies submit project lists to the office of financial management for review and approval.(2) Revisions to the project lists, including the addition of projects and the transfer of funds between projects, are allowed but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment, and must include an explanation of variances from prior approved lists. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.(3)(a) All minor works projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided.(b) Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,500,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects.(c) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (3)(c) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting 10 days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.(d) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than 25 percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.(e) Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.(4) In the 2027-2029 capital budget instructions, the office of financial management shall increase the minor works threshold to $2,000,000, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $4,000,000. It is the intent of the legislature to increase the minor works threshold for the 2027-2029 biennial budget to $2,000,000, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $4,000,000.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8018. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8019. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERS(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the water pollution control revolving accountâstate, up to $20,500,000 for fiscal year 2026 and up to $20,500,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$41,000,000(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transferto the drinking water assistance accountâstate, up to $12,500,000 for fiscal year 2026 and up to $12,500,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$25,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8020. On July 1, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer $21,307,000 of federal funding, or as much thereof as is remaining, from the appropriation in section 7017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023 to the federal broadband account created in RCW 43.330.400 (section 8036 of this act).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8021. The department of natural resources must coordinate with the department of social and health services on any long-term, revenue-generating opportunities it pursues on the Fircrest campus for the purpose of structuring projects to have the least impact on the clients served by the residential habilitation center and on the center's daily operations to the greatest extent possible.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8022. (1)(a) The director of the office of financial management, or the director's designee, shall collect a list of clean energy projects from state agencies that may qualify for elective payment under P.L. 117-169 (inflation reduction act of 2022), such as the purchase of electric vehicle fleets; alternative fuel vehicle refueling and charging; and renewable energy projects including wind, solar, geothermal, electrolytic hydrogen, and energy storage.(b) For tax years 2025 and 2026, the director or director's designee shall work with agencies, including institutions of higher education, to complete all steps necessary to file an annual tax return with the United States internal revenue service on behalf of the state in order to claim elective payments.(2) The office of financial management shall provide a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2026, that summarizes the state's tax return submitted that year, including the total dollar value of projects included in the tax return and the total dollar amount of direct pay tax credits sought. The report must also include an itemized list of the projects that displays the dollar amounts and types of tax credits sought.(3) Funds received by the state pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the inflation reduction elective pay account created in RCW 43.79.572.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8023. In order to accelerate the reduction of embodied carbon and improve the environmental performance of construction materials, agencies shall, whenever possible, review and consider embodied carbon reported in environmental product declarations when evaluating proposed structural materials for construction projects.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8024. Any agency receiving appropriations in this act from climate commitment act accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280 must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures as described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.Sec. 8025. RCW 79A.25.210 and 2024 c 375 s 8007 are each amended to read as follows:The firearms range account is hereby created in the state general fund. Moneys in the account shall be subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for purchase and development of land, construction or improvement of range facilities, including fixed structure construction or remodeling, equipment purchase, safety or environmental improvements, noise abatement, and liability protection for public and nonprofit firearm range training and practice facilities.Grant funds shall not be used for expendable shooting supplies, or normal operating expenses. In making grants, the board shall give priority to projects for noise abatement or safety improvement. Grant funds shall not supplant funds for other organization programs.The funds will be available to nonprofit shooting organizations, school districts, and state, county, or local governments on a match basis. All entities receiving matching funds must be open on a regular basis and usable by law enforcement personnel or the general public who possess Washington concealed pistol licenses or Washington hunting licenses or who are enrolled in a firearm safety class.Applicants for a grant from the firearms range account shall provide matching funds in either cash or in-kind contributions. The match must represent one dollar in value for each one dollar of the grant except that in the case of a grant for noise abatement or safety improvements the match must represent one dollar in value for each two dollars of the grant. In-kind contributions include but are not limited to labor, materials, and new property. Existing assets and existing development may not apply to the match.Applicants other than school districts or local or state government must be registered as a nonprofit or not-for-profit organization with the Washington secretary of state. The organization's articles of incorporation must contain provisions for the organization's structure, officers, legal address, and registered agent.Organizations requesting grants must provide the hours of range availability for public and law enforcement use. The fee structure will be submitted with the grant application.Any nonprofit organization or agency accepting a grant under this program will be required to pay back the entire grant amount to the firearms range account if the use of the range facility is discontinued less than ten years after the grant is accepted.Entities receiving grants must make the facilities for which grant funding is received open for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes on a regular basis for no fee.Government units or school districts applying for grants must open their range facility on a regular basis for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes.The board shall adopt rules to implement chapter 195, Laws of 1990, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses) and chapter 282, Laws of 2017 (SB 5268) (concealed pistol license notices). During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses).During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may also appropriate moneys in the firearms range account to the department of natural resources for recreational target shooting pilot sites as provided in section 3032, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the application and matching funds requirements of this section do not apply to the recreational target shooting pilot sites in section 3032, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Sec. 8026. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2023 c 474 s 8023 are each amended to read as follows:The board is hereby empowered:(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the ((2023-2025))respective fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.Sec. 8027. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2023 c 474 s 8024 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). ((During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2023-2025 ((biennium))and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.Sec. 8028. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2023 c 474 s 8025 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. ((During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2023-2025 ((biennium))and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.Sec. 8029. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2023 c 474 s 8026 are each amended to read as follows:The board is hereby empowered:(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the ((2023-2025))respective fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.Sec. 8030. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2023 c 474 s 8027 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing 12 months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any 12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. ((During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2023-2025 ((biennium))and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.Sec. 8031. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2023 c 474 s 8028 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing 12-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any 12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. ((During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) During the 2023-2025 ((biennium))and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.Sec. 8032. RCW 39.35D.030 and 2023 c 474 s 8029 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the grant application process prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this section.(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to the department on major facility projects and operating savings.(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The department shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.(5) For the purposes of determining compliance with the requirement for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one additional point for a project that uses wood products with a credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act. For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard under this section.(6) During the ((2021-2023 and)) 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, an alternative high-performance building certification, as determined by the legislature, may be used instead of the LEED silver building design, construction, and certification standard required by this section.Sec. 8033. RCW 43.07.410 and 2023 c 474 s 8030 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington state library-archives building account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 36.18.010(12), 36.22.175(3), and 43.07.370(3) must be deposited in the account. Except for during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building. During the ((2023-2025))2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the secretary of state may spend up to (($8,000,000))$5,177,000 from the account for costs associated with the design and construction of the state library-archives building and for costs necessary to prepare the building for occupancy. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.Sec. 8034. RCW 43.88D.010 and 2023 c 474 s 8034 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By October 1st of each even-numbered year, the office of financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed by the public four-year institutions of higher education and submit the results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees and the four-year institutions. Each project must be reviewed and scored within one of the following categories, according to the project's principal purpose. Each project may be scored in only one category. The categories are:(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth at all campuses, at existing or new university centers, or through distance learning. Growth projects should provide significant additional student capacity. Proposed projects must demonstrate that they are based on solid enrollment demand projections, more cost-effectively provide enrollment access than alternatives such as university centers and distance learning, and make cost-effective use of existing and proposed new space;(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings. Facilities that cannot be economically renovated are considered replacement projects. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being replaced and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;(c) Projects that renovate facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current program requirements. Renovation projects should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful life. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being renovated and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;(d) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;(e) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation through expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation of specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and(f) Other project categories as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall establish a scoring system and process for each four-year project category that is based on the framework used in the community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff from the state board for community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions shall provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and process.(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution project proposals, and may also solicit participation by independent experts.(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must, at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends, reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if applicable, and impact on space utilization.(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the predesign, design, or construction funding phase.(c) To the extent possible, the objective analysis and scoring system of all capital budget projects shall occur within the context of any and all performance agreements between the office of financial management and the governing board of a public, four-year institution of higher education that aligns goals, priorities, desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission, accountability, and levels of resources.(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the office of financial management shall take into consideration project schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget instructions. The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall develop common definitions that four-year institutions must use in developing their project proposals and lists under this section.(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial management;(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the joint legislative audit and review committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.(7) By August 1st of each even-numbered year each public four-year higher education institution shall prepare and submit prioritized lists of the individual projects proposed by the institution for the ensuing six-year period in each category. The lists must be submitted to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may aggregate minor works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking purposes. Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the aggregated proposal, and supporting documentation, including project descriptions and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.(8) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, by November 1, 2022, the office of financial management must score higher education capital project criteria with a rating scale that assesses how well a particular project satisfies those criteria. The office of financial management may not use a rating scale that weighs the importance of those criteria.(9) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and in lieu of the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, by August 15, 2022, the institutions of higher education shall prepare and submit or resubmit to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees:(a) Individual project proposals developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;(b) Individual project proposals scored in prior biennia pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and(c) A prioritized list of up to five project proposals submitted pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection.(10) The requirements of this section are suspended during the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia. ((However, instead of these requirements, the public four-year institutions of higher education must submit additional supporting information for major project funding requests for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium that is equivalent to the information produced for the 2022 higher education scoring process under subsection (9) of this section. Examples of the information required under this subsection include, but are not limited to, measures of: (a) Space efficiency, (b) reasonableness of project cost, (c) facility condition, and (d) anticipated impacts of the requested major projects on projected degree totals. The public four-year institutions of higher education shall consult with the office of financial management and legislative fiscal staff regarding the implementation of this requirement and the content of the additional information.))Sec. 8035. RCW 43.155.070 and 2021 c 65 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To qualify for financial assistance under this chapter the board must determine that a local government meets all of the following conditions:(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility plan; and(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into consideration local employment and economic factors.(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive financial assistance under this chapter unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or receiving financial assistance under this chapter if such request is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 may apply for and receive financial assistance under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before executing a contractual agreement for financial assistance with the board.(3) In considering awarding financial assistance for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board must consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.(4)(a) The board must develop a process to prioritize applications and funding of loans and grants for public works projects submitted by local governments. The board must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in prioritizing projects:(i) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of many people;(ii) The extent to which the project leverages other funds;(iii) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;(iv) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;(v) Whether the project promotes the sustainable use of resources and environmental quality, as applicable;(vi) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes systems;(vii) Whether the project encourages economic development through mixed-use and mixed income development consistent with chapter 36.70A RCW;(viii) Whether the system is being well-managed in the present and for long-term sustainability;(ix) Achieving equitable distribution of funds by geography and population;(x) The extent to which the project meets the following state policy objectives:(A) Efficient use of state resources;(B) Preservation and enhancement of health and safety;(C) Abatement of pollution and protection of the environment;(D) Creation of new, family-wage jobs, and avoidance of shifting existing jobs from one Washington state community to another;(E) Fostering economic development consistent with chapter 36.70A RCW;(F) Efficiency in delivery of goods and services and transportation; and(G) Reduction of the overall cost of public infrastructure;(xi) Whether the applicant sought or is seeking funding for the project from other sources; and(xii) Other criteria that the board considers necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.(b) Before September 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, the board must develop and submit a report regarding the construction loans and grants to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives. The report must include:(i) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested for public works projects;(ii) A list and description of projects approved in the preceding fiscal year with project scores against the board's prioritization criteria;(iii) The total amount of loan and grants disbursements made from the public works assistance account in the preceding fiscal year;(iv) The total amount of loan repayments in the preceding fiscal year for outstanding loans from the public works assistance account;(v) The total amount of loan repayments due for outstanding loans for each fiscal year over the following ten-year period; and(vi) The total amount of funds obligated and timing of when the funds were obligated in the preceding fiscal year.(c) The maximum amount of funding that the board may provide for any jurisdiction is ten million dollars per biennium, except that during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the maximum amount per jurisdiction may be exceeded by up to $2,000,000 for emergency public works projects awarded pursuant to RCW 43.155.065.(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments may not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant must provide documentation of attempts to secure additional local or other sources of funding for each public works project for which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.(6) Before September 1st of each year, the board must develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a description of the loans and grants made under RCW 43.155.065 and 43.155.068.(7) The board may not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the legislature has appropriated funds to the board for the purpose of funding public works projects under this chapter.(8) To qualify for loans, grants, or pledges for solid waste or recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70A.205 RCW.(9) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the effects of stormwater or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.(10) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its public works assistance account program loan or grant.(11) The board must implement policies and procedures designed to maximize local government consideration of other funds to finance local infrastructure.Sec. 8036. RCW 43.330.400 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The federal broadband ((mapping)) account is ((established))created in ((the custody of)) the state ((treasurer. The department shall deposit into the account such))treasury. All receipts from funds received from legislative appropriation or transfer, federal funding, and ((donated funds from private and public sources))moneys directed to the account from any other lawful source, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for ((the purposes of RCW 43.330.403 through 43.330.409. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures))broadband activities authorized under federal law and for nonfederal match requirements.(2) ((The department is the single eligible entity in the state for purposes of the federal broadband mapping activities.(3))) Federal funding received by the department from the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) or a substantially similar successor federal program, must be deposited into the account for broadband ((mapping)) activities and must be used in accordance with any federal requirements and, subject to those requirements, may be distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities in the state.(((4) The department shall consult with the office of financial management and the utilities and transportation commission in coordinating broadband mapping activities. In carrying out any broadband mapping activities, the provisions of P.L. 110-385, Title I, regarding trade secrets, commercial or financial information, and privileged or confidential information submitted by the federal communications commission or a broadband provider are deemed to encompass the consulted agencies.))Sec. 8037. RCW 79.70.100 and 2024 c 375 s 8012 are each amended to read as follows:The department shall hold a public hearing in the county where the majority of the land in a proposed natural area preserve is located prior to establishing the boundary. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to section 3034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to section 3011, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (section 3011 of this act).Sec. 8038. RCW 79.71.060 and 2024 c 375 s 8013 are each amended to read as follows:The department shall hold a public hearing in the county where the majority of the land in the proposed natural resources conservation area is located prior to establishing the boundary. An area proposed for designation must contain resources consistent with characteristics identified in RCW 79.71.020. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to section 3034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to section 3011, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (section 3011 of this act).Sec. 8039. RCW 28A.525.159 and 2020 c 299 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) School construction assistance program grants for small school districts and state-tribal education compact schools must be determined in accordance with this section.(2) Eligibility. School districts and state-tribal education compact schools with enrollments that are less than or equal to ((one thousand))1,000 students are eligible for small school district modernization grants. The advisory committee specified in subsection (4)(a) of this section may recommend amendments to the eligibility threshold as they learn more about the characteristics of school districts and state-tribal education compact schools that are unable to modernize their aging school facilities. Districts with incomplete information in the inventory and condition of schools data system are not eligible to apply for construction grants but may apply for planning grants.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must assist eligible school districts and state-tribal education compact schools that are interested in applying for a small school district modernization grant under this section by providing technical assistance and planning grants within appropriations for this purpose. Districts and state-tribal education compact schools seeking planning grants must provide a brief statement of the school condition, its deficiencies, student enrollment, student achievement measures, and financial limitations of the district or state-tribal education compact school. If applications for planning grants exceed funds available, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may prioritize the recipients of planning grants in order to help districts and state-tribal education compact schools with the most serious apparent building deficiencies, and the most limited financial capacity.(4) Prioritized construction grants and advisory committee.(a) The superintendent of public instruction must propose a list of prioritized grants to the governor by September 1st of even-numbered years. The superintendent of public instruction must appoint an advisory committee to prioritize applications from small school districts and state-tribal education compact schools. Committee members must have experience in financing, managing, repairing, and improving school facilities in small school districts or state-tribal education compact schools but must not be involved in a small school district modernization program grant request for the biennium under consideration. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide administrative and staff support to the (([advisory]))advisory committee. The office of the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the advisory committee must design a grant application process with specific criteria for prioritizing grant requests.(b) The advisory committee created in (a) of this subsection must evaluate final applications from eligible school districts and state-tribal education compact schools. The advisory committee must submit a prioritized list of grants to the superintendent of public instruction. The list must prioritize applications to achieve the greatest improvement of school facilities, in the districts and state-tribal education compact schools with the most limited financial capacity, for projects that are likely to improve student health, safety, and academic performance for the largest number of students for the amount of state grant support. The advisory committee must develop specific criteria to achieve the prioritization. The submitted prioritized list must describe the project, the proposed state funding level, and the estimated total project cost including other funding and in-kind resources. The list must also indicate student achievement measures that will be used to evaluate the benefits of the project. The superintendent of public instruction and the governor may determine the level of funding in their omnibus capital appropriations act requests to support small school district modernization grants, but their funding requests must follow the prioritized list prepared by the advisory committee unless new information determines that a specific project is no longer viable as proposed.(5) Coordination with the school construction assistance program.(a) The full administrative and procedural process of school construction assistance program funding under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 may be streamlined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in order to coordinate eligible school construction assistance program funding with the small school district modernization grants. Such coordination must ensure that total state funding from both grants does not exceed total project costs minus available local resources.(b) Projects seeking small school district modernization grants must meet the requirements for a school construction assistance program grant except for the following: (i) The estimated cost of the project may be less than ((forty))40 percent of the estimated replacement value of the facility, and (ii) local funding assistance percentage requirements of the school construction assistance program do not apply. However, available district and state-tribal education compact school resources are considered in prioritizing small school district modernization grants.(6) Disbursement of grant funds and reporting requirements. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must award grants to school districts and state-tribal education compact schools. The grant must not be awarded until the district or state-tribal education compact school has identified available local and other resources sufficient to complete the approved project considering the amount of the state grant. The grant must specify reporting requirements from the district or state-tribal education compact school, which must include updating all pertinent information in the inventory and condition of schools data system and submitting a final project report as specified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the school facilities citizen((s [citizen])) advisory panel specified in RCW 28A.525.025.(7) From the effective date of this section through June 30, 2027, school districts receiving a small district modernization grant under this section may not combine this grant funding either with a school construction assistance program grant or with other grants awarded under this section to fund a single project.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8040. (1) The Joel Pritchard State Library, which is located on the state capitol grounds at 415 15th Avenue Southwest in Olympia, Washington, and which is currently undergoing a substantial renovation, is renamed the Joel Pritchard Building, consistent with the recommendations from the state capitol committee and the department of enterprise services, and with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee.(2) The department of enterprise services shall affix the name "Joel Pritchard Building" to the building at or near the completion of the renovation project.Sec. 8041. RCW 43.31.574 and 2024 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 90 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs. Eligible housing developments are projects that have received public funding and have secured enough funding to complete construction of the project that will result in a certificate of occupancy to open the affordable housing development, including the early learning facility.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8042. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8043. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.(End of part)--- END ---